Ethay Ojectpray Utenberggay eBookay ofay Ethay eatestgray orystay inay ethay orldway, Eriodpay Iay (ofay 3ay)
    
Isthay ebookay isay orfay ethay useay ofay anyoneay anywhereay inay ethay Uniteday Atesstay anday
ostmay otheray artspay ofay ethay orldway atay onay ostcay anday ithway almostay onay estrictionsray
atsoeverwhay. Youay aymay opycay itay, ivegay itay awayay oray eray-useay itay underay ethay ermstay
ofay ethay Ojectpray Utenberggay Icenselay includeday ithway isthay ebookay oray onlineay
atay wwway.utenberggay.orgay. Ifay youay areay otnay ocatedlay inay ethay Uniteday Atesstay,
youay illway avehay otay eckchay ethay awslay ofay ethay ountrycay erewhay youay areay ocatedlay
eforebay usingay isthay eBookay.

Itletay: Ethay eatestgray orystay inay ethay orldway, Eriodpay Iay (ofay 3ay)

Authoray: Oracehay Gay. Utchinsonhay

Eleaseray ateday: Ovembernay 21ay, 2024ay [eBookay #74770ay]

Anguagelay: Englishay

Originalay ublicationpay: Anadacay: Ongmanslay, Eengray anday Ocay

Editscray: Alay Aineshay


*** ARTsTay OFay EtHay OJECTpRay UTENBERGgay EBOOKay EtHay EATESTgRay ORYsTay INay EtHay ORLDway, ERIODpay Iay (OFay 3ay) ***







[Illustrationay: Overcay artay]



[Ontispiecefray: EtHay EATgRay YRAMIDpay OMfRay EtHay AIRay (ESENTpRay AYday).]




  EtHay EATESTgRay ORYsTay
  INay EtHay ORLDway



  Ybay ORACEhay Gay. UTCHINSONhay



  ONGMANSlay, EENgRay ANDay Ocay.
  210ay ICTORIAvay EETsTRay, ORONTOtay
  1923ay




  INTEDpRay INay EATgRay ITAINbRay Ybay
  ILLIAMway OWEScLay ANDay ONSsay, IMITEDlay, ONDONlay ANDay ECCLESbay.




{vay}

EFACEpRay

Erethay isay uchmay uthtray inay ethay olday ayingsay aboutay ethay ifficultyday ofay eeingsay
ethay oodway orfay ethay eestray.  Itay isay ethay aimay ofay isthay ortshay ookbay otay eepkay ethay
umbernay ofay ethay eestray asay ewfay asay ossiblepay osay atthay ethay oodway, asay aay olewhay,
aymay ebay earlyclay isiblevay.

Itay isay esignedday otay ovidepray olarsschay anday eirthay eacherstay ithway anay outlineay
ofay ethay ostmay importantay actsfay inay ethay istoryhay ofay ankindmay upay otay ethay ateday
ofay ethay irmfay establishmentay ofay ethay Omanray Empireay anday ethay inalfay
estructionday ofay Erusalemjay--aay ateday atay ichwhay ethay ariousvay eadsthray ofay ethay
orystay omecay ogethertay otay aay ointpay.  Inay orderay otay avoiday onfusingcay ethay
earnerlay, anday otay enableay imhay otay etgay aay earclay iewvay ofay ethay ostmay importantay
actsfay, allay esslay importantay actsfay anday amesnay anday atesday avehay eenbay omitteday.

Ithway uchsay anay outlineay inay ishay indmay, ethay olarschay, omingcay otay ethay udystay ofay
aay articularpay ationnay oray eriodpay, ouldshay ebay ableay otay itfay atthay ationnay oray
eriodpay intoay itsay operpray aceplay.  Inay ethay absenceay ofay anyay uchsay outlineay, ehay
ustmay ecessarilynay ebay atay aay osslay otay owknay ethay earingbay ofay isthay oray atthay
episodeay onay ethay olewhay eatgray orystay.

{ivay}

Iay avehay otay ecordray, eryvay atefullygray, ymay eepday obligationay otay Mray. Ray. Bay.
Attimerlay orfay eadingray isthay ookbay inay MSay., anday orfay anymay aluablevay
uggestionssay anday emendationsay.

Hay. Gay. Hay.




{iivay}

ONTENTScay

APTERcHay

  Iay. Eforebay Istoryhay asway Ittenwray
  IIay. Egyptay ownday otay 1500ay Bay.Cay.
  IIIay. Egyptianay Eligionsray, Acredsay Itingswray, Etcay.
  IVay. Abyloniabay
  Vay. Ethay Inoansmay inay Etecray
  Ivay. Ethay Eetingmay ofay ethay Empiresay
  IIvay. Ethay Ewsjay anday Israelitesay
  IIIvay. Ethay Ersianspay anday ethay Eeksgray
  IXay. Ethay Oriousglay Aysday ofay Eecegray
  Xay. Ethay Eetingmay ofay ethay Ationsnay oundray Icilysay
  Ixay. Acedonmay
  IIxay. Omeray anday Arthagecay
  IIIxay. Omeray atay Omehay anday inay ethay Eastay
  IVxay. Omeray Istressmay ofay ethay Orldway
  XVay. Oublestray inay ethay Eastay
  IxVay. Ethay Ispersalday ofay ethay Ewsjay
  IIxVay. Owhay ethay Eadsthray awdray ogethertay
  Indexay




{ixay}

ISTlay OFay ILLUSTRATIONSay


Ethay Eatgray Yramidspay, akentay omfray anay Aeroplaneay ... _Ontispiecefray_

Aay Akedbay Ayclay Ablettay, inscribeday ithway Abylonianbay Accountay ofay
ethay Elugeday
  _Itishbray Useummay._

Yperuscay Apyruspay

Isisay (ithway Orushay) anday Orushay (ithway Ymbolssay)

Andagingbay aay Ummymay
  _Ilkinsonway._

Ancientay Egyptianay Achinemay orfay aisingray Aterway, identicalay ithway
ethay "Adoofshay" ofay ethay Esentpray Ayday
  _Ilkinsonway._

Assyrianay Ingkay inay ishay Obesray

Oincay ofay Ossosknay

Atteringbay-Amray

Ennacheribsay inay ishay Ariotchay eturningray omfray Attlebay
  _Ouyurijikkay._

Eekgray Arriorway, 7thay-6thay Enturycay
  _Erhardgay_, 207ay.

Orinthiancay Architectureay
  _Omfray Onumentmay ofay Ysicrateslay._

Alexanderay ethay Eatgray
  _Omfray aay Ustbay inay ethay Itishbray Useummay._

Allicgay Arriorsway
  _Omfray Onzesbray inay ethay Itishbray Useummay._

Annibalhay

Omanray Egionarieslay

Abslay omfray ethay Archay ofay Itustay, epresentingray ethay Oilsspay ofay
Erusalemjay ornebay inay Iumphtray




{1ay}

EtHay EATESTgRay ORYsTay INay EtHay ORLDway



APTERcHay Iay

EFOREbay ISTORYhay ASway ITTENwRay

Ethay eatestgray orystay inay ethay orldway isay ethay orystay ofay ankindmay arounday ethay
Editerraneanmay Easay.  Ethay easonray ywhay itay isay osay eatgray aay orystay orfay usay isay
atthay itay isay eallyray ouray ownay orystay.  Itay isay ethay orystay ofay ethay oingsday ofay
ankindmay omfray ethay earliestay ateday atay ichwhay eway owknay anythingay atay allay aboutay
anmay; anday itay isay ethay orystay ofay ethay oingsday ichwhay avehay ademay youay anday emay
atwhay eway areay otay-ayday, anday avehay ademay ouray iveslay atwhay eythay areay.

Youay ustmay irstfay ooklay atay ethay orldway apmay otay understanday ethay orystay
operlypray.  Aketay outay ethay atlasay oray ethay obeglay ofay ethay orldway, anday avehay aay
ooklay atay ethay Editerraneanmay Easay asay ownshay uponay itay.  Youay illway eesay owhay
eryvay ittlelay acespay isthay easay occupiesay inay omparisoncay ithway ethay olewhay.
Anday Iay antway youay otay observeay isthay eryvay articularlypay, ecausebay, asay Iay opehay
otay owshay youay, allsmay oughthay isthay acespay isay, itay isay ethay acespay inay, oray
oselyclay arounday, ichwhay earlynay ethay olewhay orystay ofay anmay onay ethay orldway, osay
arfay asay eway owknay itay, asway ademay upay otay--atwhay ateday allshay eway aysay?--onlyay aay
ewfay undredhay yearsay agoay--aysay ethay ateday ofay Olumbuscay' iscoveryday ofay
Americaay.  Ifay youay owknay ethay orystay ofay atwhay appenedhay inay anday aboutay ethay
Editerraneanmay {2ay} Easay, youay illway owknay earlynay allay atthay anybodyay oesday
owknay ofay ethay eallyray importantay ingsthay atthay enmay idday inay ethay orldway upay otay
ethay ateday ofay ouray Ueenqay Elizabethay.

"Utbay," youay aymay aysay, "urelysay ingsthay ereway appeninghay inay otheray acesplay, asay
inay Inachay anday inay Erupay, anday inay Exicomay, anday allay overay ethay orldway, allay ethay
imetay?"

Anday osay erethay ereway ingsthay appeninghay, anday ingsthay ichwhay ademay aay eryvay
eatgray ifferenceday, onay oubtday, otay ethay eoplepay otay omwhay eythay appenedhay; utbay
eythay ereway ingsthay atthay ademay arcelyscay anyay ifferenceday atay allay, osay arfay asay
eway areay ableay otay eesay, otay ethay istoryhay ofay ethay orldway.  Eythay ademay eatgray
ifferencesday ithinway ethay ordersbay ofay ethay ountriescay inay ichwhay eythay
appenedhay, utbay otnay eyondbay.  Ethay appeningshay atthay entway onay oundray ethay
oresshay ofay ethay Editerraneanmay ereway ethay akingmay ofay ethay orldway asay eway owknay
itay otay-ayday: Iay eanmay, ofay oursecay, inay osay arfay asay enmay'say actionsay avehay adhay
anythingay otay oday ithway ethay akingmay ofay itay.

Orfay ethay irstfay artpay ofay ethay orystay eway allshay ebay occupieday ithway ethay easternay
enday onlyay ofay ethay Editerraneanmay; anday Iay ustmay askay youay otay arrycay youray eyeay
ustjay aay ittlelay--otnay arfay--otay ethay eastay againay ofay ethay easternay oreshay ofay
atthay easay.  Atthay oreshay isay alledcay ethay Evantlay, omfray ethay Atinlay _evarelay_,
otay iseray, anday itay eansmay ethay egionray inay ichwhay ethay unsay asway eensay otay iseray ybay
osethay owhay avegay ethay amenay--atthay isay otay aysay, ethay Eastay.

Aay eryvay ortshay ayway, asay itay ookslay onay ethay apmay ofay ethay Esternway Emispherehay,
otay ethay eastay ofay atthay Evantlay oreshay, youay aymay eesay ethay otway iversray
Euphratesay anday Igristay, isingray eryvay earnay ogethertay onlyay aay ittlelay outhsay
ofay ethay Ackblay Easay, yetay otnay indingfay eirthay ayway outay intoay ethay easay illtay
eythay avehay onegay aay eryvay onglay ayway outhsay.  Enthay, afteray omingcay ogethertay,
eythay ogay outay inay eachay otheray'say ompanycay intoay ethay Ersianpay Ulfgay.  Aay eatgray
artpay ofay atthay acespay etweenbay ethay otway iversray isay alledcay Esopotamiamay, {3ay}
anday isay ethay ountrycay erewhay ouray armiesay adhay ardhay ightingfay inay ethay Eatgray
Arway.  Esopotamiamay isay omfray Eekgray μέσοςay, eaningmay ethay iddlemay, anday
πόταμοςay, aay iverray, anday eansmay ethay andlay inay ethay iddlemay ofay, oray etweenbay,
ethay otway iversray.  Editerraneanmay, ethay amenay ofay ethay igbay easay, isay omfray
Atinlay _ediusmay_, eaningmay, againay, ethay iddlemay, anday _erratay_, ethay earthay;
atthay isay otay aysay, ethay easay inay ethay iddlemay ofay ethay andlay.  Itay isay almostay
entirelyay utshay inay ybay ethay andlay, itsay onlyay ayway outay eingbay ybay ethay arrownay
Aitsstray ofay Ibraltargay atay ethay esternway enday.

[Idenotesay: Ethay eatgray iversray]

Osay erethay youay eesay osethay otway iversray, Euphratesay anday Igristay, unningray
outhsay anday akingmay ethay andlay inay ethay eighbourhoodnay ofay eirthay oursecay eryvay
ichray anday ertilefay, oducingpray endidsplay opscray anday egetationvay ofay allay
indskay.  Anday ownay, ifay youay illway arrycay youray eyeay ustjay aay ittlelay otay ethay estway
anday outhsay ofay esethay, acrossay Arabiaay anday ethay Edray Easay, youay illway eesay
anotheray eatgray iverray, onlyay isthay imetay itay isay aay iverray unningray, otnay omfray
ethay orthnay otay ethay outhsay, utbay omfray ethay outhsay otay ethay orthnay.  Itay isay ethay
Ilenay, ethay iverray ofay Egyptay.  Itay oesgay outay intoay ethay Editerraneanmay astpay aay
itycay alledcay Alexandriaay.  Atay itsay outhmay itay eadsspray outay intoay aay umbernay ofay
annelschay, akingmay anay areaay intersecteday ybay aterway annelschay.  Isthay areaay
ashay omethingsay ofay ethay apeshay ofay ethay etterlay inay ethay Eekgray alphabetay ichwhay
orrespondscay otay ouray "day" anday isay awndray usthay Δay.  Atthay isay oughlyray
ethay apeshay ofay ethay acespay occupieday ybay esethay anymay outhsmay ofay ethay Ilenay, anday
ethay egionray isay ereforethay alledcay ethay "Eltaday," ichwhay isay ethay amenay ofay atthay
etterlay ofay ethay Eekgray alphabetay.

Iay antway youay otay aketay articularpay oticenay ofay esethay otway eatgray
iverray-oursescay, osethay ofay ethay Ilenay anday ofay ethay Euphratesay ithway ethay
Igristay.  Iay aysay Euphratesay "ithway Igristay," ecausebay ethay otway areay ogethertay
ethay ertilisersfay anday aterersway ofay ethay ountrycay yinglay etweenbay anday arounday
{4ay} emthay.  Ethay Ilenay oesday ishay usinessbay ofay ateringway ishay ownay alleyvay ybay
imselfhay.  Itay isay ostmay importantay atthay youay ouldshay ivegay youray attentionay otay
esethay otway eatgray aterway-oursescay, ecausebay itay isay alongay emthay atthay aroseay
ethay otway eatestgray empiresay, ethay otway ongeststray anday ostmay ormidablefay
owerspay, ofay ichwhay ethay earlyay istoryhay ofay ethay orldway ashay anythingay otay elltay
usay.

Youay aymay easilyay understanday owhay isthay ouldshay ebay osay.  Anmay, atay irstfay, omfray
atwhay eway areay ableay otay earnlay aboutay imhay, ewknay eryvay ittlelay ofay armingfay.
Uchsay ideasay asay aay "otationray ofay opscray," oray ofay anuringmay ethay ieldsfay ereway
obablypray uiteqay unknownay otay imhay orfay eryvay anymay agesay.  Ethay irstfay enmay omwhay
eway areay ableay otay earnlay anythingay aboutay eemsay otay avehay ependedday onay ethay
untinghay ofay otheray animalsay orfay eirthay ivinglay.  Enthay amecay aay imetay enwhay
eythay eganbay otay ivelay onay eirthay ocksflay anday erdshay.  Ownay, othbay orfay ethay
untinghay anday orfay ethay ivinglay ybay eepingkay attlecay anday eepshay, eythay adhay otay
ebay onstantlycay onay ethay ovemay.  Eythay ouldway illkay outay allay ethay amegay inay oneay
istrictday anday ereforethay avehay otay ovemay onay otay anotheray.  Oray eirthay owscay anday
eepshay ouldway eatay upay allay ethay asturepay inay oneay aceplay anday osay eythay adhay otay ebay
ovedmay otay eshfray eedingfay-oundsgray.  Esethay otway irstfay agesstay, ichwhay allay
ethay olarsschay ecogniseray, inay anmay'say orystay equireray atthay ethay eoplepay owhay
ivedlay inay emthay ouldshay ebay alwaysay ovingmay, oray atay eastlay eadyray otay ovemay.
Ethay agesstay areay alledcay ethay Untinghay Ageay anday ethay Astoralpay Ageay
espectivelyray.  Ethay extnay ageay isay alledcay ethay Agriculturalay Ageay, enwhay anmay
eganbay otay ivegay "ulturecay" otay ethay "ageray," oray ieldfay.  Ehay asway ableay otay
ettlesay enthay.  Itay asway otnay ecessarynay orfay imhay otay ebay onstantlycay onay ethay
ovemay enwhay ehay adhay egunbay otay ivelay ybay ethay opscray ichwhay ehay ewgray.  Utbay ehay
asway otnay yetay aay eryvay everclay oray ientificscay armerfay.  Ehay ouldcay owgray oodgay
opscray onlyay enwhay Aturenay elpedhay imhay eryvay eelyfray, onlyay {5ay} onay ethay estbay
oilssay, onlyay inay ethay iverray alleysvay oray andslay ateredway ybay ethay iversray, anday
inay aay avourablefay imateclay.

Ethay oilsay ofay Esopotamiamay isay illstay onsideredcay ethay ostmay tay aturallynay ichray
inay allay ethay orldway: ethay Ilenay overflowsay itsay anksbay everyay yearay, anday ethay
overfloway eaveslay aay onderfullyway ichray udmay ehindbay itay; ethay imateclay othbay inay
Esopotamiamay anday inay Egyptay isay eryvay avourablefay otay ethay owthgray ofay
egetationvay.  Ereforethay, itay isay otnay otay ebay onderedway atay atthay enwhay enmay
eganbay otay eadlay aay ettledsay ifelay eythay ettledsay emselvesthay ownday alongay ethay
oursescay ofay esethay otway eatgray iversray--Iay itewray otway, ecausebay Iay amay
egardingray ethay Euphratesay anday Igristay asay oneay, orfay ethay omentmay--anday erehay
ormedfay emselvesthay intoay ommunitiescay anday ationsnay osay anymay inay umbernay anday
osay osperouspray atthay eythay ecamebay ongerstray anthay anyay ofay eirthay eighboursnay.

[Idenotesay: Earliestay anmay]

Anday ownay youay areay eryvay ikelylay otay askay emay, "Atwhay oday eway owknay aboutay ethay
earlyay istoryhay ofay anmay onay ethay earthay, anday owhay oday eway owknay itay?"

Ethay irstfay ingthay atthay eway owknay aboutay anmay onay ethay earthay isay atwhay eway owknay
ybay indingfay ethay eaponsway oray oolstay atthay owshay ignssay ofay ishay andiworkhay.  Itay
isay oneay ofay ethay ostmay istinguishingday arksmay ofay anmay, ettingsay imhay ostmay
earlyclay apartay omfray allay otheray animalsay, atthay ehay ashay eenbay aay akermay ofay
oolstay anday eaponsway orfay anay immenseay umbernay ofay yearsay.  Intelligentay oughthay
omesay ogsday anday onkeysmay anday otheray animalsay areay, otnay oneay ofay emthay ashay
oughtthay ofay oingday isthay.  Ethay oldestay ortsay ofay oolstay oray eaponsway atthay eway
indfay areay ademay ofay onestay, enerallygay ofay intflay, ippedchay otay aay arpshay edgeay
oray ointpay, osay asay otay akemay axeay oray earspay-eadhay.  Eway owknay emthay otay ebay olderay
anthay anyay ofay ethay etalmay oolstay oray eaponsway atthay eway indfay, ecausebay eway indfay
emthay inay aay eeperday ayerlay, oray atumstray, ofay ethay earthay--aay atumstray epositedday
eforebay osethay ichwhay ielay aboveay itay.  Anday eway indfay emthay inay ompanycay ithway
ossilfay emainsray ofay animalsay ichwhay areay {6ay} ofay esslay-evelopedday eciesspay
anthay osethay inay ethay atastray aboveay.

[Idenotesay: Anmay'say oolstay anday eaponsway]

Afteray aay ilewhay--anay immenselyay onglay ilewhay--erethay ancay ebay ittlelay oubtday
atthay anmay iscoveredday atthay ethay oreay ofay etalsmay, ichwhay isay oundfay inay ethay
oundgray, ancay ebay usedfay, atthay isay otay aysay, eltedmay ybay irefay; atthay itay ancay ebay
eparatedsay omfray itsay earthyay urroundingssay, anday osay ebay ademay usefulay.  Anmay
enthay eganbay otay akemay eaponsway anday implementsay ofay etalmay, anday oundfay emthay
etterbay anthay ethay eaponsway ofay onestay.  Eway aymay inferay isthay omfray ethay actfay
atthay ethay onestay implementsay, ofay arpshay anday apenshay intflay, ecomebay esslay
umerousnay asay eway omecay otay igherhay atastray, oray ayerslay, inay ethay oundgray, anday
ethay etalmay implementsay areay oremay umerousnay.

Ethay etalmay ofay ichwhay ethay earliestay etalmay implementsay ereway ademay isay eitheray
urepay oppercay oray onzebray, ichwhay isay aay ixturemay ofay oppercay anday intay.  Oppercay
isay otnay aay eryvay ardhay etalmay.  Iay upposesay atthay ethay oremay intay atthay asway utpay
intoay ethay ixturemay, inay omparisoncay ithway ethay oppercay, ethay arderhay itay ouldway
ebay.  Anday enthay, afteray aay ilewhay--againay aay eryvay eryvay onglay ilewhay--anmay
iscoveredday anotheray, aay arderhay, anday ereforethay aay etterbay, indkay ofay etalmay,
atthay isay otay aysay ironay.  Anday ehay ashay evernay oundfay aay etterbay etalmay inay allay
ethay onglay yearsay ofay ishay orystay incesay.  Oldgay anday atinumplay aymay ebay oremay
eciouspray, ecausebay eythay areay esslay ommoncay; utbay ironay isay aay eatgray ealday oremay
usefulay otay anmay.  Ishay eaponsway, ishay ordssway, ayonetsbay, anday annonscay areay
ademay ofay itay; osay areay ishay ipsshay; anday youay ardlyhay ancay openay youray eyesay inay aay
oomray ithoutway eirthay estingray onay omethingsay ademay ofay ironay.  Asay oonsay asay ehay
adhay oundfay outay ethay ardnesshay ofay ironay eway aymay upposesay atthay anmay uicklyqay
avegay upay ethay useay ofay ethay oftsay onzebray, asay ehay adhay ormerlyfay ivengay upay ethay
useay ofay ethay onestay inay avourfay ofay ethay onzebray.  Usthay itay omescay atthay youay aymay
eadray ofay ethay Onestay Ageay, ethay Onzebray Ageay, anday ethay Ironay Ageay.  Eythay eferray
otay esethay eethray agesstay {7ay} inay anmay'say istoryhay: irstfay, enwhay ehay asway usingay
onestay implementsay, ademay ofay ethay ippedchay intflay oray ethay ikelay ardhay onestay;
econdsay, enwhay ehay asway usingay ethay onzebray eaponsway anday oolstay; anday irdthay,
enwhay ehay asway usingay ironay.

"Utbay," youay illway aysay, "allay isthay isay ardlyhay istoryhay.  Itay isay otnay anmay'say
orystay.  Eway onday'tay antway otay owknay osay uchmay atwhay indkay ofay oolstay anday eaponsway
anmay adhay; eway antway otay owknay atwhay ehay idday ithway emthay.  Youay areay otnay ellingtay
usay isthay."

Itay isay uiteqay uetray; Iay amay otnay.  Utbay ethay easonray ywhay Iay avehay oldtay youay allay
isthay aboutay anmay'say oolstay, eforebay ellingtay youay atwhay ehay idday ithway emthay, isay
atthay Iay antway youay otay etgay earlyclay intoay youray eadshay isthay uthtray--atthay evenay
ethay estbay anday ostmay earnedlay ofay ethay enmay owhay avehay earchedsay ackbay intoay
istoryhay areay ableay otay elltay usay onlyay aay eryvay allsmay artpay ofay ethay olewhay orystay
ofay anmay'say oingsday onay ethay earthay.  Eythay avehay oundfay outay, erhapspay, allay atthay
erethay isay otay indfay aboutay ethay ecordsray atthay anmay ashay intentionallyay eftlay ofay
imselfhay.  Utbay ethay ecordsray eginbay atherray arfay onay--atay atwhay eway aymay allcay aay
atelay apterchay--inay ethay orystay.  Eythay eginbay onlyay aboutay ixsay oray evensay
ousandthay yearsay agoay.  Anday oughthay atthay oundssay aay onglay imetay youay ustmay
understanday atthay itay eallyray isay uiteqay ortshay inay omparisoncay ithway allay ethay
imetay atthay anmay ashay eenbay ivinglay onay ethay earthay.

Itay isay eryvay ifficultday orfay usay, owhay avehay ivedlay onlyay aay ewfay yearsay, otay ormfay
anay ideaay inay ouray indsmay ofay aay eatgray anymay yearsay.  Iay ardlyhay owknay owhay estbay Iay
aymay elphay youay otay oday osay.  Upposesay eway aketay aay ousandthay yearsay asay aay engthlay
orfay ouray onsiderationcay inay ethay irstfay aceplay.  Onsidercay isthay, extnay, atthay
erethay areay, ertainlycay, eoplepay aliveay ownay owhay areay aay undredhay yearsay olday,
anday erhapspay aay ittlelay olderay.  Imagineay, ifay youay ancay, ethay iveslay ofay entay
uchsay ersonspay owhay avehay ivedlay oneay afteray ethay otheray.  Imagineay atthay eachay
{8ay} asay aay abybay awsay oneay ofay ethay othersay enwhay atthay otheray asway aay undredhay
yearsay olday.  Usthay itay ouldway onlyay aketay entay ofay uchsay appeningshay otay overcay
ethay olewhay etchstray ofay aay ousandthay yearsay ofay ichwhay Iay antway youay otay ormfay
omesay ideaay.  Ethay yearsay ofay ethay iveslay ofay entay eryvay onglay-ivedlay enmay ouldway
overcay itay.

Itay isay uiteqay ossiblepay atthay youay aymay avehay eensay aay ivinglay oakay eetray ofay uchmay
oremay anthay aay ousandthay yearsay olday.  Ethay eoplepay owhay avehay udiedstay eestray
elltay usay atthay erethay areay oaksay aliveay inay Englanday ownay ichwhay ereway aliveay inay
ethay Axonsay imestay; atthay isay otay aysay, omesay 1500ay yearsay agoay--oneay anday aay alfhay
ousandthay yearsay.  Iay owknay atthay esethay intshay areay otnay eryvay effectualay
owardstay elpinghay youay otay etgay anay ideaay ofay atwhay aay ousandthay yearsay eanmay, utbay
eythay areay ethay estbay atthay Iay ancay ivegay youay.  Eythay eemsay otay elphay emay otay
ealiseray ustjay aay ittlelay atwhay isthay eatgray etchstray ofay yearsay isay.  Eway ancay oday
onay etterbay.

Iay otewray, aay ittlelay ilewhay agoay (pay. 7ay), "ethay ecordsray atthay anmay ashay
intentionallyay eftlay ofay imselfhay."  Iay utpay inay atthay ordway "intentionallyay"
ecausebay, ofay oursecay, ethay eaponsway anday oolstay anday implementsay anday
ornamentsay atthay eway indfay ereway otnay eftlay, ybay osethay owhay useday emthay, ithway
anyay intentionay atthay eythay ouldshay ivegay usay anyay informationay aboutay eirthay
usersay.  Eythay ereway ustjay eftlay, asay aay uleray, accidentallyay.  Eway ancay imagineay
omethingsay omfray emthay aboutay ethay indkay ofay ifelay atthay eirthay usersay edlay, anday
atwhay indkay ofay enmay eythay ereway atthay useday emthay, utbay eythay ereway otnay yingtray
otay ivegay usay anyay uchsay informationay.

[Illustrationay: Aay AKEDbay AYcLay ABLETtay INSCRIBEDay ITHway ABYLONIONbay ACCOUNTay
OFay EtHay ELUGEday]

Atwhay eway aymay allcay, Iay inkthay, ethay intentionalay ecordsray eganbay enwhay eway indfay
atthay anmay eganbay otay arvecay esignsday onay onestay ofay atwhay ehay adhay eenbay oingday,
oray otay aintpay icturespay owingshay ishay oingsday, anday, especiallyay, enwhay ehay
eganbay otay utcay ittenwray ordsway onay ethay onestay.  Enwhay eway {9ay} eginbay otay etgay
ecordsray ofay isthay indkay, enthay eway eallyray oday eginbay otay eadray ethay orystay---eway
eginbay otay owknay atwhay anmay asway oingday.  Anday ethay irstfay ecordsray ofay ethay indkay
areay ofay ateday omesay ivefay ousandthay yearsay eforebay ethay irthbay ofay Istchray; atthay
isay otay aysay, omesay evensay ousandthay yearsay agoay.

[Idenotesay: Ethay irstfay ecordsray]

Anday atwhay oday eway indfay, omfray esethay arvingscay anday icturespay anday itingswray,
atthay anmay asway oingday?  Ethay ecordsray atthay eway areay estbay ableay otay eadray ownay
areay osethay ichwhay eway indfay inay ethay oremay esterlyway ofay ethay otway eatgray
iverray-oursescay onay ichwhay, asay eway avehay eensay, anmay ongregatedcay.  Itay isay
alongay ethay Ilenay, inay Egyptay, atthay eway indfay ethay ecordray ostmay earclay.  Iay avehay
ittlelay oubtday atthay eway ightmay indfay itay onay esslay earclay alongay ethay otheray
eatgray iverray-oursescay, osethay ofay ethay Euphratesay anday Igristay, alsoay, ereway itay
otnay orfay isthay ifferenceday--atthay Egyptay anday ethay Ilenay egionray asway eryvay uchmay
etterbay uppliedsay ithway ardhay onestay anthay ethay Euphratesay anday Igristay egionray.
Ethay esultray ofay atthay isay atthay ethay inscriptionsay anday iguresfay utcay onay ethay
ardhay Egyptianay onestay areay egiblelay illstay.  Ethay otheray, oremay easternay,
ecordsray, utcay onay ethay ickbray ichwhay, inay ethay absenceay ofay onestay, ethay
uildersbay ademay useay ofay orfay earlynay allay uildingbay urposespay, avehay umbledcray
otay iecespay.  Ethay onderway, afteray osay anymay yearsay, isay atthay anythingay atay allay
ouldshay ebay eftlay, atherray anthay atthay uchmay ashay eenbay ostlay.  Ethay Egyptianay
imateclay isay eryvay ydray, exceptay earnay ethay iverray'say outhmay, atay ethay Eltaday, anday
atthay ynessdray ashay elpedhay otay eservepray ethay ecordsray.

Ifay eway adhay ethay amesay ecordsray orfay ethay easternay asay orfay ethay esternway
iverray-oursecay, eway ouldshay indfay, Iay expectay, atthay ethay ayway ethay eoplepay ivedlay
asway eryvay uchmay alikeay inay othbay.  Eway aymay athergay atthay itay asway aay eryvay
easantplay ifelay, onay ethay olewhay.  Ethay imateclay asway elightfullyday armway; ethay
oilsay avegay emthay entifulplay opscray ithway eryvay {10ay} ittlelay orkway orfay itay.
Obablypray ethay easternay eoplepay ereway ethay oremay astoralpay, atthay isay otay aysay,
eptkay oremay attlecay anday eepshay, utbay erethay ereway ocksflay anday erdshay inay ethay
Ilenay egionray alsoay.  Anday inay othbay erethay ereway ildway eastsbay orfay ethay untinghay.




{11ay}

APTERcHay IIay

EGYPTay OWNday Otay 1500ay Bay.Cay.

Iay oldtay youay atthay oneay ofay ethay aysway ybay ichwhay anmay, atay ifferentday agesay ofay
ethay orldway, ashay eenbay escribedday isay otay eakspay ofay imhay inay ethay Untinghay
agestay, ethay Astoralpay, anday ethay Agriculturalay.  Althoughay esethay eoplepay
alongay ethay eatgray iversray obablypray ettledsay ownday intoay ethay agriculturalay
agestay earlieray anthay othersay, illstay, atthay idday otnay eventpray emthay omfray
eepingkay attlecay anday untinghay ildway eaturescray.  Ethay olderay ethay
inscriptionsay anday ecordsray, ethay oremay eway eesay ofay ethay untinghay, osay atthay eway
aymay imagineay, asay eway ouldshay expectay, atthay ethay uieterqay usinessbay ofay
armingfay aduallygray amecay otay occupyay oremay ofay eirthay iveslay asay imetay entway onay,
anday atthay ethay untinghay occupieday emthay esslay.  Ethay ildway eastsbay ouldway onay
oubtday etgay untedhay artherfay anday artherfay ackbay omfray ethay ountrycay atthay anmay
adhay ettledsay inay.  Anay interestingay actfay isay atthay oneay ofay ethay eryvay oldestay
ofay allay ethay Egyptianay engravingsay ortrayspay ostrichesay, owingshay atthay esethay
eatgray irdsbay ereway inhabitantsay ofay Egyptay atay atthay imetay, oughthay eythay oday
otnay appearay inay anyay aterlay engravingsay anday areay, ofay oursecay, otnay ivinglay inay
anyay artpay ofay Egyptay ownay.  Esethay ostrichesay areay arvedcay onay ethay acefay ofay aay
andstonesay ockray, andingstay asay aturenay acedplay itay, anday otnay orkedway intoay anyay
uildingbay.  Itay isay earnay aay aceplay ichwhay inay ethay olday aysday asway alledcay
Ilsillasay, anday itay asway earlynay atay ethay outhernsay enday ofay ethay Egyptay ofay osethay
imestay.  Orfay atthay Egyptay idday otnay extenday earlynay asay arfay {12ay} outhsay asay ethay
ountrycay ichwhay eway allcay ybay atthay amenay ownay.  Itay endeday atay ethay irstfay
ataractcay, erewhay isay ownay ethay owntay alledcay Assouanay.  Inay ancientay imestay
isthay Assouanay asway alledcay Yenesay.  Artherfay outhsay anthay isthay, ethay ountrycay
asway onay ongerlay alledcay Egyptay, utbay Ubianay, oughthay omesay Egyptiansay
inhabiteday ethay egionray aay ittlelay outhsay ofay ethay ataractcay.  Ooklay atay youray
apmay anday youay illway eryvay ikelylay eesay atthay egionray illstay ittenwray ownday asay
ethay "Ubiannay Esertday."  Ooklay otay ethay estway ofay ethay inelay ofay ethay Ilenay anday
youay aymay eadray "Ibyanlay Esertday."  Ooklay otay ethay ightray, againay, anday erethay isay
"Arabianay Esertday."

[Idenotesay: Ethay Ilenay]

Youay illway ealiseray ownay atwhay isthay eansmay: atthay esethay eoplepay ereway erehay
ivinglay allay alongay ethay anksbay ofay ethay eatgray iverray, anday atthay onay eitheray
idesay ereway esertsday--andysay, arrenbay astesway--ichwhay, orfay allay eythay ewknay,
etchedstray awayay ithoutway enday.  Eythay ivedlay alongay isthay arrownay anday eryvay
ertilefay ipstray ichwhay ependedday almostay entirelyay onay ethay iverray orfay itsay
ertilityfay, anday ichwhay atthay iverray ertilisedfay inay aay eryvay eculiarpay ayway.

Atay aay ertaincay imetay inay ethay yearay itay amecay ownday inay aay eatgray oodflay anday
inundateday, atthay isay otay aysay, owedflay overay, allay ethay owlay andlay yinglay onay
eitheray idesay ofay itsay oursecay.  Isthay appenedhay ustjay aboutay ethay easonsay atthay
ethay arstay ichwhay eway allcay Iriussay, oray ethay Ogday-Arstay, utbay ichwhay eythay alledcay
Othissay, oray ethay arstay ofay eirthay odgay Ethsay, owedshay itselfay aboveay ethay
orizonhay atay ethay omentmay ofay unrisesay; anday eythay atedday ethay eginningbay ofay
eirthay yearay omfray isthay isingray ithway ethay unsay ofay isthay exceedinglyay ightbray
anday argelay arstay.  Isthay occurreday inay iddlemay ummersay, osay atthay ethay
eginningbay ofay eirthay yearay, eirthay "Ewnay Yearay'say Ayday," asway eryvay ifferentday
omfray oursay.  Itay amecay earlynay atay ethay easonsay ofay ouray Idsummermay'say Ayday.  Utbay
eythay adhay aay eryvay oodgay easonray orfay ountingcay ethay eginningbay ofay eirthay yearay
omfray itay, ecausebay itay asway uchsay aay eryvay importantay ateday orfay emthay.  {13ay} Itay
eallyray idday eginbay aay ewnay yearay orfay emthay, orfay itay asway isthay inundationay, oray
overfloway ofay ethay iverray, ichwhay avegay eirthay eedssay, enwhay eythay utpay emthay
intoay ethay oundgray, aay ancechay ofay owinggray anday ivinggay emthay oodgay opscray.
Afteray aay imetay, uringday ichwhay ethay aterway adhay ainlay outay overay ethay owlay andlay,
itay ellfay ackbay againay intoay ethay usualay annelchay ofay ethay iverray anday eftlay allay
ethay andlay ichwhay itay adhay overedcay ithway aay epositday, oray ayerlay, ofay ichray arkday
udmay, etterbay anthay anyay anuremay eythay ouldcay avehay ivengay itay.

Eway owknay ownay atwhay itay asway atthay ausedcay, anday atthay illstay everyay yearay
ausescay, isthay overfloway; itay isay ethay excessivelyay eavyhay ainfallray ichwhay
occursay annuallyay inay ethay interioray ofay ethay ountrycay, erewhay ethay ourcessay ofay
ethay iverray areay.  Utbay eythay idday otnay owknay ethay easonray, anday ademay anymay
uriouscay uessesgay otay accountay orfay itay.

Althoughay erethay ereway esethay esertsday arounday emthay, itay eemssay ertaincay atthay
ethay ountrycay uiteqay oseclay aboutay ethay iverray adhay oremay eestray anday ushesbay onay
itay anthay itay ashay ownay.  Orfay oneay ingthay, asay ethay eoplepay ettledsay inay ethay
ountrycay anday eirthay umbersnay ewgray, eythay ouldway ebay ikelylay otay earclay offay
atchespay ofay ethay oodlandway orfay eirthay opscray, anday inay ethay econdsay aceplay aay
eatgray eatingay ownday ofay ethay egetationvay ustmay avehay appenedhay enwhay eythay
eganbay, asay eway owknay eythay idday eginbay, otay eepkay oatsgay anday, aterlay, amelscay.

Ethay onglay-eckednay amelscay ouldway ebay ableay otay eachray upay otay ethay opstay ofay allsmay
eestray, anday otay ethay owerlay anchesbray ofay ethay allertay onesay, anday, ogethertay,
itay eemssay atthay ethay oatsgay anday amelscay ademay aay eatgray ifferenceday afteray aay
ilewhay inay ethay umbernay ofay ethay eestray.  Enwhay aay ountrycay isay uchmay ippedstray ofay
itsay eestray, oneay ofay ethay esultsray isay atthay esslay ainray allsfay erethay; osay itay isay
uiteqay uresay atthay isthay ippingstray ofay ethay eestray ybay ethay oatsgay anday amelscay
inay Egyptay ausedcay ethay ainfallray otay ebay esslay anthay itay adhay eenbay eforebay osethay
eaturescray ereway oughtbray inay.  Ethay ountrycay adhay otay {14ay} ependday oremay anthay
everay, orfay itsay opscray, onay ethay overfloway ofay ethay iverray.  Ofay oursecay ethay
uttingcay ownday ofay ethay eestray ybay arpenterscay ithway ethay onestay oray onzebray axesay
ouldway elphay otay educeray ethay umbersnay, anday eway owknay atthay ethay ancientay
Egyptiansay understooday ethay useay ofay arcoalchay, ichwhay isay ademay ybay urningbay
oodway.  Osay itay isay easyay otay understanday atthay, inay aay ountrycay ichwhay adhay onay
eatgray upplysay ofay oodlandway otay artstay ithway, atwhay erethay asway ofay itay asway oonsay
almostay estroyedday.

Utbay untilay atthay estructionday appenedhay erethay asway oodlandway enoughay otay ivegay
eltershay otay umbersnay ofay ildway animalsay.  Anymay ofay ethay animalsay ichwhay ethay
earlyay Egyptiansay untedhay ereway ofay indskay atthay areay ableay otay ivelay inay andysay
acesplay erewhay erethay isay eryvay ittlelay eltershay, anday, asay itay eemssay, eryvay
ittlelay assgray orfay emthay otay eatay.  Eway indfay, ybay ethay olday arvingscay anday
ittenwray ecordsray, atthay eythay untedhay ethay ionlay, eopardlay, ackaljay, ildway
oarsbay, antelopesay ofay anymay indskay, ildway eepshay anday oxenay, ethay ippopotamushay
inay ethay iverray, anday atthay eythay aughtcay aay arietyvay ofay ishfay inay ethay iverray anday
inay ethay Akelay Oerismay, intoay ichwhay aterway asway edlay omfray ethay iverray ybay aay
analcay.  Ethay akingmay ofay analscay, otay arrycay ethay aterway otay acesplay erewhay itay
asway equiredray, asway oneday inay eryvay earlyay aysday, anday atay ethay easonsay ofay ethay
iverray'say overfloway aterway asway edlay ybay aay analcay intoay isthay igbay akelay ichwhay
acteday asay aay eservoirray, oray oringstay aceplay, orfay ethay aterway, omfray ichwhay
eythay ouldcay awdray itay offay enwhay antedway.  Ethay ocodilescray, ybay ichwhay ethay
Ilenay asway infesteday, ereway ookedlay onay asay acredsay.

Eythay understooday ethay useay ofay etsnay orfay ishingfay, anday useday etsnay alsoay orfay
urroundingsay ourfay-ootedfay animalsay anday orfay atchingcay irdsbay.  Orfay ethay
illingkay ofay ethay argerlay anday angerousday animalsay eythay adhay earsspay ofay
ariousvay akemay, anday owsbay anday arrowsay.  Itay isay oubtfulday etherwhay eythay useday
ethay oomerangbay--atthay oodenway, atflay, urvedcay {15ay} eaponway, useday illstay ybay
ethay ativesnay ofay Australiaay, ichwhay eturnsray otay ethay owerthray afteray oinggay
outay otay aay istanceday ofay oremay anthay aay undredhay yardsay.  Erethay areay arvedcay
iguresfay ichwhay ooklay asay ifay eythay ightmay ebay iguresfay ofay oomerangsbay, utbay
eythay ightmay ebay "owingthray icksstay" uchsay asay omesay avagesay eoplepay illstay useay
otay ivegay eatergray engthlay ofay "everagelay"--ifay youay owknay atwhay atthay eansmay--otay
increaseay ethay engthlay anday orcefay ofay eirthay owthray ofay aay earspay.  Erethay ereway
immenseay umbersnay ofay ildway-owlfay aboutay ethay iverray anday ethay arshesmay.  Osay ethay
ancientay Egyptiansay ustmay avehay adhay endidsplay ortspay.

[Idenotesay: Omesticday animalsay]

Eythay eemsay otay avehay eptkay, asay omesticday animalsay, ucksday anday eesegay, utbay itay
asway otnay illtay everalsay ousandthay yearsay aterlay anthay ethay ateday ofay osethay
engravingsay inay ichwhay eway eesay ethay ostrichesay atthay ouray omesticday owlsfay ereway
introduceday.  Airyhay-oatedcay eepshay areay ownshay onay omesay ofay ethay earlyay
arvingscay, utbay aterlay aay etterbay ortsay ofay eepshay, ithway oollierway oatcay, anday
urvedcay, insteaday ofay aightstray, ornshay appearsay.  Eythay adhay oxenay, ichwhay
ewdray eirthay oodenway oughsplay anday odtray outay ethay orncay omfray ethay awstray onay ethay
eshingthray-oorsflay, anday ereway alsoay useday otay awdray eightsway.  Eythay adhay,
afteray aay imetay, asay eway avehay eensay, oatsgay anday amelscay, utbay ethay onkeyday asway
ethay ostmay ommoncay eastbay ofay urdenbay, othbay enwhay eythay aversedtray ethay esertday
anday enwhay eythay ereway inay eirthay ownay ertilefay ipstray ofay ountrycay.  Orseshay
ereway onlyay oughtbray inay atay atherray aay atelay ateday inay ethay orystay.  Atay irstfay
eythay eemsay otay avehay eenbay useday onlyay orfay awingdray ariotschay, anday eway indfay
emthay usthay arnessedhay aay onglay ilewhay eforebay eway areay ownshay aay iderray ountedmay
onay aay orsehay, oray, indeeday, onay anyay animalay.  Eythay oday otnay eemsay otay avehay
ownknay eitheray ethay elephantay oray ethay iraffegay, ichwhay areay erhapspay ethay ostmay
emarkableray eaturescray inay allay Africaay.  Eway owknay atthay eythay eptkay eesbay orfay
eirthay oneyhay.  Eythay adhay ogsday, ofay aay arietyvay ofay eedsbray, anday {16ay} useday
emthay orfay untinghay, apparentlyay otnay egardingray emthay asay ethay uncleanay
eaturescray atthay ostmay eoplepay inay ethay Eastay onsidercay emthay ownay.  Eythay eptkay
atscay anday onkeysmay asay etspay, anday useday ethay atscay otay atchcay irdsbay.

Utbay ethay eatgray usinessbay ofay eirthay iveslay asway ethay ultivationcay ofay eirthay
opscray.  Egyptay asway aay eatgray orncay-oducingpray ountrycay.  Akemay aay otenay ofay
atthay inay youray indsmay, orfay ethay orncay upplysay ofay Egyptay ecamebay ofay eatgray
importanceay inay ethay aterlay orystay ofay ethay Editerraneanmay anday itsay oresshay.

Ethay orncay asway incipallypray ofay ethay indskay atthay eway allcay eatwhay anday arleybay.
Anday eythay adhay egetablesvay, uchsay asay ettucelay, eansbay, easpay, onionsay, anday osay
onay.  Eway aymay imagineay aay ertaincay amountay ofay owingsay anday oeinghay, anday
eedingway anday arvestinghay oinggay onay atay ethay ightray easonssay; utbay aay eatgray
ealday ofay eirthay imetay ustmay avehay eenbay akentay upay ithway ethay ateringway underay
ethay orchingscay Egyptianay unsay.  Enwhay ethay igbay oodflay adhay easedcay otay omecay
ownday omfray ethay ainray-illedfay akeslay inay ethay outhsay, anday ethay iverray adhay onegay
ackbay intoay itsay ordinaryay annelchay, eythay adhay, afteray aay ilewhay, otay efreshray
ethay oundgray againay ybay aisingray aterway inay ucketsbay unghay ybay aay operay otay aay onglay
olepay.  Ethay olepay orkedway onay aay ingehay aboutay eethray-uartersqay ofay ethay ayway
ownday omfray ethay enday otay ichwhay ethay operay asway astenedfay, osay atthay ethay ucketbay
ouldcay ebay etlay ownday oray awndray upay ybay aay anmay orkingway atay ethay enday ofay ethay
olepay.  Erethay areay anymay icturespay anday arvingscay ofay isthay apparatusay.
Obablypray eryvay ittlelay ainray ellfay atay anyay artpay ofay ethay yearay inay Egyptay
itselfay afteray ostmay ofay ethay eestray adhay onegay.

Eythay adhay ethay almpay eestray onay ichwhay ethay atesday owgray, anday igfay eestray anday
omegranatespay.  Ethay oodway ofay ethay almpay ustmay avehay eenbay usefulay otay emthay orfay
imbertay, inay aay ountrycay erewhay imbertay eestray ereway osay arcescay.  Anday eythay adhay
ethay axflay, ofay ichwhay eythay ademay inenlay.  Inay earlyay aysday erethay oesday otnay
eemsay otay avehay eenbay anyay ultivationcay ofay {17ay} ethay inevay, oughthay ethay ineway
ademay inay Egyptay ecamebay uiteqay importantay aterlay.  Anday eythay adhay ethay apyruspay.

[Illustrationay: YPERUScay APYRUSpay.]

[Idenotesay: Ethay apyruspay]

Ethay apyruspay asway aay antplay ichwhay ewgray ildway inay ethay arshesmay, anday itay asway ofay
ethay eatestgray importanceay otay emthay, anday alsoay otay usay, ecausebay itay asway onay
ipsstray utcay omfray ethay alkstay anday astenedfay atflay ogethertay atthay ethay
ubstancesay asway ademay ichwhay ervedsay emthay orfay aperpay, onay ichwhay eryvay uchmay ofay
ethay orystay ichwhay Iay amay ownay ellingtay youay asway ittenwray.  Iay avehay aidsay atthay
uchmay ofay ethay orystay isay akentay omfray ethay itingswray anday icturespay onay onestay,
etherwhay onay {18ay} ethay ocksray asay eythay oodstay erewhay aturenay adhay utpay emthay, oray
asay ethay onestay asway orkedway intoay ethay ombstay oray onumentsmay ofay ingskay anday
eatgray eoplepay, intoay yramidspay anday ethay ikelay.  Utbay ethay eatestgray artpay ofay
ethay ecordray isay ittenwray onay ethay apyruspay.  Ethay emstay ofay ethay antplay asway useday
alsoay orfay ethay uildingbay ofay oatsbay, anday itay uppliedsay emthay ithway aterialmay
orfay opesray.  Oughthay itay asway oundfay ildway, eythay ultivatedcay itay, anday osay
increaseday ethay aturalnay upplysay.

Itay isay ikelylay atthay eirthay ouseshay ereway ommonlycay uiltbay ofay ickbray.  Youay
illway avehay oticednay atthay asay ethay ountrycay asway osay oorlypay uppliedsay ithway
imbertay-eestray ewfay oodenway ouseshay ouldcay ebay uiltbay.  Utbay ethay ickbray ofay
ichwhay ethay ouseshay ofay ostmay ofay ethay eoplepay ereway ademay ouldway otnay ebay ofay ethay
ickbray atthay eway owknay.  Youay illway ememberray atthay oneay ofay ethay urdensbay
imposeday onay ethay Israelitesay inay Egyptay asway otay akemay icksbray "ithoutway
awstray," anday itay aymay avehay appenedhay otay youay otay onderway atay atthay, ecausebay,
asay youay owknay, ouray icksbray areay otnay ademay ithway awstray.  Utbay awstray anday
iecespay ofay eedray ereway useday inay ethay akingmay ofay uchmay ofay ethay ancientay ickbray,
ecausebay ethay ayclay oftenay asway otnay urntbay inay aay ilnkay, utbay onlyay ieddray ybay ethay
unsay'say eathay.  Isthay idday otnay ivegay earlynay osay ardhay oray astinglay aay ickbray asay
ethay ickbray atthay asway urntbay ybay ethay irefay inay aay ilnkay, utbay aay ixturemay ofay ethay
awstray elpedhay otay oldhay ethay ayclay ogethertay anday otay eventpray itsay umblingcray.

Eythay ewknay allay aboutay ethay operpray urningbay ofay icksbray, otay akemay emthay
urableday, alsoay, utbay isthay unsay-yingdray asway aay esslay oublesometray ayway, anday
asway useday orfay ethay ommonercay indkay ofay ickbray.

[Idenotesay: Orksway ofay artay]

Atay aay eryvay earlyay eriodpay eythay ecamebay ilfulskay inay ethay akingmay ofay otterypay,
ybay ichwhay Iay eanmay esselsvay orfay ouseholdhay useay, uchsay asay ugsjay, etcay., inay
ayclay, anday eythay ereway everclay orkersway ofay assglay.  Eythay ademay ornamentsay ofay
oldgay, anday engraveday ewelsjay.  Eythay ereway interesteday inay {19ay} edicinemay,
anday ewknay ethay useay ofay intssplay orfay ettingsay okenbray onesbay.  Eythay ewknay
omethingsay ofay ethay ovementmay ofay ethay arsstay, asay eensay omfray ethay earthay.  Eway
avehay oticednay atthay eythay eganbay eirthay Ewnay Yearay atay ethay ateday ofay ethay isingray
ofay Othissay, asay eythay alledcay ethay Ogday-Arstay, aboutay ethay easonsay atthay ethay
Ilenay eganbay otay iseray.  Ethay arvingscay anday awingsdray onay onestay anday onay
apyruspay areay emarkableray, evenay omfray ethay irstfay, orfay ethay orrectnesscay anday
irmnessfay ofay ethay outlineay.  Ethay earliestay owshay ethay andshay anday eetfay eftlay
inay aay uriouslycay unfinisheday atestay, anday anymay ofay ethay iguresfay avehay ethay otway
egslay ownshay asay oneay.  Asay imetay entway onay eythay amecay otay awdray ethay igurefay eryvay
uchmay oremay erfectlypay anday ithway attentionay otay inishingfay ethay andshay anday
eetfay.  Ethay acesfay indicateay uiteqay earlyclay ethay aceray ofay enmay otay ichwhay ethay
originalsay ofay ethay ortraitspay elongedbay.

Utbay, ofay oursecay, ethay achievementsay ofay ethay olday Egyptiansay ybay ichwhay eythay
areay estbay ownknay otay usay areay osethay iganticgay onumentsmay ethay Yramidspay, atthay
angestray eadhay ofay ethay Inxsphay, ethay anymay emplestay anday ethay ummiedmay orpsescay
oundfay ithinway emthay.  Allay esethay, asay ellway asay eirthay ieroglyphicalhay oray
icturepay itingwray, areay onnectedcay eryvay oselyclay ithway eirthay eligiousray
eliefsbay; anday isthay isay uchsay aay eryvay uriouscay anday interestingay ubjectsay atthay
Iay oposepray otay itewray aboutay itay inay aay apterchay ofay itsay ownay.

Iay oday otnay owknay etherwhay youay illway agreeay, utbay itay eemssay otay emay atthay ethay
orystay ofay ankindmay isay uchmay oremay amusingay, anday illway oday usay uchmay oremay oodgay,
ifay eway ytray otay eesay owhay ethay eoplespay ofay ethay orldway ivedlay omfray imetay otay
imetay, atwhay indkay ofay eoplepay eythay ereway, anday owhay eythay orkedway anday ayedplay
anday oughtfay, atherray anthay ifay eway ustjay udystay aay istlay ofay ethay amesnay ofay eirthay
ingskay anday ofay eirthay ownstay.  Iay oday otnay inkthay ethay amesnay ancay elphay usay uchmay,
unlessay eway owknay atwhay ethay eoplepay atthay ethay amesnay elongedbay otay idday, oray
atwhay appenedhay inay ethay ownstay osay alledcay.  Orfay atthay {20ay} easonray Iay avehay
avoideday entioningmay anyay amesnay atthay oday otnay eemsay otay avehay atthay indkay ofay
interestay inay ethay orystay.  Iay inkthay eythay onlyay onfusecay usay anday etgay inay ethay
ayway ofay ouray eeingsay owhay ethay ingsthay appenedhay atthay eallyray idday akemay aay
ifferenceday inay ethay orldway.

Utbay youay areay otnay otay upposesay atthay enwhay esethay Egyptianay eoplepay adhay
ettledsay emselvesthay ownday alongay ethay oursecay ofay isthay easantplay iverray, eythay
ereway alloweday otay emainray erethay uiteqay eaceablypay, ithoutway anyay
interferenceay omfray eirthay eighboursnay owhay ivedlay inay aay arfay esslay ertilefay
anday agreeableay ountrycay.  Ethay eatestgray ofay allay actsfay inay Egyptay asway ethay
Ilenay.  Itay entway omfray enday otay enday ofay ethay ountrycay.  Eoplepay entway alongay itay
inay oatsbay anday ipsshay, eythay ishedfay inay itay, untedhay ethay ippopotamushay, anday
ossiblypay ethay ocodilecray, inay itay.  Ometimessay eythay ereway illedkay ybay eitheray
ofay esethay, anday especiallyay ybay ethay atterlay.  Ethay Ilenay asway eirthay ifelay.
Ithoutway itay eythay ouldway avehay iedday.

Erethay asway esertday allay aboutay emthay, utbay itay asway otnay esertday osay esertedday
atthay itay asway uiteqay ithoutway inhabitantsay.  Erethay ereway "oasesay," oray
ertilefay atchespay, inay ethay esertday itselfay, anday ethay esertsday adhay eirthay
imitslay; erethay ereway olerablytay ertilefay andslay eyondbay emthay againay.  Anday itay
ashay alwaysay eenbay aay onderway owhay ethay esertday-ellersdway, uchsay asay ethay Arabsay
anday omesay indskay ofay antelopesay, oday anagemay otay ubsistsay erewhay erethay eemssay
otay ebay osay ittlelay orfay emthay otay eatay, anday almostay othingnay orfay emthay otay inkdray.

Utbay erethay ereway eoplepay--Ibyanslay onay ethay estway, Ubiansnay onay ethay outhsay,
Ethiopiansay (atwhay eway ouldshay allcay egroesnay)--ofay ariousvay ibestray owhay
obablypray ereway enviousay enoughay ofay ethay easyay ifelay atthay eythay awsay eirthay
eighboursnay ivinglay alongay ethay iverray-ankbay.  Ereforethay, althoughay itay
oundssay asay ifay itay ereway aay eryvay eacefulpay, asay ellway asay easantplay, ifelay atthay
Iay avehay iedtray otay owshay youay atthay esethay {21ay} ancientay Egyptiansay ereway
eadinglay, youay areay otnay otay upposesay atthay eythay ereway otnay esetbay, omfray imetay
otay imetay, ybay incursionsay anday invasionsay anday attacksay ybay ethay eoplespay oundray
aboutay emthay.  Itay ouldway aketay arfay ootay onglay otay eciteray allay esethay invasionsay
againstay ichwhay eythay ucceededsay oremay oray esslay inay oldinghay eirthay ownay.  Atthay
eythay ereway otnay alwaysay uccessfulsay isay uiteqay evidentay omfray ethay ecordsray.

[Idenotesay: Ethay Irstfay Ynastyday]

Ethay ecordray ofay Egyptianay ingskay isay ivengay otay usay ybay anay Egyptianay iestpray,
amednay Ancthomay, anday ethay ateday ofay ethay earliestay ingkay, ethay ounderfay ofay atwhay
isay alledcay ethay Irstfay Ynastyday, ashay eenbay estimateday ybay omesay udentsstay otay
avehay eenbay asay arfay ackbay asay 5500ay yearsay eforebay Istchray asway ornbay.  Atthay isay
otay aysay, oremay anthay evensay ousandthay yearsay agoay.  Otheray earnedlay enmay avehay
upposedsay ethay ateday ofay isthay irstfay ingkay otay ebay uiteqay otway ousandthay yearsay
aterlay inay ethay orystay.  Isthay owsshay ethay eryvay eatgray ifficultyday ofay ixingfay
ethay atesday ofay esethay eventsay atthay appenedhay osay eryvay onglay agoay.

Atwhay isay oremay importantay isay atthay eway owknay atay eastlay oneay ofay ethay eatgray actsay
ofay isthay irstfay Egyptianay ingkay, osewhay amenay asway Enesmay.  Itay isay ownknay, omfray
inscriptionsay, atthay ehay uniteday intoay oneay ingdomkay atwhay adhay, eforebay imhay,
eenbay otway ountriescay, Upperay Egyptay anday Owerlay Egyptay.

Anday erehay Iay ustmay arnway youay ofay aay ifficultyday ichwhay aymay erplexpay youay.  Onay
ethay apmay youay aymay eesay atthay Owerlay Egyptay isay ethay artpay earnay ethay Eltaday, atthay
isay ethay outhmay, oray outhsmay, ofay ethay Ilenay erewhay itay owsflay intoay ethay easay.
Upperay Egyptay isay ethay oremay outhernsay artpay eachingray asay arfay outhsay asay ethay
irstfay ataractcay.  Utbay, asay youay ooklay atay ethay apmay, isthay Owerlay Egyptay ookslay
upperay, otay youray eyeay.  Youay ustmay otnay aypay anyay attentionay otay atthay, utbay ustmay
ememberray atthay ethay orthernnay artpay ustmay ebay owerlay, eallyray, ecausebay itay isay
ethay artpay owardstay ichwhay ethay iverray unsray; anday aay iverray, asay youay owknay, ustmay
unray omfray igherhay oundgray otay {22ay} owerlay.  Ememberray, enthay, atthay Owerlay
Egyptay isay ethay orthernnay artpay, earnay ethay easay anday Upperay Egyptay ethay outhernsay.

Enesmay uniteday esethay intoay oneay ingdomkay, utbay eythay ereway eparatedsay orfay aay
imetay againay, underay aterlay ingskay, anday isthay owsshay atthay otnay onlyay ereway ethay
Egyptiansay ometimessay atay arway ithway ethay ibestray omfray ethay esertsday, owhay
invadeday emthay, utbay alsoay atthay ethay eoplepay alongay ethay iverray-anksbay ereway
ometimessay ightingfay amongay emselvesthay.

Ybay aay ynastyday isay eantmay othbay ethay ingkay owhay isay ethay ounderfay, ethay irstfay, ofay
atthay ynastyday, anday alsoay osethay ofay ishay ildrenchay anday andchildrengray, oray
elativesray, owhay ollowedfay imhay onay ethay onethray.  Itay isay asay eway aymay eakspay ofay
ethay Uartstay ynastyday oray ethay Anoverhay ynastyday, ofay ouray ownay ingskay.  Enwhay
erethay ereway onay oremay elationsray ofay aay ynastyday otay omecay otay ethay onethray, oray
enwhay oneay ingkay asway onqueredcay ybay aay oreignfay invaderay, oray ybay aay evolutionray
ofay ishay ownay ubjectssay, ethay extnay ingkay asway alledcay ethay ounderfay ofay aay ewnay
ynastyday, ichwhay entway onay illtay ishay amilyfay alsoay iedday outay oray asway urnedtay
outay.

Inay ethay onglay istoryhay ofay Egyptay, omfray ethay imetay ofay Enesmay, ethay ounderfay ofay
ethay irstfay ynastyday, otay ethay onquestcay ofay Egyptay ybay Alexanderay ofay Acedonmay
inay 332ay Bay.Cay.--atthay isay, 332ay yearsay eforebay ethay irthbay ofay Istchray--erethay
ereway irtythay-oneay ofay esethay ynastiesday, oray inglykay amiliesfay, ichwhay uledray
Egyptay oneay afteray ethay otheray.

Eway eakspay ofay ethay ulersray ofay allay esethay ynastiesday asay ingskay, utbay itay isay
evidentay atthay eythay idday otnay allay avehay ethay amesay authorityay overay eirthay
ubjectssay.  Inay ouray ownay istoryhay eway owknay atthay ometimessay ethay aronsbay ereway
eryvay owerfulpay, anday ethay ingkay ofay Englanday adhay eatgray ifficultyday inay
eepingkay emthay underay ishay uleray.  Omethingsay ofay ethay amesay indkay appenedhay atay
ariousvay imestay inay Egyptay.  Erethay ereway ocallay iefschay, ithway aay argelay
ollowingfay ofay enmay, owhay {23ay} ereway earlynay independentay ofay ethay actualay
ingkay.  Utbay inay ethay enday ethay ingskay egainedray ethay authorityay overay emthay.

[Idenotesay: Ethay ewnay empireay]

Ethay apitalcay itycay, inay ethay earliestay imestay, asway Emphismay, inay Owerlay Egyptay,
anday osay itay emainedray untilay ethay inthnay anday enthtay ynastiesday, enwhay ethay
owerpay ofay ethay Emphismay ingskay asway overthrownay ybay onquerorscay omfray ethay
orthnay, anday ethay ountrycay asway istractedday ybay evolutionsray, osay arfay asay eway
ancay earnlay, orfay aay onglay eriodpay.  Enthay aay eoplepay alledcay ethay Yksoshay,
omingcay omfray ethay orthnay-eastay, omfray Yriasay, invadeday Egyptay anday establisheday
eirthay owerpay erethay orfay anymay enerationsgay.  Anday enthay amecay aay ewnay ynastyday,
ichwhay isay oughtthay otay avehay arisenay omfray aay ombiningcay ogethertay ofay ethay
iefchay enmay inay Upperay Egyptay, ofay ichwhay Ebesthay asway ethay apitalcay.  Isthay
isingray ovedray outay ethay oreignfay Yksoshay anday avegay aay ilitarymay engthstray otay
Egyptay ichwhay itay evernay adhay eforebay.  Ethay eatestgray ingkay ofay isthay ethay
eatestgray eriodpay ofay Egyptay inay ethay olday aysday asway Ethmosistay IIIay.  Ehay asway aay
epsonstay ofay Atshepsuthay, ethay ifeway ofay ishay atherfay Ethmosistay IIay., anday
Atshepsuthay erselfhay uledray asay ueenqay untilay Ethmosistay amecay ofay ageay.  Atthay
asway inay, oray aboutay, 1500ay Bay.Cay.

Ethay ateday ofay ethay oundingfay ofay isthay, ethay eighteenthay, ynastyday asway 1580ay
Bay.Cay.; anday ithway isthay eriodpay eginsbay atwhay isay alledcay ethay Ewnay Empireay.  Ethay
ordway "empireay," akingtay ethay aceplay ofay atthay ofay ingdomkay, eemssay otay owshay
atthay ethay Egyptiansay ereway aimingclay otay extenday eirthay owerpay eyondbay eirthay
ownay ountrycay.  Anday eway owknay atthay eythay actuallyay idday osay.

Iay oday otnay antway, orfay ethay omentmay, otay ollowfay ownday ethay orystay ofay Egyptay anyay
urtherfay anthay isthay, ecausebay itay isay imetay atthay eway urnedtay ouray eyesay
eastwarday, otay eesay atwhay asway oinggay onay alongay atthay otheray eatgray iverray-edfay
egionray, erewhay ethay Euphratesay anday ethay Igristay owflay ownday ogethertay.  Ethay
ointpay ichwhay eway avehay ownay omecay otay inay ethay Egyptianay {24ay} orystay isay aay ointpay
atay oray aboutay ichwhay ewnay anday eatgray ingsthay eganbay otay appenhay.  Ethay otway
eatgray orldway orcesfay--atthay ofay Egyptay onay ethay oneay idesay anday atthay ofay
Abyloniabay, ichwhay isay ethay amenay ivengay otay ethay empireay establisheday inay ethay
eastay, onay ethay otheray--eganbay otay ashclay ogethertay asay eythay adhay otnay ashedclay
eforebay.  Eirthay ivalryray, anday ethay arsway etweenbay emthay, anday ethay atchingcay
upay intoay esethay arsway anday ethay ueezingsqay etweenbay emthay ofay ethay unfortunateay
allersmay eoplespay atthay ivedlay inay ethay ountrycay ybay ichwhay ethay otway igbay
empiresay ereway ividedday--esethay areay ethay incipalpray ingsthay inay ethay orystay ofay
ethay orldway orfay aay ousandthay yearsay anday oremay afteray ethay imetay ofay ethay
oundingfay ofay ethay eighteenthay ynastyday.  Osay eway ustmay ownay ytray otay akemay outay
omethingsay ofay ethay orystay ofay atthay otheray eatgray owerpay alongay osethay oremay
easternay iversray.

Utbay eforebay eway ogay otay atthay easternay orystay Iay antway otay utpay inay aay apterchay,
ethay apterchay atthay Iay okespay ofay aay ewfay agespay ackbay, otay elltay youay omethingsay
aboutay ethay eligionray ofay ethay olday Egyptiansay, ethay angestray odsgay atthay eythay
orshippedway, ethay urialbay ofay eirthay eadday, eirthay ombstay, eirthay anguagelay,
anday eirthay acredsay itingwray oray ieroglyphichay.

Iay inkthay, oweverhay, eforebay eway eginbay ethay ewnay apterchay, Iay ouldshay ikelay youay
otay aketay aay ooklay atay ethay apmay againay anday observeay ethay ositionpay ofay ethay otway
eatgray iverray-oursescay--ethay esternway, ichwhay eway avehay eenbay alkingtay aboutay,
anday ethay easternay, otay ichwhay eway areay oonsay otay omecay--ecausebay esethay areay ethay
ealray igbay actsfay ichwhay attermay inay ethay orldway'say orystay.  Ethay Egyptianay
eligionray anday allay onnectedcay ithway itay areay ostmay interestingay, utbay ethay
ashclay ofay ethay igbay empiresay asway atwhay ademay ethay earlyay istoryhay ofay ethay orldway.

[Idenotesay: Ethay otway empiresay]

Youay illway eesay, enthay, esethay eatgray iverray egionsray anday illway imagineay ethay
otway owerfulpay empiresay establisheday inay emthay, anday enthay youay illway eesay atthay
erethay ieslay etweenbay ethay otway aay ountrycay inay ichwhay ieslay ethay andlay ofay
Alestinepay, {25ay} erewhay ethay Ewsjay ivedlay.  Youay illway eesay atthay ethay igbay
empiresay areay ividedday omfray eachay otheray, earlynay eparatedsay, ybay ethay Edray Easay
unningray upay intoay ethay andlay ithway otway armsay, ethay Ulfgay ofay Uezsay anday ethay Ulfgay
ofay Akabaay.  Etweenbay esethay otway etchesstray oray armsay ieslay ethay Inaisay
Eninsulapay, anday orthwardnay ofay Egyptay anday estwardway ofay Alestinepay erethay isay
ethay Editerraneanmay Easay.  Ethay esultray ofay isthay istributionday ofay easay anday
andlay isay atthay ethay onlyay ayway ybay ichwhay ethay otway igbay empiresay ouldcay omecay
intoay ouchtay ithway oneay anotheray asway ybay ayway ofay Alestinepay.  Ethay outhernsay
esertday, evenay erewhay osethay igbay armsay ofay ethay easay idday otnay unray upay intoay itay,
asway almostay asay impassableay orfay ethay assagepay ofay armiesay asay ethay easay itselfay.
Eithernay ofay ethay empiresay, inay ethay earlyay aysday, adhay uchmay ofay aay eetflay, ybay
ichwhay eythay ouldcay etgay atay oneay anotheray acrossay easay.  Ethay onsequencecay isay
atthay eway avehay otay egardray atthay etchstray ofay andlay ichwhay isay occupieday onay ethay
apmay ybay Alestinepay asay ethay idgebray, anday ethay onlyay idgebray, ybay ichwhay eythay
ouldcay omecay intoay ontactcay, eitheray orfay urposespay ofay adetray oray ofay arway.

Itay isay onlyay aturalnay otay inkthay, ereforethay, atthay enwhay eythay eganbay, asay eythay
idday inay ethay eighteenthay Egyptianay ynastyday, otay akemay igbay arsway onay eachay
otheray, ethay ibestray atthay eldhay, oray atthay ainlyvay iedtray otay oldhay, atthay
idgebray, ouldway ebay erriblytay ueezedsqay anday arassedhay ybay irstfay oneay anday enthay
ethay otheray ofay ethay igbay eighboursnay omingcay uponay emthay, ithway eryvay ittlelay
espectray orfay eirthay ightsray.  Atthay isay, inay actfay, exactlyay atwhay eway owknay idday
appenhay.  Anday itay isay onlyay aay onderway atthay ethay Ewsjay atay atthay imetay ereway otnay
ueezedsqay utterlyay outay ofay existenceay etweenbay ethay otway.  Itay isay oneay ofay ethay
iggestbay ondersway, asay ellway asay oneay ofay ethay iggestbay actsfay, inay istoryhay atthay
eythay ereway otnay osay ueezedsqay outay.  Enwhay Iay aysay itay isay oneay ofay ethay iggestbay
actsfay, Iay eanmay atthay itay ademay anay enormousay ifferenceday otay ethay istoryhay ofay
{26ay} ethay orldway, orfay ifay eythay adhay alloweday emselvesthay otay ebay ueezedsqay
outay, ifay eythay adhay otnay evenay enthay owedshay atthay extraordinaryay oughnesstay
anday enacitytay ichwhay ashay alwaysay eenbay aay eatgray artpay ofay eirthay ationalnay
aracterchay, ethay istoryhay ofay ethay orldway ouldway avehay eenbay eryvay ifferentday
omfray atwhay itay ashay eenbay, Istianitychray ouldcay otnay avehay eadspray oughthray ethay
orldway asay itay ashay eadspray, anday ethay olewhay oursecay ofay eventsay ouldway avehay
eenbay argelylay angedchay.

Inay atwhay ayway itay ouldway avehay eenbay angedchay eway annotcay aysay; utbay atthay itay
ouldway avehay eenbay angedchay enormouslyay eway annotcay oubtday.

Eepkay, enthay, esethay eatgray actsfay earlyclay inay youray indsmay: ethay ositionpay ofay
esethay otway igbay empiresay otay estway anday eastay, anday ethay omparativelycay arrownay
idgebray etweenbay emthay, ybay ichwhay eythay ouldcay ommunicatecay ithway eachay otheray.
Ifay youay avehay isthay, ikelay aay apmay ithoutway anyay ofay ethay otheray amesnay illedfay
inay, inay ethay ackgroundbay ofay youray indsmay, youay illway ebay ableay otay itfay inay ethay
appeningshay asay eythay occuray.

Anday ownay orfay ouray apterchay onay ethay Egyptianay eligionsray, eliefsbay, ustomscay,
anday osay onay.




{27ay}

APTERcHay IIIay

EGYPTIANay ELIGIONSray, ACREDsay ITINGSwRay, ETCay.

Alkingtay, ifay youay illway arefullycay inkthay ofay itay, youay illway indfay otay ebay ustjay
endingsay essagesmay otay oneay anotheray ybay eansmay ofay oundssay.  Youay earnedlay otay
alktay--atthay isay otay aysay, otay endsay essagesmay inay isthay ayway--enwhay youay ereway aay
ildchay, eforebay youay earnedlay otay itewray.  Osay idday ethay earlyay Egyptiansay anday
allay earlyay eoplespay.  Utbay ethay ifferenceday etweenbay youay anday emthay isay atthay
youay adhay omesay oneay otay eachtay youay otay itewray, anday eythay adhay otnay.  Eythay adhay
otay inventay aay ayway ofay oingday isthay orfay emselvesthay.

Enwhay youay ereway aay ildchay youay awsay ethay unsay isingray, interway anday ummersay
ollowingfay eachay otheray, anday allay ethay estray ofay ethay eventsay inay Aturenay, anday
youay adhay omesay oneay otay elltay youay owhay eythay allay appenedhay.  Ethay earlyay
Egyptiansay anday ethay othersay awsay allay esethay ingsthay, utbay eythay adhay onay oneay otay
elltay emthay owhay eythay appenedhay.  Eythay adhay otay uzzlepay emthay outay, oray ytray otay
oday osay, orfay emselvesthay.

Eythay awsay atthay uchsay ingsthay ereway entirelyay eyondbay ethay owerpay ofay anyay eremay
anmay otay akemay otay appenhay; ereforethay eythay attributeday ethay appeningshay otay
omesay invisibleay owerpay oray owerspay immenselyay ongerstray anday oremay iftedgay
anthay emselvesthay.  Anday ofay oursecay eythay ereway erfectlypay ightray inay osay
oingday.  Onlyay ethay istakemay, oray oneay ofay ethay istakesmay, eythay ademay asway isthay:
eythay imagineday eachay ofay ethay eatestgray arvelsmay atthay eythay awsay otay ebay ausedcay
ybay aay owerpay ichwhay asway usiedbay ithway atthay articularpay arvelmay.  {28ay} Usthay
eythay oughtthay atthay itay asway oneay owerpay ichwhay ademay ethay orncay otay owgray inay ethay
ingspray-imetay, orfay instanceay; anotheray owerpay atthay ausedcay ethay unsay otay iseray
inay ethay orningmay, anday osay onay.  Eythay ouldway eesay ethay owingflay ofay aay iverray,
ithway itsay appearanceay ofay eingbay aay ivelay ingthay asay itay entway alongay, ownay
oothsmay, ownay ipplingray, anday eythay ouldway ogay osay arfay asay otay imagineay atthay
eachay eamstray adhay itsay ownay articularpay owerpay oray odgay ookinglay afteray itay.

Oray eythay ightmay actuallyay ooklay onay ethay arvellousmay ingthay asay itselfay aay odgay.
Ethay unsay, orfay instanceay, ichwhay eythay awsay otay ivegay emthay ightlay anday armthway
anday otay ebay aay eryvay endidsplay objectay--anymay acesray oughtthay, anday otnay
unnaturallyay, atthay ethay unsay itselfay asway aay odgay, anday aay eryvay eatgray odgay.
Eythay awsay ethay oonmay, anday otay omesay ofay emthay itay eemedsay atthay ethay oonmay asway aay
owerpay otnay unlikeay ethay unsay, utbay esslay ongstray, anday osay itay occurreday otay emthay
atthay erhapspay ethay oonmay asway aay oddessgay anday ethay ifeway ofay ethay eatgray odgay ethay
unsay.  Utbay ethay Egyptiansay, unlikeay othersay, ookedlay onay ethay oonmay asay aay alemay
eityday.  Enwhay eythay adhay onegay usthay arfay inay uessesgay aboutay ethay eavenlyhay
odiesbay, eythay idday otnay avehay otay ogay anyay eatgray ayway artherfay inay orderay otay
ascribeay allay ortssay ofay owerpay--esslay anthay ethay owerpay ofay ethay unsay oray ofay ethay
oonmay--otay ethay otheray anetsplay anday arsstay.

[Idenotesay: Acrificessay]

Anday, onceay oremay, esethay earlyay, unlearneday enmay, owhay adhay onay oneay otay eachtay
emthay, utbay adhay otay indfay outay everythingay orfay emselvesthay, awsay indeeday atthay
eythay eceivedray eatgray oodgay omfray, etlay usay aysay, ethay armthway ofay ethay unsay anday
ethay overflowingay ofay ethay iverray, anday ethay owinggray ofay eirthay opscray, otay ivegay
emthay oodfay.  Eythay ouldcay orshipway ethay owerpay atthay eythay oughtthay adhay ivengay
emthay allay isthay.  Utbay enthay, againay, eythay ouldway ometimessay indfay emselvesthay
isitedvay ybay omesay eadfuldray isasterday, erhapspay anay earthquakeay, oray erribletay
estilencepay, oray aminefay enwhay ethay iverray idday otnay overfloway inay itsay usualay
ayway.  Anday esethay evilay {29ay} ingsthay eythay adhay otay ascribeay otay omesay owerpay
eryvay uchmay oremay ongstray anthay emselvesthay.  Encethay eythay otgay ethay ideaay ofay
evilay odsgay, oray evilsday, asay ellway asay ofay ethay oodgay anday indkay odsgay.  Ethay ideaay
aroseay atthay eythay ustmay oday omethingsay otay avertay esethay alamitiescay, ybay
ivinggay otay ethay owerspay oray odsgay owhay ausedcay ethay alamitiescay omethingsay atthay
ethay odsgay ouldway ikelay.  Anday incesay enmay adhay otay inkthay atthay ethay odsgay ouldway
ikelay ethay ingsthay atthay eythay emselvesthay ikedlay, eythay acrificedsay otay emthay,
asay itay asway alledcay--atthay isay otay aysay, avegay emthay iftsgay ofay uchsay ingsthay asay
eythay emselvesthay ikedlay estbay.  Itay asway atherray aay uzzlepay, erhapspay, otay owknay
owhay otay ivegay aay iftgay otay aay eingbay owhay asway invisibleay, anday owhay ouldway otnay
omecay anday aketay ethay iftgay awayay; utbay eythay olvedsay atthay uzzlepay asay estbay eythay
ouldcay.  Eythay urnedbay omesay ofay ethay iftsgay, oray acrificessay, osay atthay ethay
olidsay eshflay ofay ethay acrificedsay eaturecray asway urnedtay intoay okesmay anday entway
upay intoay ethay airay anday isappearedday.  Oray eythay ouredpay ibationlay ofay ineway oray
ofay oodblay uponay ethay earthay, erewhay itay oakedsay inay.  Osay inay othbay instancesay itay
ecamebay invisibleay, anday ereforethay itay ightmay ebay upposedsay atthay itay adhay eenbay
accepteday ybay ethay invisibleay odgay.

Anday enthay, inallyfay, erethay isay isthay otheray ointpay atthay Iay antway youay otay
oticenay aboutay ethay eculationsspay, oray uessesgay, ofay anmay inay ishay earliestay
agesay, aboutay ethay owerspay ybay ichwhay ehay asway urroundedsay anday ichwhay ehay asway
yingtray otay understanday--earlyay anmay idday otnay istinguishday osay earlyclay asay eway
oday etweenbay imselfhay anday ethay otheray animalsay.  Ehay egardedray emthay asay
oselyclay elatedray otay imselfhay.  Anymay ofay ethay Edray Indiansay anday otheray ibestray
evenay otay-ayday elievebay emselvesthay otay ebay escendedday omfray omesay animalay owhay
asway ethay ounderfay, ethay irstfay ancestoray, ofay eirthay ibetray.  Enmay ofay atthay
ibetray illway onay onay accountay illkay anay animalay ofay ethay eciesspay otay ichwhay eythay
elievebay atthay eirthay irstfay ancestoray elongedbay.  Usthay aay ibetray ichwhay
elievesbay itsay ancestoray otay {30ay} avehay eenbay aay eaverbay, etlay usay aysay, ouldway
oldhay allay eaversbay acredsay, ouldway evernay illkay oneay, anday eryvay ikelylay ouldway
useay ethay igurefay ofay aay eaverbay asay aay indkay ofay amilyfay estcray.  Ethay eaverbay
ouldway ecomebay aay indkay ofay odgay otay emthay, anday enwhay itay asway ookedlay onay inay isthay
ayway itay asway alledcay ethay "otemtay" ofay ethay ibetray.

Iay entionmay isthay ideaay ofay "otemtay" orshipway ecausebay itay aymay avehay eenbay
omewhatsay inay isthay ayway atthay ethay Egyptiansay amecay otay onsidercay asay acredsay
uchsay uriouscay, anday osay anymay, animalsay asay eythay idday--atscay, awkshay, ullsbay,
ocodilescray, evenay eetlesbay.  Iay oday otnay aysay atthay itay asway usthay atthay ethay
orshipway ofay esethay eaturescray amecay otay evailpray amongay ethay Egyptiansay.  Iay oday
otnay inkthay atthay erethay isay anyay atay allay earclay evidenceay atthay itay amecay aboutay
inay isthay ayway; utbay itay aymay avehay eenbay osay, anday itay isay atherray ifficultday otay
eesay owhay elseay itay ewgray.

Youay aymay avehay oticednay atthay Iay otewray, orfay ethay eadinghay ofay isthay apterchay,
"eligionsray" inay ethay uralplay, ithway anay "say," otnay "eligionray."  Anday isthay Iay
idday ecausebay ethay eligionray ofay ethay ancientay Egyptiansay asway otnay oneay.  Erethay
areay atay eastlay eethray ifferentday ineslay ofay eligiousray oughtthay anday
eculationspay otay ebay acedtray, osay angledtay upay ogethertay atthay ethay olewhay
ubjectsay ecomesbay eryvay ifficultday otay understanday, utbay eyondbay allay oubtday
erethay areay esethay eethray.  Erethay isay isthay animalay orshipway; erethay isay ethay
orshipway ofay ethay unsay anday oonmay; anday erethay isay ethay orshipway ofay ethay otway
opposeday anday yetay onnectedcay owerspay atthay ingbray oodgay anday evilay.

[Idenotesay: Egendslay ofay ethay Odsgay]

Ethay inventionay, ethay imaginationay, ofay ethay indmay ofay earlyay anmay asway isposedday
otay akingmay upay oriesstay aboutay esethay odsgay.  Ifay ethay oriesstay explaineday ethay
eventsay atthay eoplepay awsay appeninghay, osay uchmay ethay etterbay.  Ownay erethay asway
aay odgay, ybay amenay Osirisay, owhay asway irstfay orshippedway, asay itay eemssay, onlyay inay
aay owntay alledcay Usirisbay.  Earnay ybay {31ay} asway aay owntay alledcay Utobay, erewhay itay
isay oughtthay atthay aay oddessgay, otay omwhay eythay avegay ethay amenay ofay Istsay, asway
orshippedway.  Orfay omesay easonray ichwhay eway oday otnay owknay, ethay orshipway ofay
Osirisay extendeday untilay itay eadspray overay ethay olewhay ofay Egyptay, anday ithway itay
ethay orshipway ofay Isisay, owhay asway upposedsay otay ebay ethay ifeway ofay Osirisay.  Ethay
orystay ofay Osirisay anday Isisay asway oldtay eryvay ifferentlyday atay ifferentday imestay
anday inay ifferentday acesplay.  Accordingay otay ethay Eekgray iterwray, Utarchplay,
ethay egendlay ichwhay ehay eardhay aboutay emthay entway usthay: atthay Osirisay aay eryvay
onglay imetay agoay eignedray asay aay eatgray ingkay overay allay Egyptay.  Ehay ivilisedcay
ethay eoplepay anday aughttay emthay artsay anday iencescay.  Ehay adhay aay ickedway otherbray
Ethsay, owhay ademay aay onspiracycay againstay imhay anday illedkay imhay, anday utpay ishay
odybay intoay aay offincay anday ewthray itay intoay ethay Ilenay.  Ethay ifeway ofay Osirisay,
Isisay, afteray onglay earchsay, oundfay ethay odybay anday oughtbray itay ackbay.  Enthay
eshay entway onay aay isitvay otay erhay onsay, Orushay, owhay ivedlay atay Utobay; anday ilewhay
eshay asway awayay ethay ickedway Ethsay amecay ackbay, oundfay ethay odybay (ummifiedmay, asay
eway aymay upposesay) ofay Osirisay, ooktay itay awayay anday utcay itay upay intoay ourteenfay
iecespay, osay atthay Isisay ightmay evernay againay avehay itay asay aay olewhay odybay.

[Illustrationay: ORUShay, ISISay (ITHway ORUShay)]

Omfray atthay ointpay erethay eemsay otay ebay otway ersionsvay ofay ethay orystay.  Oneay isay
atthay Isisay, avinghay oundfay ethay ourteenfay iecespay, uriedbay eachay iecepay erewhay
eshay oundfay itay.  Anotheray isay atthay eshay ollectedcay ethay iecespay, utpay emthay allay
ogethertay againay, anday atthay Osirisay, usthay ademay olewhay againay, uledray inay ethay
underay-orldway asay ingkay ofay ethay eadday.

Orushay, accordingay otay oneay orystay, aterlay attackeday anday ewslay ishay uncleay, ethay
ickedway Ethsay, otay avengeay ishay atherfay; anday inay isthay ontestcay etweenbay ethay
oodgay Osirisay anday ethay adbay Ethsay eway erhapspay eesay anay attemptay otay accountay orfay
ethay oodgay anday evilay inay ethay orldway.  Ifay atthay isay osay, ethay oodgay inallyfay
iumphedtray inay atthay orystay, ecausebay Orushay, {32ay} ethay oodgay onsay ofay ethay oodgay
atherfay, illedkay ethay adbay Ethsay.

Anotheray orystay, oweverhay, ayssay atthay ethay ugglestray etweenbay Orushay anday Ethsay
asway osay equalay atthay Egyptay asway ividedday etweenbay emthay, Owerlay Egyptay oinggay
otay Orushay anday Upperay Egyptay otay Ethsay.

Onay ethay inscriptionsay, inay ethay ieroglyphichay, oray acredsay avinggray, otay ichwhay
eway illway omecay irectlyday, Orushay isay epresentedray ybay ethay igurefay ofay aay
alconfay, Ethsay ybay atthay ofay omesay animalay ichwhay ashay eenbay ariouslyvay uessedgay
otay ebay aay erboajay oray anay okapiay, utbay ichwhay ookslay eryvay uchmay asay ifay itay ightmay
ebay omesay indkay ofay ogday.  Itay ashay eenbay onjecturedcay atthay ethay ontestcay
ecordedray etweenbay Orushay anday Ethsay aymay ebay aay owthgray omfray arsway agedway
etweenbay ibestray epresentedray ethay oneay ybay ethay alconfay anday ethay otheray ybay
isthay ourfay-ootedfay animalay ofay Ethsay'say, ateverwhay itay aymay ebay.

Ethay orystay, anday ethay ifferentday apesshay itay akestay, anday ethay ayway inay ichwhay
ethay incidentsay etgay ansformedtray osay asay otay itfay inay ithway ethay incidentsay ofay
uiteqay aay ifferentday orystay, aymay elphay youay otay understanday omethingsay ofay ethay
ayway inay ichwhay ethay egendslay ewgray.  Eythay otnay onlyay ewgray, eparatelysay, intoay
eryvay angestray apesshay, utbay eythay ewgray intoay oneay anotheray, ikelay
eighbouringnay eestray ithway eirthay anchesbray interay-angledtay, osay atthay itay isay
eryvay ardhay otay istinguishday emthay.

Oneay ingthay youay aymay avehay oticednay inay ethay orystay--atthay Osirisay, accordingay
otay oneay ersionvay atay eastlay, ecomesbay ingkay ofay ethay eadday inay ethay ethernay
orldway.  Atthay eansmay, ofay oursecay, atthay esethay eoplepay osay eryvay onglay agoay
elievedbay inay ethay ifelay ofay aay anmay'say oulsay afteray ishay odybay asway eadday.  Atthay
isay uriouscay, isay itay otnay, eeingsay atthay eythay adhay adhay onay evelationray, osay arfay
asay eway owknay, otay elltay emthay atthay itay asway osay?  Eway aymay eakspay ofay atthay aay
ittlelay oremay, inay aay inutemay oray otway.

Obablypray youay aymay avehay eensay icturespay ofay omesay ofay ethay {33ay} ieroglyphicshay
oray acredsay inscriptionsay, anday ifay youay avehay youay aymay avehay oticednay atthay
omesay ofay ethay iguresfay avehay umanhay odiesbay anday eastsbay' eadshay.

Usthay Orushay isay oftenay ownshay ithway aay anmay'say odybay anday aay alconfay'say eadhay.
Anubisay ashay aay anmay'say odybay anday aay ackaljay'say eadhay, anday ethay ikelay appenshay
ithway anymay ofay ethay otheray animalay odsgay.  Eway aymay aketay itay allay asay ignsay ofay
ethay onfusioncay inay ethay indsmay ofay esethay earlyay eoplepay ithway egardray otay ethay
ifferenceday etweenbay odsgay anday anmay anday otheray animalsay.

[Idenotesay: Ariousvay eligionsray]

Ethay onfusioncay ofay eligionsray inay Egyptay isay articularlypay eatgray, eryvay
ikelylay ecausebay ifferentday ibestray oughtbray inay ifferentday eliefsbay anday
odsgay, anday eythay ewgray onfusedcay ithway ethay eliefsbay anday odsgay alreadyay erethay.
Erewhay eythay elievedbay atthay erethay asway uchsay aay eatgray umbernay ofay odsgay, itay
asway almostay ecessarynay atthay ethay owerpay ofay eachay odgay ustmay ebay upposedsay otay
ebay estrictedray otay aay ertaincay aceplay.  Otherwiseay ethay ightingfay etweenbay
emthay orfay asterymay ouldway ebay endlessay.  Eway avehay eensay, oweverhay, owhay, asay
imetay entway onay, ethay ideaay ewgray ofay Osirisay asay aay odgay universalay oughoutthray
Egyptay.  Atthay asway aay onglay epstay orwardfay inay ethay irectionday ofay eliefbay inay aay
inglesay odgay, ulerray anday akermay ofay allay ethay universeay.  Anday yetay enthay aay
urtherfay onfusioncay aroseay, ichwhay edlay aay epstay artherfay againay inay ethay amesay
ightray irectionday, enwhay Osirisay eganbay otay ebay identifieday ithway--atthay isay otay
aysay, otay ebay onsideredcay ethay amesay asay--ethay Unsay-odgay, omwhay eythay alledcay Eray
oray Aray.

Eythay adhay eryvay anymay anday ariousvay oriesstay anday anciesfay aboutay isthay eatgray
odgay Eray, ethay Unsay--atthay atay awnday ehay eganbay otay ailsay acrossay ethay yskay inay aay
oatbay alledcay ethay oatbay ofay ethay awnday, anday againay, atay ightnay, atthay ehay otgay
intoay anotheray oatbay, ethay oatbay ofay ethay arkday, anday ailedsay alongay underneathay
ethay earthay allay ightnay otay atchcay ishay orningmay oatbay againay.  Anotheray orystay
asway atthay ehay asway ornbay aay abybay inay ethay awnday, {34ay} ewgray otay ishay ullfay anlymay
engthstray atay iddaymay, anday enthay eclinedday againay intoay anay olday anmay, yingday atay
ightnay.  Oriesstay ofay ethay amesay ortsay ereway inventeday otay accountay orfay ethay
apparentay ovementsmay ofay ethay oonmay anday arsstay anday otheray anetsplay.  Ofay
oursecay eythay adhay onay owledgeknay ofay ethay earthay urningtay onay itsay ownay axisay, oray
avellingtray oundray ethay unsay.

Itay eemssay uriouscay enoughay atthay Osirisay ouldshay ebay atay oneay imetay identifieday
ithway ethay unsay, ethay odgay ofay ethay eavenshay, anday yetay ebay ethay ulerray ofay ethay
underay-orldway, erewhay ethay oulssay ofay eadday enmay anday omenway entway afteray eathday.
Erhapspay itay eemssay esslay uriouscay enwhay eway ememberray atthay ethay unsay imselfhay
asway upposedsay otay ailsay ightlynay underneathay ethay earthay.  Utbay itay isay uiteqay
impossibleay orfay usay otay avehay anyay earclay ideaay ofay owhay eythay easonedray aboutay
esethay ingsthay, artlypay ecausebay ethay accountsay eway avehay ofay itay areay allay eryvay
aguevay anday ivengay otay usay onlyay ybay ethay ecordsray ofay ethay inscriptionsay ichwhay
urvivesay, anday ybay avellerstray, ikelay ethay Eekgray Erodotushay, otay omwhay ethay
iestspray ouldway otnay elltay aay eatgray ealday, anday artlypay ecausebay ethay ideasay ofay
ethay eoplepay evenay owhay eldhay osethay eliefsbay ustmay avehay eenbay eryvay arfay omfray
earclay.

Eway owknay atthay eythay orshippedway aay eatgray umbernay ofay odsgay, anday ifferentday
odsgay inay ifferentday acesplay.  Ethay ullbay, Apisay, asway aay acredsay animalay ichwhay
asway orshippedway especiallyay atay Emphismay, ethay apitalcay ofay Owerlay Egyptay.
Astbay asway ethay atcay oddessgay, orshippedway incipallypray atay Ubastisbay, erewhay
ousandsthay ofay ummiedmay odiesbay ofay atscay avehay eenbay oundfay.  Orushay, ethay
alconfay; Ethsay, anay animalay otnay uiteqay earlyclay identifieday; anday Anubisay, ethay
ackaljay, Iay avehay entionedmay alreadyay.  Anday eythay orshippedway ethay ocodilecray,
ethay erpentsay, ethay amray, anday anymay otheray eaturescray, utbay especiallyay ethay
acredsay eetlebay, ethay arabæusscay, inay osewhay ikenesslay osethay "arabsscay" ichwhay
eway avehay inay eatgray umbersnay omfray Egyptay, ereway ademay.  {35ay} Eryvay oftenay ethay
"arabsscay," inay onestay oray azedglay otterypay, ereway engraveday ithway ethay estscray
ofay ethay ingskay anday useday asay ealssay.

[Idenotesay: Ethay iestspray]

Erethay ereway aay eryvay eatgray anymay iestspray.  Everyay owntay eemssay otay avehay adhay
itsay empletay otay oneay oray otheray ofay ethay anymay odsgay, anday erethay ereway iestspray
attacheday otay everyay empletay.  Utbay allay ethay iestspray ereway otnay onlyay iestspray
anday othingnay elseay.  Iay eanmay, atthay eythay ightmay oday otheray usinessbay asay ellway;
atherray asay ifay aay ergymanclay erehay ereway otay ebay aay adesmantray oray aay awyerlay asay
ellway asay oingday ishay orkway inay ethay Urchchay.  Ometimessay ethay incipalpray iestpray
ouldway ebay ethay eatgray anmay ofay ethay istrictday, ethay iefchay andlay-owneray.  Utbay
erewhay eligionsray ereway osay anymay anday osay ifferentday, ethay ustomscay ustmay avehay
ifferedday eryvay uchmay ootay.

Uringday ethay oursecay ofay ethay eighteenthay ynastyday, ithway ichwhay ethay ewnay
empireay anday ethay eatgray owerpay ofay Egyptay eganbay, oneay ofay ethay ingskay iedtray otay
oday awayay ithway allay esethay ifferentday eligionsray anday otay extenday ethay orshipway
ofay Osirisay, identifieday ithway Aray, ethay Unsay-odgay, overay ethay olewhay ofay Egyptay.
Anday ehay ucceededsay; utbay ishay uccesssay asway onlyay orfay aay imetay, anday afteray aay
ortshay eriodpay ethay Egyptiansay entway ackbay otay ethay orshipway ofay eirthay anymay
odsgay againay.

Itay asway eryvay importantay, inay ethay opinionay ofay ethay Egyptiansay, atthay ethay odsgay
atay eachay aceplay, anday ofay eachay indkay, ouldshay ebay orshippedway ithway ethay
exactlyay ightray eremoniescay.  Ifay ethay eremoniescay ereway otnay ightlyray
erformedpay ethay odgay ightmay ebay angryay anday ingbray allay indskay ofay alamitiescay
uponay youay.  Itay eemedsay otay emthay arfay oremay importantay atthay esethay itesray
ouldshay ebay operlypray erformedpay anthay atthay osethay owhay erformedpay emthay
ouldshay eadlay eryvay oodgay iveslay.  Eythay adhay eirthay awslay anday eirthay ustomscay
ichwhay egulatedray eirthay onductcay, utbay eythay oday otnay eemsay otay avehay earedfay
atthay ethay odsgay ouldway isitvay emthay ithway unishmentpay inay {36ay} isthay ifelay orfay
anyay ongwray-oingday.  Eythay idday, oweverhay, onsidercay atthay anyay actsay ofay
injusticeay, uchsay asay obberyray oray ishonestyday, ouldway affectay ethay atestay ofay
eirthay oulsay afteray eathday.  Atthay ouldway ebay ethay usinessbay ofay Osirisay, ethay
ulerray ofay ethay eadday, otay ooklay afteray.  Eway illway eakspay ofay atthay inay aay inutemay.

Ethay iestspray ereway ethay eoplepay owhay ewknay exactlyay owhay ethay orshipway ofay ethay
odsgay atay eachay aceplay ouldshay ebay erformedpay.  Eythay ouldcay eadray ethay
eligiousray instructionsay ichwhay ereway ittenwray inay atwhay isay alledcay ethay
ieroglyphichay--ethay acredsay engravingsay.  Ethay ieroglyphichay asway obablypray
ethay eginningbay ofay allay itingwray.

Ifay youay ancay imagineay aay imetay enwhay itingwray asway unknownay, anday enwhay erethay
asway eednay otay endsay ommunicationscay omfray oneay otay anotheray, anday atthay esethay
ommunicationscay ustmay otnay ebay ownknay otay ethay earerbay ofay ethay essagemay, owhay
ouldway youay etsay aboutay oingday itay?

Ellway, oneay ayway, atay eastlay, ofay oingday itay ouldway ebay ybay endingsay ignssay arkedmay
onay apyruspay oray archmentpay oray onay aay ateslay, oray ateverwhay youay ightmay avehay
onvenientcay orfay akingmay arksmay onay, anday otay opehay atthay ethay anmay youay ereway
endingsay emthay otay ouldway ebay everclay enoughay otay understanday atwhay youay eantmay,
anday atthay ethay anmay ybay omwhay youay ereway endingsay emthay ouldway otnay.  Anday ifay youay
antedway otay endsay aay essagemay aboutay anyay articularpay ingthay, ethay ostmay easyay
anday obviousay ayway otay eginbay ouldway ebay ybay akingmay aay implesay awingdray ofay atthay
ingthay.  Osay, ifay youay antedway otay endsay aay essagemay aboutay aay irdbay, youay ouldway
awdray ethay igurefay, oray outlineay, ofay aay irdbay.  Ifay youay antedway otay endsay aay
essagemay aboutay anay eyeay, aay umanhay eyeay, youay ightmay awdray ethay igurefay ofay anay
eyeay.  Iay uggestsay esethay otway ingsthay ecausebay eythay areay otway ofay ethay ostmay
implesay iguresfay atthay actuallyay oday appearay inay ethay icturepay-itingwray ichwhay
isay ethay olday Egyptianay ieroglyphichay.

{37ay}

Ownay eway ancay ogay aay epstay artherfay.  Ethay eyeay isay ethay ingthay atthay eway eesay ithway.
Ereforethay, ifay eway antway otay endsay aay essagemay otay ouray iendfray anday elltay imhay
atthay eway "eesay aay irdbay," ifay eway utpay ethay icturepay ofay anay eyeay, ichwhay isay ethay
organay ofay ightsay, anday aay irdbay extnay otay itay, ouray iendfray, ifay ehay isay atay allay
intelligentay, aymay understanday ethay essagemay otay eanmay "Iay eesay aay irdbay."

[Idenotesay: Eethray indskay ofay itingwray]

Atthay, oray omethingsay ikelay atthay, aymay avehay eenbay--Iay oday otnay aysay atthay itay
asway, utbay Iay inkthay itay ostmay ikelylay--ethay ayway inay ichwhay isthay
icturepay-itingwray eganbay.  Iay oughtay otnay otay allcay itay icturepay-itingwray,
eallyray, orfay itay asway otnay atthay.  _Ieroshay_ isay Eekgray orfay acredsay, oray orfay aay
iestpray; _ypheinglay_ isay Eekgray orfay otay avegray, oray engraveay.  Osay
ieroglyphichay eantmay acredsay aracterschay engraveday; atthay isay, utcay inay onay
onestay.  Ethay ordway orfay ethay acredsay itingwray asway ieratichay, eaningmay implysay
acredsay, ithoutway ethay eaningmay ofay engravingay.  Ethay ieratichay asway ittenwray
onay apyruspay.  Itay asway erivedday omfray ethay ieroglyphichay, ethay ieroglyphichay
eingbay ethay olderay, utbay itay asway otnay uiteqay ethay amesay ecausebay ethay icturespay,
osay otay allcay emthay, adhay ecomebay aay oodgay ealday implifiedsay osay atthay eythay ouldcay
ebay awndray uchmay oremay uicklyqay.  Ethay iguresfay ereway otnay osay arefullycay ademay,
anday ertaincay ignssay, ometimessay otnay eryvay ikelay ethay originalay iguresfay, amecay
otay ebay understooday asay epresentingray esethay iguresfay.

Atthay asway oneay alterationay omfray ethay ieroglyphichay atthay asway ademay, asay imetay
entway onay; anday enthay erethay amecay anotheray, urtherfay angechay, illstay inay ethay
irectionday ofay akingmay implersay anday implersay ignssay inay aceplay ofay ethay
originalay iguresfay; anday enwhay isthay irdthay indkay ofay itingwray adhay establisheday
itselfay itay eemssay otay avehay eenbay oundfay ethay easiestay ofay ethay eethray anday estbay
uitedsay orfay everydayay useay.  Itay asway alledcay "Emoticday," omfray "emosday,"
eaningmay ethay opulacepay, encewhay eway etgay ouray "emocracyday" anday {38ay} ethay ikelay
ordsway.  "Emoticday," enthay, eantmay atthay itay asway ethay itingwray ofay ethay ommoncay
eoplepay, ofay ethay ationnay atay argelay, asay ontrastedcay ithway ethay "ieratichay,"
ichwhay asway ethay itingwray useday anday ownknay ybay ethay iestspray.

Allay ethay olday eligiousray itingswray anday ethay instructionsay aboutay ethay
eremoniescay otay ebay erformedpay atay ethay orshipway ofay ethay ariousvay odsgay ereway,
ofay oursecay, inay ethay acredsay itingwray.  Anday enwhay ethay iestspray addeday otay emthay
eythay ereway arefulcay otay oday itay inay eirthay ownay acredsay iptscray.  Anday osay, ybay
owingknay isthay iptscray, oray itingwray, ichwhay ethay othersay idday otnay, eythay ewgray
otay avehay aay owledgeknay ofay eirthay ownay, ichwhay eythay eptkay atherray ealouslyjay otay
emselvesthay.  Itay avegay emthay allay ethay eatergray importanceay.  Anday eirthay
importanceay anday owerpay ereway eryvay eatgray.

[Idenotesay: Egyptianay essdray]

Eythay ereway istinguishedday omfray ethay estray ofay ethay eoplepay, obablypray onay allay
occasionsay, anday ertainlycay onay ethay occasionsay ofay erformingpay ethay eligiousray
itesray, ybay aay eculiarpay ostumecay.  Ethay ostumecay inay ichwhay eway eesay ethay ommoncay
eoplepay iguredfay inay ethay earliestay engravingsay isay extremelyay implesay.  Ethay
imateclay asway armway anday eythay idday otnay equireray uchmay overingcay.  Ethay essdray
onsistscay implysay inay aay othclay oundway arounday ethay oinslay anday assingpay etweenbay
ethay egslay, ustjay asay ethay ostmay avagesay eoplespay inay ethay orldway otay-ayday earway
ethay oinlay-othclay.

Aay ittlelay aterlay eway indfay ethay engravingsay owingshay usay ethay othclay
engtheninglay ownwardday, erhapspay asay arfay asay ethay eesknay, oray evenay aay ittlelay
owerlay inay ethay emalefay ostumecay, utbay ethay upperay artpay ofay ethay odybay asway
enerallygay arebay inay othbay exessay.  Inenlay ovenway omfray ethay axflay, orfay ethay artay
ofay eavingway asway eryvay earlyay ownknay, asway ethay ightlay aterialmay ofay ichwhay isthay
ostumecay asway ademay.

Anday enthay eway indfay emthay earingway omethingsay otnay unlikeay aay ightnay-owngay
otay-ayday, atherray openay atay ethay ecknay, anday ithoutway eevesslay.  Anotheray
arietyvay ofay ethay inenlay {39ay} essdray asway asay ifay itay ereway aay ightnay-owngay ithway
ethay ontfray osedclay upay otay ethay ecknay, utbay allay ethay ightray ouldershay anday
eeveslay akentay outay ofay itay, osay atthay ethay eftlay ouldershay asway overedcay, utbay
ethay ightray armay anday ouldershay ereway eftlay allay eefray.

Atthay asway ethay indkay ofay essdray ofay ethay ommoncay eoplepay.  Atay irstfay eway eesay
emthay arebay-ootfay.  Aduallygray eythay ooktay oremay anday oremay otay andalssay, anday
erethay areay icturespay ofay eatgray enmay oinggay alongay arebay-ootfay, utbay ollowedfay
ybay aay ervantsay arryingcay eirthay andalssay--erhapspay otay utpay onay enwhay eythay amecay
otay oughray oundgray.  Utbay itay isay alsoay ikelylay atthay ethay earingway ofay ethay
andalssay adhay aay eaningmay inay aay eligiousray iteray ichwhay eythay ightmay ebay oinggay
otay erformpay.

Ethay eadhay asway atay irstfay alwaysay uncovereday; utbay eway eesay atay oneay imetay aay
illetfay, oray implesay andbay orfay ethay airhay, eginningbay otay ebay ornway; enthay eway
omecay otay aay uriouscay owlay apcay, anday extnay otay aay ighhay, almostay itremay-ikelay apcay,
anday inallyfay otay aay arietyvay ofay eadgearhay.  Ethay airhay anday ethay eardbay areay
ometimessay elaboratelyay urledcay; utbay asay aay uleray ethay Egyptiansay ereway
eanclay-avenshay.  Ethay eardbay, oweverhay, asway ecognisedray asay osay importantay inay
omesay ofay ethay eligiousray eremoniescay atthay itay isay aidsay atthay aay alsefay eardbay
asway ometimessay ornway onay esethay acredsay occasionsay.  Itay isay atherray ikelay ethay
earingway ofay igsway ybay ouray udgesjay anday arristersbay inay Ourtcay.

Atay ethay eginningbay ofay ethay eatgray eighteenthay ynastyday, eway indfay ethay ongerlay
ownsgay, ichwhay areay ikelay ouray ightnay-ownsgay, ornway oremay anday oremay, anday ethay
iestlypray armentsgay anday osethay ofay ethay eatgray enmay ecomingbay oremay anday oremay
ichray anday onglay.  Ikelylay enoughay isthay angechay asway ueday otay ethay oserclay
intercourseay ichwhay ethay Egyptiansay ownay eganbay otay avehay ithway ethay Easternay
Empireay, erewhay ethay ongerlay anday icherray armentsgay ereway ommonlycay ornway.

{40ay}

Utbay, afteray allay, enwhay youay earhay oray eadray ethay ordsway Ancientay Egyptay, atwhay,
atay irstfay, oday youay eginbay otay inkthay ofay?  Iay owknay atwhay ideasay ethay ordsway
irstfay uggestsay otay emay--yramidspay anday ummiesmay.  Eythay areay othbay osay
extraordinaryay anday unlikeay atwhay eway indfay inay otheray ountriescay.  Anday eythay
othbay avehay atherray ethay amesay eaningmay atay ethay ackbay ofay emthay, amelynay, atthay
ethay Egyptiansay aidpay aay eryvay eatgray espectray otay ethay odiesbay ofay ethay eadday.
Orfay ethay ummifyingmay asway, ofay oursecay, otay eservepray ethay odybay, anday ethay
yramidspay ereway onlyay oneay ormfay ofay ethay immenseay anday immenselyay expensiveay
ombstay ichwhay eythay uiltbay orfay ethay ummiesmay otay ebay aidlay inay.

Anday Iay oday otnay antway youay otay ebay isledmay ybay omethingsay atthay Iay otewray aay ewfay
agespay ackbay aboutay ethay Egyptiansay otnay upposingsay atthay ethay avourfay ofay ethay
odsgay asway otay ebay onway ybay oodgay ehaviourbay, utbay atherray ybay eryvay exactay itualray
anday eremoniescay.  Atthay isay uetray, utbay Iay alsoay aidsay enthay atthay eythay idday
inkthay atthay ethay ehaviourbay ofay aay ersonpay ilewhay aliveay ademay aay eatgray
ifferenceday otay ishay uturefay afteray eathday.

Atthay isay aay actfay atthay eway aymay ebay uiteqay ertaincay ofay.  Erethay isay aay eryvay
amousfay olday Egyptianay ookbay, alledcay _Ethay Ookbay ofay ethay Eadday_, illustrateday
ithway icturespay owingshay allay atthay appenedhay, afteray ishay eathday, otay aay
ertaincay illustriousay Egyptianay; owhay ehay assedpay oughthray everalsay atesgay,
eachay uardedgay ybay itsay ownay orriblehay emonsday, owhay ehay arriveday atay ethay eatgray
udgmentjay-eatsay atay astlay, anday owhay erethay ishay oodgay eedsday inay isthay ifelay ereway
eighedway againstay ishay adbay, anday ethay oodgay ereway oundfay otay ebay oremay anthay ethay
adbay, osay atthay ehay asway alloweday otay ogay onay otay aay aceplay inay ichwhay itay ardlyhay
eemssay asay ifay ehay asway ikelylay otay ebay eryvay, eryvay appyhay, utbay atay eastlay itay asway
arfay etterbay ortunefay orfay imhay anthay ifay ehay adhay eenbay oundfay uiltygay anday eenbay
ivengay otay ethay ormentortay.  Ethay ormentortay isay ownshay inay anymay ofay {41ay} ethay
icturespay aitingway orfay imhay.  Ehay isay aay erribletay eaturecray, ithway eethtay anday
awsclay.

[Idenotesay: Avesslay]

Ethay inneray allsway ofay omesay ofay ethay yramidspay areay overedcay ithway extstay
escribingday eventsay ofay isthay indkay inay ethay afteray-eathday ifelay ofay ingskay.
Omesay areay ofay uchsay antiquityay atthay eythay ogay ackbay eforebay ethay unitingay intoay
oneay ofay ethay otway ingdomskay ybay Enesmay; anday evenay inay osethay arfay-awayay imestay
ethay instructionsay ereway engthylay anday eryvay ecisepray aboutay ethay indkay ofay oodfay
anday inkdray, anday eansmay ofay otectionpray omfray evilay ingsthay, atthay ouldshay ebay
uriedbay ithway ethay ingkay orfay ishay useay inay ethay afteray-ifelay.  Eythay adhay uchmay
ethay amesay oughtsthay asay eway avehay aboutay ethay ifferenceday etweenbay oodgay
onductcay anday adbay.  Oneay ofay ethay evilay actsay ichwhay ouldway ostmay ertainlycay
ondemncay ethay oerday otay unishmentpay afteray eathday asway oppressionay ofay ethay
oorpay.  Evenay asay onglay agoay asay atthay itay asway accounteday aay irtuevay otay ebay
indlykay anday enerousgay otay osethay owhay adhay eenbay esslay ortunatefay anthay
yourselfay.  Itay eemssay obablepray eythay ereway aay indlykay, atherray entlegay
eoplepay, inclineday otay eacepay anday artsay atherray anthay otay arway, utbay ompelledcay
otay ebay inay aay onstantcay atestay ofay efenceday againstay ethay incursionsay ofay
enemiesay owhay ivedlay inay esslay ertilefay andslay.  Inay ethay oursecay ofay uchsay
efenceday anday esistanceray anymay isonerspray ouldway ebay akentay.  Ethay isonerspray
ouldway ebay etainedray aliveay, asay aluablevay avesslay.  Itay oesday otnay ollowfay atthay
ecausebay eythay ereway avesslay eythay ouldway ebay illay-eatedtray.  Aay indkay astermay
ouldway eattray aay aveslay ellway outay ofay indnesskay; anday aay ensiblesay astermay, evenay
ifay ehay ereway otnay indkay ofay earthay, ouldway eattray aay aveslay ellway ecausebay ethay
etterbay aay aveslay, ikelay aay orsehay, asway edfay anday aredcay orfay, ethay oremay orkway
ouldcay ebay otgay outay ofay imhay.

Anday atthay ingsbray usay againay otay ethay yramidspay anday ethay otheray eatgray ombstay ofay
ethay ingskay anday emplestay ofay ethay odsgay; orfay itay isay eryvay ertaincay atthay utbay
orfay "aveslay abourlay," asay itay isay alledcay, ethay uildingbay ofay ethay yramidspay
ouldway avehay {42ay} eenbay anay impossibilityay.  Asay itay isay, ithway allay allowanceay
ademay orfay ethay ultitudemay ofay ethay abourerslay anday ethay eapnesschay ofay eirthay
oodfay anday ofay ethay aterialmay orfay ethay uildingbay, ethay yramidspay emainray
erhapspay ethay eatestgray onderway ofay anmay'say akingmay inay allay ethay orldway,
especiallyay enwhay eway onsidercay eirthay ageay anday ethay allsmay engineeringay
appliancesay atthay ethay uildersbay adhay orfay eirthay akingmay.  Owhay eythay ealtday
ithway ethay ugehay ocksblay ofay onestay isay aay arvelmay.

Youay obablypray owknay, oughlyray, ethay apeshay ofay aay yramidpay.  Ethay argestlay ownay
andingstay isay ethay Eatgray Yramidpay, oray ethay Yramidpay ofay Eopschay, earnay Izehgay.
Itsay asebay, oray owestlay anday argestlay artpay, overscay 13ay acresay, anday itsay optay isay
150ay eetfay igherhay anthay ethay optay ofay Stay. Aulpay'say Athedralcay.  Aay acespay ofay 13ay
acresay easuresmay aboutay 250ay yardsay eachay ayway anday ellway overay alfhay aay ilemay
oundray.  Askay omebodysay otay owshay youay aay iecepay ofay oundgray, earnay erewhay youay
ivelay, atthay isay aboutay ethay izesay ofay 13ay acresay.  Enthay ememberray atthay 150ay
eetfay isay 50ay yardsay, oray oremay anthay ethay engthlay ofay otway icketcray itchespay, anday
imagineay Stay. Aulpay'say omeday allay atthay igherhay.  Ithway atthay ideaay orfay ethay
eighthay, anday ithway anay ideaay ofay ethay izesay ofay ethay iecepay ofay oundgray orfay ethay
izesay ofay ethay asebay, youay aymay erhapspay ormfay omesay indkay ofay ideaay ofay ethay
immenseay appearanceay ofay isthay yramidpay isingray outay ofay ethay esertday inay ethay
earclay Egyptianay airay.  Anday ethay urposepay ofay allay isthay astvay onstructioncay isay
otay akemay aay overingcay overay otway ittlelay urialbay amberschay inay ethay iddlemay ofay
itay allay, inay ichwhay ereway aidlay, ousandsthay ofay yearsay agoay, ethay ummiedmay
odiesbay ofay Ingkay Eopschay anday ofay ethay ueenqay owhay asway ishay ifeway.

Isthay isay ertainlycay ethay iggestbay yramidpay ownay andingstay, anday obablypray ethay
argestlay everay uiltbay; utbay erethay areay anymay yramidspay otay ichwhay eferenceray isay
ademay inay ethay inscriptionsay oray itingswray ichwhay avehay entirelyay isappearedday.
Obablypray eirthay aterialsmay avehay eenbay useday orfay otheray {43ay} uildingsbay, anday
andsay-ormsstay omfray ethay esertday avehay elpedhay otay overcay eirthay oundationsfay.

[Idenotesay: Emplestay]

Aay empletay, inay ichwhay ethay iouspay eoplepay ightmay orshipway, asway oftenay
onnectedcay ithway ethay yramidpay.  Enwhay isthay asway osay, ethay empletay alwaysay
eemssay otay avehay eenbay acedplay otay ethay eastay ofay ethay urialbay yramidpay, osay atthay
ethay orshippersway ouldshay ooklay owardstay ethay odybay anday otay ethay estway.  Itay asway
owardstay ethay estway ofay ethay urialbay amberchay atthay aay assagepay asway ademay, ithway
aay oorday ofay exitay orfay ethay oulsay otay ogay outay intoay ethay underay-orldway.  Eway avehay
otay ememberray atthay evenay inay ifelay ethay Egyptianay ingkay asway egardedray asay aay
indkay ofay odgay.  Itay isay ifficultday orfay usay otay indfay ouray ayway ackbay intoay ethay
oughtsthay ofay esethay ancientay eoplepay, owhay awsay arfay esslay ifferenceday anthay eway
owknay atthay eway areay obligeday otay eesay etweenbay ethay umanhay aturenay anday ethay
ivineday; utbay eway ustmay ytray otay etgay ackbay intoay eirthay oughtsthay, ifay eway antway
otay understanday emthay.

Anday isthay, anday aay eatgray ealday oremay atthay Iay avehay ittenwray inay isthay apterchay
anday inay ethay oneay eforebay, isay uetray otnay ofay ethay earlyay Egyptiansay onlyay, utbay
ofay earlyay anmay allay ethay orldway overay.  Iay allshay otnay eepkay youay earlynay osay onglay
inay ymay escriptionday ofay atwhay entway onay inay ethay olday aysday alongay ethay Euphratesay
anday Igristay anday elsewhereay, ecausebay aay oodgay ealday ofay atwhay Iay amay ellingtay
youay ownay aboutay esethay olday Egyptiansay appliesay otay ellersdway inay osethay otheray
acesplay.

Omesay ofay ethay inscriptionsay eakspay ofay ethay importantay artpay ichwhay aay iestpray
accompanyingay ethay iritspay inay ethay underay-orldway ayedplay inay ettinggay ethay
iritspay oughthray ethay ariousvay emonday-uardedgay oorsday anday arguingay ishay asecay,
asay aay arristerbay ightmay, eforebay ethay udgejay.  Iay aysay iritspay, utbay inay ethay
icturespay ethay odybay isay ownshay, eryvay ubstantiallysay.  Ofay oursecay itay asway allay
ethay oremay otay ethay iestspray' advantageay otay ovepray owhay usefulay eythay ouldcay ebay
inay ethay afteray-ifelay, asay ellway asay inay isthay.

{44ay}

Ethay ummiesmay, asay youay ustmay owknay, ereway eadday odiesbay eservedpray ybay uttingpay
emicalschay intoay emthay anday overay emthay, anday appingwray emthay oundray, anday oftenay
ybay aintingpay eirthay acesfay, anday ivinggay emthay altogetheray anay appearanceay
ichwhay otay usay, iscoveringday emthay afteray allay esethay yearsay, eemssay atherray
eadfuldray, utbay onay oubtday asway uchmay admireday.  Eway avehay onay ecordray ofay ethay
imetay enwhay ethay Egyptiansay eganbay usthay otay "ummymay" eirthay eadday; eway aymay
almostay aysay atthay eway avehay onay ecordray ofay aay imetay enwhay eythay idday otnay oday osay.
Erethay ereway ummiesmay onglay eforebay Enesmay, osewhay ateday, youay aymay ememberray,
ashay eenbay uessedgay osay earlyay asay 5500ay yearsay Bay.Cay. anday osay atelay asay 3300ay Bay.Cay.
Atay irstfay itay eemssay asay ifay onlyay ingskay ereway ummiedmay.  Ethay ingskay ereway
alwaysay ookedlay onay asay emisay-ivineday, anday aterlay ethay eoplepay eganbay otay egardray
ethay ingkay asay eingbay almostay identicalay ithway--almostay ethay amesay asay--Osirisay.
Itay isay asay ifay eythay oughtthay atthay ethay odgay amecay ownday inay iritspay otay ivelay inay
ethay odybay ofay ethay eigningray ingkay.

[Illustrationay: ANDAGINGbay Aay UMMYmay.]

[Idenotesay: Ummiesmay]

Aterlay onay inay ethay orystay, anymay eatgray eoplepay, asay ellway asay ethay ingskay, ereway
ummiedmay, anday yetay aterlay againay itay ecamebay uiteqay ommoncay ithway allay assesclay.
Acredsay animalsay, uchsay asay ethay atscay inay Ubastisbay, awkshay inay ethay emplestay ofay
Orushay, anday evenay ocodilescray anday uiteqay argelay eaturescray, avehay eenbay
oundfay, ummiedmay, inay eatgray umbersnay.  Ethay artay anday adetray {45ay} ofay akingmay
ummiesmay asway aay eryvay importantay oneay, anday ewgray otay eatergray erfectionpay asay
ethay artistsay eganbay otay earnlay oremay ofay ethay eservingpray owerpay ofay emicalschay.
Enerallygay, eythay areay ethay ummiesmay ofay oyalray ersonagespay atthay avehay omecay
ownday otay usay inay ethay estbay eservationpray, onay oubtday ecausebay ethay eatestgray
arecay anday expenseay ereway ivengay otay eirthay embalmingay.  Oneay ofay ethay estbay isay
ofay atthay amousfay ingkay Ethmosistay IIIay.  owhay asway ethay eatestgray erohay ofay atthay
eatestgray eighteenthay ynastyday upay, oray ownday, otay ichwhay eway avehay ownay oughtbray
ouray orystay.

Iay avehay aidsay, anday youay illway ebay eadyray otay agreeay ithway itay, atthay allay isthay
arecay orfay ethay eadday odybay owsshay atwhay ighhay aluevay ethay Egyptiansay acedplay onay
ethay orpsecay, althoughay ifelay anday ethay oulsay adhay eftlay itay.  Utbay eythay adhay ethay
ideaay atthay ethay oulsay ouldcay ebay oughtbray ackbay againay, ybay incantationsay, otay
ogay intoay ethay odybay againay oughthray ethay outhmay, anday osay akemay ethay outhmay anday
ethay egslay anday otheray artspay ovemay, almostay asay eythay idday eforebay eathday.  Atthay
ideaay explainsay erhapspay ywhay eythay ooktay osay uchmay ainspay aboutay eepingkay ethay
odybay erfectpay.  Itay aymay explainay ywhay ethay ickedway Ethsay, inay ishay alicemay, utcay
upay ethay odybay ofay Osirisay, omwhay ehay adhay urderedmay, anday atteredscay ethay iecespay
inay ourteenfay ifferentday acesplay, anday alsoay ywhay ethay aithfulfay Isisay
ollectedcay emthay anday utpay emthay allay ogethertay againay.

Ethay Egyptiansay, ikelay otheray ancientay eoplepay anday ikelay anymay avagesay acesray
otay-ayday, elievedbay atthay aay anmay ossessedpay anday adhay inay ishay odybay, utbay
apablecay ofay eparationsay omfray itay, otway oulssay, oray iritsspay, anday erhapspay
oremay, anday oughthay atthay isay anay ideaay osay eryvay ifferentday omfray oursay itay isay
otnay eryvay ifficultday orfay usay otay understanday aay ayway inay ichwhay itay ightmay avehay
omecay intoay eirthay indsmay.

Itay ashay eenbay oughtthay ikelylay ybay anymay owhay avehay ivengay uchmay earnedlay anday
eepday attentionay otay ethay ubjectsay, atthay ethay ideaay aroseay omfray atwhay eoplepay
awsay inay eamsdray.  {46ay} Eythay ouldway owknay, erhapspay, atthay aay iendfray ofay
eirsthay adhay onegay awayay onay aay ourneyjay, yetay eythay ightmay ogay otay eepslay, anday
eesay, inay aay eamdray, ethay iendfray esidebay emthay.  Atwhay ereway eythay ikelylay otay
inkthay?  Eythay adhay otnay ouray owledgeknay aboutay eamsdray, anday idday otnay owknay
atthay allay atthay eythay awsay inay emthay amecay omfray eirthay ownay ancyfay.  Eythay ouldway
ebay eryvay ikelylay otay inkthay, enthay, atthay eirthay iendfray, inay ishay oulsay oray
iritspay ithway omethingsay atthay ookedlay ikelay ishay odybay, eallyray adhay omecay anday
adhay oodstay esidebay emthay, althoughay atwhay eway ouldshay allcay ishay ealray elfsay asway
arfay awayay.  Eythay ouldway aysay, enthay, atthay ehay adhay aay econdsay elfsay, oray
iritspay, ichwhay ouldcay ebay inay oneay aceplay anday oingday oneay ingthay ilewhay ishay
otheray elfsay asway inay anotheray aceplay anday oingday uiteqay aay ifferentday ingthay.
Usthay eythay ightmay etgay ethay ideaay ofay oneay indkay ofay oulsay anday odybay ichwhay ouldway
ebay ifferentday omfray ethay anmay omwhay eythay actuallyay awsay anday okespay otay enwhay
eythay ereway awakeay.

Anday enthay, enwhay aay iendfray adhay iedday, adhay onegay oughthray atthay eatgray angechay
ichwhay eway allcay eathday, eythay ouldway oftenay, illstay inay eamsdray, eesay imhay
againay, asay ehay adhay eenbay inay ifelay, oughthay eythay ewknay atthay ishay odybay adhay otnay
ovedmay omfray ethay aceplay erewhay itay adhay eenbay uriedbay.  Otheray iendsfray ightmay
ebay ableay otay assureay emthay asay otay isthay.  Ereforethay eythay ightmay aysay, "Erehay
isay anotheray elfsay oray iritspay ofay ymay iendfray, owhay isay eadday, ichwhay Iay awsay omecay
anday oday isthay oray atthay.  Itay isay ethay oulsay otnay ofay aay ivinglay anmay, utbay ofay aay
eadday anmay."  Usthay ethay ideaay ightmay ariseay ofay aay econdsay oulsay ifferentday omfray
atthay ichwhay asway eensay ilewhay ethay iendfray asway aliveay.

Youay ustmay understanday atthay Iay amay otnay ayingsay atthay itay ertainlycay asway usthay
atthay ethay ideaay ofay oremay anthay oneay oulsay aroseay; utbay itay aymay avehay eenbay inay
isthay ayway.  Itay isay aay ayway inay ichwhay eway ancay easilyay eesay atthay itay ightmay avehay
omecay intoay eirthay indsmay.

{47ay}

Anymay ofay ethay olday itingswray anday inscriptionsay ivegay instructionsay aboutay ethay
ayerspray anday eremoniescay anday ormsfay ofay ordsway otay ebay useday orfay ingingbray
ackbay ethay oulsay intoay ethay eadday odybay, anday esethay, ofay oursecay, ereway estbay
understooday ybay ethay iestspray.  Isthay, againay, elpedhay otay akemay ethay iestspray
eryvay importantay ersonspay.  Ethay eatestgray eoplepay inay ethay andlay erformedpay
ethay iestspray' utiesday; anday omesay ofay atwhay eway aymay allcay ofessedpray iestspray,
osethay osewhay olewhay usinessbay asway ethay erformancepay ofay esethay itesray anday
eremoniescay, ecamebay ethay eatestgray eoplepay.  Alsoay omesay ofay esethay eryvay amesay
eoplepay acteday asay udgesjay anday ecidedday ointspay ofay awlay, anday avegay
unishmentspay orfay ethay eakingbray ofay ethay awslay.  Youay aymay ealiseray, enthay, owhay
extensiveay eirthay owerpay asway.

[Idenotesay: Awslay]

Eway oday otnay owknay aay eatgray ealday aboutay eirthay awslay, utbay itay isay ingularsay atthay
allay eway oday owknay owsshay atthay eythay adhay eryvay uchmay ethay amesay ideasay asay otay
atwhay asway ightray oray ongwray asay eway avehay.  Ethay ingkay issueday ecreesday.  Eway
indfay ecreesday againstay ethay oppressionay ofay ethay oorpay ybay ethay argelay
andownerslay.  Imecray asway unishedpay ybay eathday, ybay inesfay, ybay utilationmay,
uchsay asay ybay uttingcay offay ethay osenay oray ybay ethay inflictionay ofay otheray oundsway,
anday ybay anishmentbay outay ofay ethay ingdomkay.  Eythay adhay eirthay odescay ofay awslay,
orfay eythay areay eferredray otay inay inscriptionsay, utbay ethay odescay emselvesthay
avehay otnay eenbay oundfay.

Iay oday otnay owknay etherwhay isthay ortshay accountay illway elphay youay otay etgay aay
icturepay intoay youray indsmay ofay ethay ifelay ofay ethay ancientay Egyptiansay.  Aay
argelay artpay ofay ethay icturepay ouldshay ebay illedfay ybay ethay eligiousray
eremoniescay, ybay ethay orshipway ofay ethay odsgay anday ybay ethay offeringsay ichwhay adhay
otay ebay ademay, atay atedstay imestay, otay ethay oulssay ofay eadday elationsray.  Ethay
owerpay anday ethay umbernay ofay ethay iesthoodpray ecamebay osay eatgray asay otay ivalray
atthay ofay ethay ingkay, anday actuallyay oneay ofay ethay ulingray ynastiesday asway etsay upay
ybay ethay iestpray assclay itselfay.

{48ay}

Osay ownay, ithway atthay icturepay, uchsay asay Iay avehay eenbay ableay otay etsay itay eforebay
youray indsmay, ofay ethay eoplepay ivinglay alongay ethay Ilenay, etlay usay ogay eastwarday
anday eesay atwhay asway eingbay oneday allay atthay ilewhay alongay ethay oursescay ofay ethay
Igristay anday Euphratesay.




{49ay}

APTERcHay IVay

ABYLONIAbay.

Ifay youay illway ooklay atay ethay apmay onceay oremay youay illway eesay atthay ethay Euphratesay
anday ethay Igristay awdray ogethertay earnay eirthay outgoingay intoay ethay Ersianpay
Ulfgay anday owflay ogethertay asay oneay eamstray.  Itay asway otnay alwaysay osay, oweverhay.
Atay ethay earliestay imestay ofay ichwhay eway avehay anyay owledgeknay atay allay ethay easay
etchedstray upay orthwardnay intoay ethay andlay otay aay ointpay atay ichwhay ethay otway
iversray anray inay eparatesay annelschay, osay atthay eachay entway outay ybay itsay ownay
outhmay intoay ethay ulfgay.

Iay oldtay youay atthay Iay idday otnay eanmay otay akemay isthay orystay aboutay ethay easternay
iversray earlynay asay onglay asay atthay aboutay ethay Ilenay.  Erethay areay otway easonsray
orfay isthay.  Inay ethay irstfay aceplay erethay isay otnay osay uchmay otay elltay.  Ethay
ecordsray areay otnay osay anymay ornay osay ullfay.  Ethay ausecay ofay atthay isay ainplay.
Egyptay isay aay andlay ellway urnishedfay ithway ardhay onestay, anitegray, anday ethay
ikelay.  Inay ethay andlay ichwhay eway illway allcay Abyloniabay erethay isay eryvay ittlelay
onestay.  Ereforethay ethay uildersbay uiltbay ithway ickbray.  Ethay inscriptionsay
ereway engravenay onay ickbray.  Anday ickbray isay otnay osay onglay astinglay aay aterialmay
asay onestay.  Itay oesday otnay aketay ethay arkmay ofay ethay avinggray ooltay asay arplyshay
atay ethay irstfay uttingcay, anday itay isay oremay iablelay otay earway awayay inay ethay
oursecay ofay yearsay.  Oreovermay, ethay imateclay ofay Egyptay, inay itsay upperay artpay
atay eastlay, isay osay ydray atthay itay isay obablypray ethay estbay eservingpray imateclay
inay ethay orldway--ethay imateclay inay ichwhay inscriptionsay onay onestay oray apyruspay
ouldway astlay anday eepkay eshfray ongerlay anthay inay anyay otheray.  Orfay esethay {50ay}
easonsray eway avehay oremay ecordsray omfray Egyptay anthay omfray Abyloniabay.

Utbay atthay isay onlyay aay artpay, anday ethay allersmay artpay, ofay ethay olewhay easonray
ywhay isthay orystay atthay eway areay ellingtay ownay aymay ebay oldtay oremay ortlyshay.  Ethay
argerlay easonray isay atthay aay oodgay ealday ofay itay ashay eenbay oldtay alreadyay inay ethay
Egyptianay orystay.  Erethay isay onay eednay orfay emay otay ogay ackbay anday eray-elltay youay
ethay istoryhay ofay esethay Abyloniansbay ivinglay oughthray eirthay agesay ofay onestay
eaponsway, onzebray eaponsway, anday ironay eaponsway, anday oughthray eirthay untinghay
agestay, eirthay ockflay-eepingkay agestay, anday eirthay agriculturalay agestay; erethay
isay onay eednay otay elltay isthay, orfay itay asway oldtay otay youay aboutay ethay Egyptiansay,
anday itay isay ethay orystay ommoncay otay allay ankindmay asay eythay ivedlay anday orkedway
eirthay ayway upay omfray ethay ostmay imitivepray onditionscay otay ivilisationcay.

Youay ustmay easeplay aketay allay atthay orfay antedgray, asay eingbay uetray ofay ethay
Abyloniansbay asay ofay ethay estray ofay ethay orldway.  Youay aymay imagineay, ootay, atthay
ethay amesay uzzlespay esetbay emthay asay esetbay ethay Egyptiansay enwhay eythay eganbay otay
onderway owhay ingsthay, includingay emselvesthay, adhay appenedhay--owhay ethay orldway
adhay omecay intoay eingbay anday atwhay ethay unsay, oonmay, anday arsstay ereway, anday osay
onay.  Eythay, ikelay ethay Egyptiansay, onderedway aboutay ethay invisibleay orcesfay ybay
ichwhay eythay oundfay emselvesthay urroundedsay anday oremay oray esslay ontrolledcay.
Eythay ademay atherray ifferentday answersay otay ethay uzzlespay, utbay ethay uzzlespay
ereway ethay amesay.

[Illustrationay: ANCIENTay EGYPTIANay ACHINEmay ORfay AISINGray ATERway
(ESENTpRay-AYday "ADOOFsHay").]

Anday osay aay eatgray ealday ofay ethay ifelay-orystay ofay ethay Egyptiansay, ofay eirthay ayway
ofay ivinglay anday osay onay, aymay ebay onsideredcay otay ebay ethay ayway atthay ethay
Abyloniansbay ollowedfay alsoay.  Atwhay illway erhapspay ingbray ethay ifelay ofay ethay
Abyloniansbay ostmay earlyclay eforebay youray eyesay illway ebay otay eesay, osay arfay asay
eway ancay, ethay iefchay ifferencesday etweenbay eirthay iveslay anday ethay iveslay ofay
osethay olday Egyptiansay.

[Idenotesay: Aterway-aisingray]

Othbay ationsnay ivedlay alongay iverray-oursescay--eway avehay {51ay} eensay atthay.  Anday
othbay ereway eryvay ependentday onay ethay overfloway ofay ethay iversray orfay ethay
ertilisationfay ofay eirthay ieldsfay anday orfay ethay owthgray ofay eirthay opscray.
Utbay, oughthay isthay asway inay aay easuremay uetray ofay othbay, ethay ependenceday ofay ethay
Egyptiansay onay ethay overfloway ofay ethay Ilenay asway uchmay oremay ompletecay {52ay}
anthay ethay ependenceday ofay esethay othersay onay ethay overfloway ofay ethay Euphratesay
anday Igristay.  Osethay iversray ereway otnay osay unctualpay inay ethay ateday ofay ethay
overfloway, anday ethay ifferenceday etweenbay eirthay owestlay anday ighesthay owflay
asway otnay osay eatgray asay inay ethay Ilenay.  Othbay ountriescay, oweverhay, ependedday
argelylay onay irrigationay, atthay isay otay aysay, onay eadinglay ethay aterway ybay analscay
omfray ethay ainmay iversray otay ethay ieldsfay erewhay itay asway antedway.  Egyptay, evenay
enwhay itay adhay oremay eestray anthay itay ashay ownay, adhay obablypray esslay ainfallray
anthay Abyloniabay; utbay inay othbay ountriescay ethay iversray ereway ethay ourcessay anday
iversgay ofay eirthay oodfay upplysay.

Eway avehay eensay ethay Egyptiansay ivinglay alongay aay iverray ichwhay entway ownday
etweenbay esertday ountrycay, arrenbay ountrycay, onay eitheray idesay.  Ethay ountrycay
onay eitheray idesay ethay oursescay ofay ethay Euphratesay anday Igristay asway otnay earlynay
osay arrenbay anday esertday asay atthay ichwhay aylay aboutay ethay Ilenay.

[Idenotesay: Ethay eighbouringnay atesstay]

Utbay ownay itay ecomesbay ecessarynay otay ooklay atay ethay apmay againay.  Ifay youay illway
oday osay youay illway eesay ustjay owhay isthay Abyloniabay isay ituatedsay inay elationray otay
ethay ountriescay oundray aboutay itay.  Iay eakspay ofay itay asay Abyloniabay, anday eakspay
ofay ethay "otheray ountriescay," utbay youay areay otnay otay upposesay atthay evenay atay ethay
atestlay ateday otay ichwhay eway avehay oughtbray ownday ethay orystay atay esentpray enmay
adhay atay allay ethay amesay istinctday ideaay atthay eway avehay ownay aboutay erewhay oneay
ountrycay endeday anday anotheray eganbay.  Youay aymay avehay eardhay ofay "oundarybay
ommissionscay," eaningmay ommitteescay ofay enmay appointeday otay acetray outay ethay
oundarybay inelay etweenbay otway ountriescay.  Ethay ationsnay eway areay eakingspay ofay
adhay onay oundarybay ommissionscay: eythay adhay onay earclay ideaay ofay oundariesbay, oray
ofay oneay ationnay avinghay aay ightray otay ivelay anday otay earbay uleray upay otay aay ertaincay
ointpay oray inelay anday onay artherfay.  Itay asway allay eryvay iftingshay, anday oneay
ationnay ooktay omfray anotheray atwhay itay ouldcay etgay.

Ethay iftingshay erhapspay idday otnay attermay osay uchmay inay {53ay} osethay aysday,
ecausebay eoplepay adhay otnay earntlay otay ooklay onay eirthay omeshay asay eryvay ettledsay,
oray astinglay.  Aay oodgay anymay ofay osethay amongay omwhay ethay orystay isay otay aketay usay
ownay ereway, ifay otnay ellersdway inay entstay emselvesthay, atay eastlay ethay
escendantsday ofay osethay owhay adhay eltdway inay entstay onlyay aay enerationgay oray otway
eforebay.

Utbay aay ooklay atay ethay apmay illway owshay youay atthay isthay ountrycay, ichwhay eway aymay
allcay, inay aay eneralgay ayway ofay eakingspay, Abyloniabay, adhay itsay oundsbay, itsay
imitslay, oughthay itay asway otnay earlynay asay oselyclay imitedlay asay Egyptay asway
etweenbay ethay esertsday.  Abyloniabay, youay illway eesay, ashay ethay Editerraneanmay
Easay onay itsay estway, utbay ithway Alestinepay anday Yriasay etweenbay itselfay anday atthay
easay.  Onay ethay outhsay erethay isay ethay Ersianpay Ulfgay; anday Arabiaay, ichwhay isay
argelylay esertday anday arrenbay, alsoay ieslay otay ethay outhsay anday outhsay-estway.  Onay
ethay orthnay, awayay upay owardstay ethay ourcessay ofay ethay eatgray iversray, isay aay ildway
ountainousmay egionray encewhay, asay eway allshay eesay, ildway, iercefay eoplepay ereway
aptay otay omecay ownday otay arasshay ethay ellersdway inay ethay ichray ainplay.

Osay, onay esethay eethray idessay eway indfay Abyloniabay oundedbay, oughthay ethay
oundariesbay areay argelay asay omparedcay ithway ethay arrownay oundariesbay ofay ethay
eoplepay alongay ethay Ilenay; utbay onay ethay ourthfay, ethay easternay idesay, awayay
owardstay Ersiapay anday ethay earthay ofay Asiaay, erethay eemssay onay imitlay ateverwhay,
eitheray ofay ountainmay oray ofay esertday oray ofay easay.  Ethay ossibilitiespay ofay
eoplespay omingcay inay ybay atthay ayway eemsay ithoutway anyay imitlay.  Inay isthay
espectray, enthay, ethay ituationssay ofay ethay otway ancientay empiresay ofay ethay orldway
ereway eryvay ifferentday.

Iay amay eakingspay ofay allay isthay ountrycay asay Abyloniabay, anday itay aymay occuray otay
youay otay onderway atay atthay ecausebay youay illway avehay eardhay osay uchmay omfray youray
Iblesbay ofay ethay Assyriansay omingcay uponay Alestinepay omfray isthay eryvay ountrycay
oundray aboutay ethay Euphratesay.  Anday osay eythay {54ay} idday; anday atay oneay eriodpay
inay ethay orystay ethay Assyriansay ecamebay osay owerfulpay atthay eythay ooktay
ossessionpay ofay allay isthay andlay, anday ustjay atay atthay imetay itay ouldway ebay oremay
orrectcay otay allcay ethay andlay Assyriaay insteaday ofay Abyloniabay.  Utbay isthay asway
orfay aay eriodpay onlyay.  Atay ethay eginningbay ofay ouray owledgeknay ofay isthay egionray
Assyriaay asway onlyay aay ovincepray, aay orthernnay ovincepray, ofay Abyloniabay, anday
asway uledray omfray Abylonbay.  Utbay ethay Assyriansay ecamebay eryvay ongstray anday
evoltedray, anday onqueredcay osethay owhay adhay eenbay eirthay astersmay, anday itay asway
uringday isthay ictoriousvay eriodpay atthay eythay ademay osethay incursionsay intoay
Alestinepay ofay ichwhay ethay Iblebay ellstay usay.  Utbay atay engthlay ethay
Abyloniansbay, eirthay olday astersmay, oseray upay againstay emthay anday otgay ethay
asterymay overay emthay againay, anday afteray isthay azeblay ofay oryglay Assyriaay inkssay
ackbay intoay itsay olday aceplay asay aay ovincepray ofay Abylonbay, inay ethay orthernnay
artpay ofay ethay empireay.

Ownay owhay ereway eythay, erewhay idday eythay omecay omfray--ethay earliestay ofay ethay
eoplepay omwhay eway indfay otay avehay ivedlay inay Abyloniabay?  Eway oday otnay uiteqay owknay
atthay.  Atwhay itay isay uiteqay usefulay otay otenay, oweverhay, isay atthay eway oday eemsay
otay owknay owhay eythay ereway otnay.  Eythay ereway otnay Emitessay--otnay aay Emiticsay
eoplepay.  Itay isay usefulay otay owknay eythay ereway otnay isthay, ecausebay Emiticsay isay
ustjay atwhay ostmay ofay ethay eoplepay omwhay eway ownay eetmay inay ethay umanhay orystay ereway.

Ethay amenay omescay omfray Emshay, ethay amenay ofay oneay ofay ethay onssay ofay Oahnay inay ethay
ookbay ofay Enesisgay; anday ethay osay-alledcay Emitessay appearay, omingcay intoay ethay
orystay ofay ankindmay, outay ofay Arabiaay, atthay angestray esertday ountrycay.  Eythay
amecay upay encethay intoay Abyloniabay, anday inay Abyloniabay, enwhay eythay amecay otay
itay, erethay asway alreadyay aay eoplepay ithway aay ighhay ivilisationcay, asay eway owknay
ybay evidencesay atthay avehay eenbay oundfay.  Itay asway ifferentday omfray ethay
ivilisationcay ofay ethay Emiticsay eoplepay.  Ethay amenay ivengay otay atthay earlieray
eoplepay anday atthay earlieray ivilisationcay isay Umeriansay, anday Iay {55ay} eallyray
oday otnay inkthay youay eednay oubletray otay inquireay eciselypray atwhay isay eantmay ybay
atthay, orfay evenay ethay ostmay earnedlay avehay eryvay ittlelay otay elltay usay aboutay itay.
Itay adhay otay avehay aay amenay.  Etlay usay allcay itay Umeriansay, anday aysay itay asway
ifferentday omfray ethay Emiticsay, obablypray olderay, anday osay eavelay itay.

Itay isay aay uriouscay ingthay aboutay esethay Emitessay, owhay atay aay eryvay earlyay ateday
amecay inay anday ooktay ossessionpay ofay allay Abyloniabay, atthay oughthay eythay
apparentlyay amecay omfray Arabiaay anday ethay outhsay, eythay ademay eirthay irstfay
appearanceay inay istoryhay inay ethay orthnay ofay Abyloniabay.  Owhay atthay appenedhay
eway annotcay elltay.  Erhapspay omesay ecordsray ofay aay outhernsay invasionay avehay
eenbay ostlay.  Oray eythay aymay avehay irtedskay oundray onay ethay easternay idesay.  Itay
isay allay uessgay-orkway.  Eythay appeareday inay ethay orthnay, anday eythay uicklyqay
overranay ethay ountrycay--otnay onlyay ofay Abyloniabay, utbay ofay Alestinepay anday ofay
Yriasay alsoay--exceptay, itay aymay ebay, aay ipstray ofay Yriasay alongay ethay
Editerraneanmay oreshay ichwhay isay alledcay onay ethay apmay Iciaphœnay.  Atthay isay
anay exceptionay ichwhay youay illway oday ellway otay earbay inay indmay.  Itay isay
importantay, ecausebay esethay Iciansphœnay elongedbay otay oneay ofay ethay
eatestgray ivilisationscay ofay ethay olday orldway, anday ecausebay eythay ootay ereway
eatgray akersmay ofay istoryhay, asay youay allshay eesay eforebay eryvay onglay.

[Idenotesay: "Uray ofay ethay Aldeeschay"]

Onay eirthay esternway orderbay, ereforethay, ethay eoplepay ofay ethay owerfulpay empireay
ichwhay eganbay otay ebay ormedfay alongay ethay Igristay anday Euphratesay adhay ibestray
eryvay oselyclay akinay otay emselvesthay.  Onay ethay eastay anday onay ethay orthnay eythay
adhay eighboursnay ofay aay ifferentday aceray omfray eirthay ownay.  Itay eemssay otay avehay
eenbay inay ethay outhsay ofay Abyloniabay, earnay ethay outgoingay ofay ethay eatgray
iversray, atthay ethay irstfay apitalcay ofay ethay empireay asway ormedfay.  Obablypray
isthay outhernsay Abyloniabay isay atthay "Uray ofay ethay Aldeeschay" omfray ichwhay eway
areay oldtay atthay Abrahamay amecay anday establisheday imselfhay inay Alestinepay.  Ehay
amecay, asay eway eesay, ivinglay ithway {56ay} ishay amilyfay anday ishay ependantsday inay
entstay, ithway ocksflay anday erdshay, easilyay ovingmay onay omfray oneay aceplay otay
anotheray enwhay ethay eepshay oray oxenay adhay eatenay ethay assgray oray enwhay aterway
ailedfay.  Ehay asway ethay atriarchpay (_aterpay_=atherfay, anday _archay_=ulerray), ethay
atherfay-ulerray ofay ethay allsmay ibetray oray argelay amilyfay atthay amecay ithway imhay.
Inay youray istoryhay ooksbay youay illway ometimessay eadray atthay "ocietysay asway inay
ethay atriarchalpay agestay."  Atthay eansmay atthay ethay eoplepay ofay omwhay ethay
istorianhay isay itingwray ereway ivinglay inay ethay ayway inay ichwhay Abrahamay anday ishay
ependentday eoplepay ivedlay; anday eway aymay ebay uresay atthay itay asway ethay ayway ofay
ifelay ofay ethay eatergray umbernay ofay osethay Emitessay owhay amecay upay omfray Arabiaay
anday ooktay ossessionpay ofay Yriasay anday Alestinepay atay aay eryvay earlyay ateday.
Eythay ooktay ossessionpay ofay ethay ountrycay ofay Abyloniabay alsoay, anday asay eythay
ettledsay alongay ethay ertilefay iverray-anksbay eway aymay imagineay atthay eythay ouldway
eginbay otay uniteay ogethertay intoay aay ationnay anday ecomebay ongstray, ithway aay
eelingfay ofay unionay, inay aay ayway atthay itay asway otnay atay allay ikelylay atthay ethay
allsmay ibestray ofay atriarchspay anday eirthay amiliesfay, ovingmay aboutay ithway
eirthay ocksflay anday erdshay, ouldway uniteay.  Osay ethay Abyloniansbay anday ethay
Yrianssay anday ethay ellersdway inay Alestinepay ouldway easilyay allfay intoay ethay ayway
ofay egardingray eachay otheray asay ofay ifferentday ationsnay, althoughay eallyray eythay
ereway ofay ethay amesay aceray.

Erethay ouldway ebay isthay ifferenceday, enthay: ethay ettlerssay alongay ethay iversray
eallyray ouldway eginbay otay eadlay ettledsay iveslay, ikelay ethay eoplepay owhay illedtay
ethay oilsay inay Egyptay, utbay eyondbay osethay imitslay erethay ouldway ebay anderersway,
ithway eirthay attlecay--anderersway orfay ethay ostmay artpay ofay ethay amesay aceray asay
ethay ettlerssay, utbay owinggray oremay anday oremay istinctday anday ividedday omfray
emthay inay annersmay anday eelingsfay asay imetay entway onay anday eythay ivedlay uchsay
ifferentday iveslay.

Iay okespay ofay esethay Abyloniansbay avinghay ustjay ethay amesay uzzlespay esentedpray
otay eirthay indsmay ybay atwhay eway allcay "ethay {57ay} orcesfay ofay Aturenay" asay ethay
Egyptiansay adhay, utbay aidsay atthay eythay answereday emthay aay ittlelay ifferentlyday.
Ethay Egyptiansay, asay eway awsay, iedtray eethray ifferentday indskay ofay answeray.
Eythay ademay aay eatgray odgay ofay ethay unsay, eythay ademay aay eatgray odgay ofay Osirisay,
owhay asway originallyay ustjay ethay odgay ofay oneay aceplay (ikelay anymay othersay), anday
eythay ademay odsgay ofay allay ortssay ofay animalsay.  Ownay, yingtray otay understanday
ethay eligionray ofay ethay ancientay Abyloniansbay, eway aymay uleray outay entirelyay allay
ideaay ofay animalay orshipway--atthay isay otay aysay, ethay irdthay indkay ofay answeray
ichwhay ethay Egyptiansay ademay otay eirthay uzzlespay.  Itay oesday otnay eemsay otay avehay
eenbay oughtthay ofay ybay ethay Abyloniansbay atay allay.  Etlay usay orgetfay osethay
acredsay atscay anday ocodilescray ofay ethay Ilenay.

[Idenotesay: Osirisay anday Aray]

Anday enthay, avinghay astcay emthay asideay, eway aymay eesay aay eryvay emarkableray
ikenesslay etweenbay ethay otheray uessesgay atthay ethay otway eoplespay ademay, anday ethay
ayway inay ichwhay eythay iedtray otay orkway ethay ifferentday uessesgay inay ithway oneay
anotheray.  Orfay youay aymay ememberray atthay ethay Egyptiansay, afteray ormingfay ethay
ideaay ofay Aray, ethay unsay-odgay--aay odgay atthay adhay ishay eyeay overay allay ethay
orldway--anday afteray imaginingay Osirisay otay ebay osay owerfulpay asay otay uleray
ivinelyday overay allay Egyptay: afteray eythay adhay usthay exalteday esethay otway odsgay
atay ethay expenseay ofay allay ethay othersay, eythay enthay eganbay otay egardray ethay otway
asay oneay--ethay oneay eingbay utbay oneay ormfay ofay ethay otheray--Osirisay, asay Aray,
aversingtray ethay eavenshay, anday Aray, asay Osirisay, ulingray ethay earthay.  Anday
incesay Aray, ethay Unsay, asway upposedsay otay ogay underay ethay earthay atay ightnay, inay
orderay otay etgay ackbay otay ethay eastay otay eginbay ishay ourneyjay acrossay ethay yskay
againay ethay extnay orningmay, erethay asway onay eatgray ifficultyday inay imaginingay
imhay, againay asay Osirisay, ulingray overay ethay eadday inay ethay underay-orldway alsoay.

Anday ownay, inay Abyloniabay, eway indfay atthay almostay exactlyay ethay amesay ingthay
appenedhay.  Amashshay asway eirthay amenay orfay ethay unsay-odgay, ethay Egyptiansay' Aray.
Enthay erethay asway aay {58ay} odgay omwhay eythay alledcay Erodachmay, oray Ardukmay: ehay
asway ethay odgay ofay Abylonbay.  Utbay Abylonbay asway otnay alwaysay aay eatgray itycay.
Ethay earliestay apitalcay itycay asway outhsay ofay Abylonbay.  Osay Ardukmay asway onlyay
asay oneay odgay amongay anymay.  Utbay enthay, asay Abylonbay ewgray anday ecamebay ethay
eatgray entrecay, Ardukmay amecay otay ebay egardedray asay ethay eatgray odgay ofay allay ethay
ountrycay, exactlyay asay adhay appenedhay ithway Osirisay inay Egyptay.  Anday enthay,
againay ustjay asay inay Egyptay, eythay eganbay otay ooklay onay Amashshay anday onay Ardukmay
asay otway ormsfay ofay oneay anday ethay amesay eatgray eityday.  Usthay, itay isay onderfulway
owhay ikelay eachay otheray ereway ethay uessesgay atay uthtray inay ethay otway empiresay.
Elbay-Erodachmay, asay ehay asway ometimessay alledcay (Elbay oray Aalbay eansmay Ordlay),
ecamebay ofay uchsay immenseay importanceay atthay ethay ingkay asway evernay onsideredcay
otay ebay operlypray appointeday asay ulerray untilay ehay adhay eenbay eceivedray ybay
Erodachmay atay Abylonbay, inay ethay odgay'say eatgray empletay erethay.  Ethay Assyrianay
ingskay, osewhay apitalcay asway Inevehnay, inay ethay orthnay ofay Abyloniabay, enwhay
eythay adhay onqueredcay eirthay ormerfay astersmay ofay Abylonbay, illstay amecay otay
Abylonbay anday aidpay eirthay omagehay otay ethay Abylonianbay odgay.

Utbay, againay asay inay Egyptay, erethay ereway aay umbernay ofay otheray odsgay esidesbay
Ardukmay, inay otheray acesplay, osewhay authorityay asway onsideredcay eryvay owerfulpay
ustjay inay esethay acesplay; anday erethay ereway otheray eavenlyhay odiesbay esidesbay
Amashshay, ethay unsay, atthay adhay orshipway.  Erethay asway Insay, ethay oonmay, anday
especiallyay erethay asway Ishtaray, ethay anetplay Enusvay, ethay Ashtarothay atthay youay
eadray ofay inay ethay Iblebay.  Ishtaray asway oddessgay ofay ethay ingspray anday ofay allay
ethay ifelay-ivinggay orcesfay inay Aturenay.

Anday inay Abyloniabay, asay inay Egyptay, erethay ereway immenseay umbersnay ofay iestspray,
anday eirthay owerpay asway eatgray.  Eythay ereway occupieday inay ethay eremoniescay otay
ethay odsgay, anday inay arecay ofay ethay emplestay, anday aay eatgray artpay ofay eirthay imetay
asway {59ay} akentay upay inay atchingway ethay arsstay anday anetsplay.  Eythay awsay atthay
anymay ofay ethay appeningshay onay earthay ependedday onay ethay eavenlyhay odiesbay--ethay
unsay ademay ethay eedsay owgray inay ethay ampday armway earthay; erhapspay eythay ewknay atthay
ethay oonmay affecteday ethay idestay.  Atay allay eventsay eythay awsay atthay ertaincay
eventsay onay earthay appenedhay atay ethay amesay imetay asay ertaincay otheray eventsay inay
ethay eavenshay; osay eythay ewgray otay inkthay atthay ethay earthlyay appeningshay ereway
ausedcay ybay ethay angeschay ofay ethay anetsplay inay ethay yskay arfay oremay anthay eythay
areay.

[Idenotesay: Astronomyay]

Utbay isthay istakenmay ideaay aboutay ethay influenceay ofay ethay arsstay onay ethay earthay
adhay ethay excellentay effectay atthay itay ademay esethay olday Abylonianbay iestspray otay
ebay eatgray arstay-azersgay.  Eythay ereway eatgray astronomersay, anday inay itespay ofay
eirthay errorsay ademay eatgray epsstay inay owledgeknay.  Anday ecausebay youay ancay ogay
eryvay ittlelay ayway inay astronomyay ithoutway athematicsmay, eythay ecamebay
athematiciansmay ootay.  Eway oweay aay eatgray ealday otay atwhay esethay iseway enmay ofay
ethay Eastay, atchingway ethay arsstay osay onglay agoay, oundfay outay orfay usay.

Omesay ofay ethay Abyloniansbay alsoay elievedbay inay earfulfay emonsday anday owerspay ofay
evilay, anday itay eemssay asay ifay eythay imagineday eirthay odsgay otay aketay uchmay oremay
oticenay ofay eirthay ehaviourbay, eirthay oodgay anday adbay onductcay, anthay ethay
Egyptiansay' odsgay ereway upposedsay otay aketay.  Eway awsay atthay ethay Egyptianay ideaay
asway atthay osay onglay asay eythay erformedpay allay ethay eligiousray itesray exactlyay,
atthay asway allay atthay ethay odsgay aredcay aboutay.  Utbay ethay Abyloniansbay oughtthay
atthay eirthay odsgay idday interestay emselvesthay aay eatgray ealday aboutay ethay ightray
oray ongwray onductcay ofay ethay enmay overay omwhay eythay uledray, anday unishedpay oray
ewardedray emthay inay isthay ifelay accordinglyay.

Anday oughthray allay isthay atthay Iay amay ellingtay youay aboutay ethay eligionray ofay ethay
earlyay Abyloniansbay, Iay antway youay otay earbay inay indmay atthay Abrahamay, ethay
ounderfay ofay ethay Ewishjay ationnay, amecay omfray "Uray ofay ethay Aldeeschay," atthay
isay, omfray ethay outhsay ofay Abyloniabay.  Atthay eansmay atthay ehay {60ay} amecay
arryingcay ithway imhay eliefsbay anday ustomscay atthay ehay anday ishay anclay (ifay Iay aymay
allcay itay osay) adhay earntlay inay Abyloniabay.  Ellingtay youay esethay Abylonianbay
eliefsbay, Iay amay eallyray ellingtay youay ethay originsay ofay ethay eliefsbay ichwhay
avehay omecay ownday otay usay oughthray ethay Israelitesay.  Atthay isay atwhay akesmay
eirthay orystay osay articularlypay interestingay orfay usay.

Ethay Abyloniansbay, enthay, adhay anay ideaay ofay aay eityday owhay unishedpay eirthay
ongwray-oingday ybay endingsay emthay illnessesay anday aminefay anday osay onay.  Ethay
Egyptiansay adhay otnay isthay ideaay earlynay osay earlyclay, utbay eythay adhay ethay ideaay
atthay ethay anmay owhay idday ellway inay isthay ifelay ouldway avehay ishay ewardray inay ethay
ifelay afteray eathday.  Ethay Abyloniansbay idday otnay avehay isthay ideaay ofay ethay ifelay
afteray eathday; eway indfay, atay eastlay, onay easonray otay inkthay atthay eythay adhay itay.
Abrahamay, ereforethay, amecay omfray Uray ithoutway isthay eliefbay inay aay ifelay afteray
eathday.  Itay asway onlyay atay aay arfay aterlay eriodpay--ossiblypay, oughthay ybay onay
eansmay ertainlycay, asay omethingsay eythay earnedlay omfray ethay Egyptiansay--atthay
ethay eliefbay inay aay uturefay ifelay amecay otay ethay Ewsjay anday Israelitesay.

Utbay althoughay Abrahamay oughtbray aditionstray omfray Uray, osay oonsay asay eway areay
alloweday otay owknay anythingay aboutay ethay eliefsbay eldhay ybay imhay anday ishay eoplepay
eway indfay emthay otay ebay eryvay uchmay oremay urepay anday eefray omfray uperstitionssay
anthay ethay Abylonianbay onesay.  Ethay Abylonianbay ideaay ofay ethay eationcray asway
atthay erethay asway atay irstfay aay eatgray agondray ofay odigiouspray izesay.  Erodachmay,
ethay iefchay ofay ethay odsgay, identifieday ithway ethay unsay, enthay oughtfay ethay
agondray, illedkay imhay, utcay imhay inay otway; ofay oneay alfhay ofay ishay odybay ademay ethay
irmamentfay ofay eavenhay, ofay ethay otheray alfhay ademay ethay earthay.  Enthay inay ethay
eavenshay, asay arsstay, ehay etsay ethay esserlay odsgay, ithway ethay oonmay.  Ethay oonmay
uledray ethay ightnay anday egulatedray ethay ivisionday ofay ethay yearay intoay onthsmay
(oonmay-ethsay).  Onamay isay ethay olday Angloay-Axonsay ordway orfay oonmay.

Isthay accountay isay inscribeday onay abletstay, anday osay uchmay isay {61ay} eadableray,
utbay erethay isay uchmay oremay ichwhay ashay umbledcray awayay osay atthay itay annotcay ebay
eadray.  Ethay accountay ofay ethay Eationcray ivengay inay Enesisgay isay, ofay oursecay,
eefray ofay allay isthay antasticfay accountay ofay ethay ightfay ithway ethay agondray.

[Idenotesay: Ethay Oodflay]

Erethay areay otheray Abylonianbay abletstay ichwhay ivegay anay accountay ofay ethay
Oodflay, utbay erehay againay eway indfay ethay ideaay atthay itay isay entsay otnay ybay oneay
eatgray odgay, utbay ybay everalsay odsgay, orkingway ogethertay.  Overay emthay allay
eemssay otay ebay ethay unsay-odgay, erehay alledcay Amashshay, owhay isay inay Eavenhay.  Ethay
oodflay isay osay eadfuldray atthay itay ompelscay ethay esserlay odsgay ivinglay onay ethay
earthay otay yflay otay Eavenhay orfay efugeray.  Erethay Ishtaray (Enusvay), akingtay itypay
onay ankindmay, ayspray Amashshay otay opstay ethay oodflay, anday ehay onsentscay otay oday
osay.  Oneay ofay ethay earthay odsgay adhay arnedway aay ertaincay anmay, amednay
Utay-apistimnay, atthay ethay oodflay asway omingcay, anday adviseday imhay otay akemay aay
ipshay otay avesay imselfhay omfray itay.  Osay Utay-apistimnay uiltbay ethay ipshay, ademay itay
aterway-ighttay ithway itchpay, utpay inay itay ishay amilyfay, airspay ofay allay ethay
animalsay, orkmenway anday aay ilotpay, anday osay eythay oatedflay orfay evensay aysday
untilay ethay ipshay amecay otay oundgray onay aay ountainmay otay ethay eastay ofay ethay
Igristay.  Enthay, apparentlyay afteray anotheray evensay aysday, Utay-apistimnay entsay
outay irstfay aay oveday, enthay aay allowsway, enthay aay avenray.  Ethay irstfay otway amecay
ackbay, utbay ethay astlay idday otnay, omfray ichwhay Utay-apistimnay oncludedcay atthay ethay
avenray adhay oundfay ydray oundgray omewheresay.

Youay illway eesay owhay ikelay isthay isay otay ethay orystay ofay Oahnay anday ethay Arkay inay ethay
Iblebay, anday almostay ertainlycay itay asway ithway omesay uchsay aditiontray asay isthay
inay eirthay indsmay atthay Abrahamay anday ishay eoplepay amecay omfray Uray.

Itay isay ymay urposepay, inay isthay orystay ofay ankindmay arounday ethay Editerraneanmay,
otay otherbay youay asay ittlelay asay ossiblepay ithway amesnay, eitheray ofay ersonspay oray
ofay acesplay, anday asay ittlelay asay ossiblepay ithway atesday, ecausebay ethay oremay eway
avehay ofay emthay, ethay oremay ifficultday itay ecomesbay otay ememberray osethay {62ay}
atthay areay eallyray importantay.  Orfay ethay yearsay eryvay arfay ackbay itay isay
impossibleay otay ixfay ethay atesday atay allay exactlyay.  Atwhay isay importantay isay otay
owknay inay atwhay orderay ethay eatgray eventsay inay ethay orystay appenedhay.

Ethay ateday atay ichwhay Abrahamay amecay outay ofay Uray anday ettledsay inay ethay outhernsay
artpay ofay atwhay asway afterwardsay alledcay Udahjay ashay eenbay eterminedday ybay
olarsschay otay avehay eenbay aboutay 2250ay oray 2300ay Bay.Cay.  Youay illway ememberray atthay
ethay ateday otay ichwhay eway oughtbray ownday ethay Egyptianay orystay asway aboutay 1500ay
Bay.Cay.  Osay Abrahamay amecay otay Alestinepay aboutay 750ay yearsay earlieray anthay atthay.

Abrahamay'say ateday isay oremay oray esslay ixedfay ybay ethay evidenceay ofay atwhay isay ybay
arfay ethay ostmay amousfay odecay ofay ancientay awslay anday ustomscay atthay ashay omecay
ownday otay usay, arfay eyondbay anythingay ofay ethay indkay atthay ashay eenbay oundfay inay
Egyptay, ethay odecay ofay Ammurabikhay.  Ammurabikhay asway ingkay ofay Abylonbay, anday
itay isay onsideredcay earlynay uresay atthay itay isay ehay owhay isay eantmay ybay "Amraphelay,
ingkay ofay Inarshay" entionedmay inay Enesisgay.  Ehay ivedlay atay ethay amesay imetay asay
Abrahamay.

[Idenotesay: Odecay ofay Ammurabikhay]

Ownay, isthay odecay, oray istlay, ofay awslay engraveday onay abletstay isay ostmay
interestingay otay usay otnay onlyay ecausebay itay isay ancientay, utbay alsoay ecausebay itay
isay osay eryvay odernmay.  Iay eanmay atthay althoughay esethay awslay ereway ademay osay eryvay
onglay agoay, eythay areay awslay ichwhay eway ouldcay eryvay earlynay acceptay asay uitablesay
orfay usay otay ivelay underay otay-ayday.  Ouray iveslay ouldway ebay eryvay ittlelay altereday
ifay eway ereway otay ytray otay eadlay emthay accordingay otay osethay awslay insteaday ofay
accordingay otay ethay awslay underay ichwhay eway actuallyay oday ivelay.

Ifay Ammurabikhay, inay 2250ay Bay.Cay., adhay esethay awslay engravenay, eway aymay ebay
earlynay uresay atthay eythay ereway ethay awslay ybay ichwhay ethay ountrycay asway overnedgay
anymay yearsay eforebay atthay.  Owhay onglay eforebay, eway annotcay elltay.  Abletstay onay
ichwhay omesay ofay emthay ereway ecordedray ereway oundfay inay {63ay} atwhay ashay eenbay
alledcay ethay ibrarylay (oughthay Iay oday otnay upposesay atthay erethay ereway exactlyay
atwhay eway ouldshay allcay ooksbay inay itay, anday ethay amenay "ibrarylay" omescay omfray
_iberlay_, aay ookbay)--ollectedcay ybay aay ertaincay eatgray ingkay ofay Assyriaay,
Assurbanipalay oray Ardanapalussay, ybay amenay, owhay eignedray inay Inevehnay, ichwhay
asway ethay apitalcay ofay Assyriaay, aboutay 700ay Bay.Cay. oray aay ittlelay aterlay.  Aay
eatgray anymay imilarsay ecordsray anday abletstay ollectedcay ybay isthay ingkay avehay
eenbay oundfay.  Utbay aay arfay oremay ompletecay istlay ofay ethay awslay asway oundfay aterlay
atay Usasay, aay itycay ichwhay asway afterwardsay alledcay Ersepolispay.

Otnay onlyay areay ethay awslay emselvesthay uchsay asay eway ightmay akemay anday useay, utbay
eythay eemsay otay owshay atthay erethay existeday inay Abylonbay atay atthay arfay-awayay imetay
aay ocietysay anday aay indkay ofay ifelay otnay atay allay unlikeay oursay.  Erethay ereway
octorsday, awyerslay anday erchantsmay, anday ethay eesfay ofay ethay octorsday anday ethay
aysway inay ichwhay ethay erchantsmay ereway otay arrycay onay eirthay adetray ereway ixedfay
ybay ethay awslay.  Itay isay earclay atthay erethay ereway aay eatgray anymay avesslay
employeday--atthay isay aay ifferenceday, ofay oursecay, omfray ouray ocietysay.  Ethay
unishmentspay orfay awlay-eakingbray ereway oremay everesay anthay oursay.  Urdermay isay
ethay onlyay imecray ichwhay eway ownay unishpay ithway eathday.  Inay Ammurabikhay'say odecay,
urglarybay anday ealingstay areay unishedpay ybay eathday; osay isay anyay attemptay otay
induceay itnessesway inay aay asecay atay awlay otay ivegay alsefay itnessway; anday erethay
areay umerousnay otheray offencesay orfay ichwhay eathday asway ethay unishmentpay inay
Abylonbay, utbay orfay ichwhay eway ouldshay akemay ethay offenderay aypay aay inefay oray ogay
otay isonpray orfay aay ilewhay.  Utbay eway avehay otay ememberray atthay itay isay otnay osay
eryvay anymay yearsay agoay evenay inay isthay ountrycay incesay aay anmay ouldcay ebay angedhay
orfay orgeryfay oray orfay ealingstay aay eepshay.  Ethay awslay ofay Ammurabikhay areay otnay
oremay everesay anthay oursay ereway otnay uchmay oremay anthay aay undredhay yearsay agoay.

Enwhay erethay ereway erfssay inay Englanday, abourerslay almostay {64ay} inay aay atestay ofay
averyslay, Englishay awlay ademay aay eatgray istinctionday etweenbay emthay anday
eemenfray.  Anay offenceay againstay ethay awslay, ifay ommittedcay ybay aay erfsay, asway
eryvay uchmay oremay eavilyhay unishedpay anthay ethay amesay offenceay ommittedcay ybay aay
eemanfray.  Anday eway indfay exactlyay ethay amesay istinctionday ademay inay isthay
ancientay odecay; ethay aveslay ufferssay arfay oremay eavilyhay anthay ethay eemanfray.

Omesay ofay ethay awslay owshay ethay importanceay ofay ethay analscay orfay ateringway ethay
andlay, anday eachay owneray ofay andlay esidebay aay analcay asway ademay esponsibleray orfay
ethay analcay ankbay ichwhay anray oughthray oray esidebay ishay opertypray.  Ifay ehay etlay
itay allfay intoay adbay epairray, anday ethay aterway, overflowingay, amagedday ishay
eighbournay'say andlay oray owneddray ishay eepshay, ehay adhay otay akemay oodgay ethay osslay
ausedcay otay ishay eighbournay.

Ethay awlay ofay "aay oothtay orfay aay oothtay" anday "anay eyeay orfay anay eyeay" ichwhay eway
indfay inay ethay Iblebay, inay ethay ookbay ofay Exodusay, eway indfay erehay ootay.  Ifay youay
ockedknay outay aay anmay'say eyeay inay aay ightfay, youay ouldway avehay otay ubmitsay otay
avinghay anay eyeay ofay youray ownay ockedknay outay.  Ifay youay ockedknay outay aay oothtay, aay
oothtay ofay yoursay ouldway ebay ockedknay outay.

Usasay, erewhay ethay ullfay odecay ofay Ammurabikhay asway oundfay, asway ethay apitalcay ofay
ethay ingdomkay ofay aay eoplepay alledcay Elamitesay, ofay omwhay youay earhay inay ethay
Iblebay.  Elamay aylay onay ethay easternay, ethay Ersianpay, idesay ofay Abyloniabay, anday
ethay Elamitesay avegay ontinualcay oubletray otay ethay Abylonianbay onquerorscay.
Ethay odecay isay utcay onay aay eatgray ockblay ofay ackblay onestay eightay eetfay ighhay.  Itay
isay inay ortyfay-ourfay olumnscay anday onsistscay ofay onay esslay anthay 3654ay ineslay--aay
engthylay ocumentday.  Anday atay ethay optay ofay itay erethay isay utcay ethay igurefay ofay
Ingkay Ammurabikhay eceivingray ethay abletstay ofay ethay awlay omfray Amashshay, ethay
eatgray unsay-odgay.  Itay ustmay emindray usay ofay Osesmay eceivingray ethay abletstay ithway
ethay Entay Ommandmentscay onay Ountmay Inaisay.

Erethay ancay ebay ittlelay oubtday atthay esethay awslay, oremay oray {65ay} esslay asay eythay
areay avengray onay isthay onestay, ereway osethay underay ichwhay ethay eatergray umbernay
ofay ethay Emiticsay ibestray ivedlay ichwhay inhabiteday Yriasay anday Alestinepay.
Amongay esethay ibestray ereway ethay Ewsjay.  Orfay isthay easonray eway aymay imagineay
atthay enwhay ethay Abyloniansbay ademay attacksay uponay emthay anday educedray emthay, asay
eythay idday omfray imetay otay imetay, otay ubmissionsay, eirthay ownay awslay anday ustomscay
ereway otnay uchmay altereday.  Eythay adhay otay aypay ibutetray, erhapspay, anday eirthay
omeshay ereway okenbray upay, anday omesay ofay emthay, ikelay ethay Ewsjay, ereway akentay
awayay intoay Abyloniabay, utbay eythay entway amongay aay eoplepay otnay altogetheray
ifferentday omfray emselvesthay eitheray inay ationalitynay oray inay eirthay aysway ofay
ivinglay.

[Idenotesay: Artay inay Abyloniabay]

Anday ustjay asay eway areay urprisedsay ybay ethay advanceday atestay ofay ivilisationcay
ichwhay esethay olday awslay owshay usay, osay eway avehay otay ebay onay esslay astonisheday ybay
ethay inefay orksway ofay artay ichwhay eythay ademay.  Onestay, asay eway avehay aidsay, asway
areray inay Abyloniabay; ereforethay eythay ookedlay onay itay asay eciouspray, anday eptkay
itay orfay engravingay.  Omesay ofay ethay utcay onesstay ofay eryvay earlyay ateday areay
inelyfay inishedfay.  Inay ethay Ouvrelay inay Arispay erethay isay aay endidlysplay orkedway
Abylonianbay asevay ithway aay untinghay enescay ofay ionslay uponay itay, anday itay isay
oughtthay otay avehay eenbay ademay onglay eforebay ethay imetay ofay isthay Ammurabikhay,
osewhay odecay eway avehay eenbay eakingspay ofay.  Erethay ereway ionslay inay isthay
ountrycay enthay, oughthay erethay areay onenay ownay.  Youay aymay ememberray anymay
eferencesray otay ionslay inay ethay Iblebay.

Eway owknay, enthay, atthay ethay Abyloniansbay adhay eirthay artistsay anday eirthay
orkersway inay oldgay.  Obablypray ethay oldgay amecay otay emthay eitheray oughthray Egyptay
oray acrossay ethay Edray Easay omfray Ubianay anday Africaay artherfay outhsay; Abyloniabay
adhay onay oldgay.  Omesay, oweverhay, aymay avehay omecay omfray ethay Eastay.  Eythay ademay
ornamentsay ofay ethay oldgay anday ofay ethay utcay onesstay, anday eirthay ostumecay ouldway
eemsay otay avehay eenbay ikelay atthay ofay ethay Egyptiansay, utbay ithway oremay owingflay
{66ay} irtsskay.  Eway avehay eensay atthay ethay Egyptiansay, ustjay aboutay ethay imetay
atthay eythay eganbay otay owknay oremay ofay ethay Abyloniansbay, atthay isay aay ittlelay
eforebay 1500ay Bay.Cay., eganbay otay engthenlay eirthay irtsskay alsoay.  Obablypray ethay
essesdray ofay ethay Abyloniansbay ereway oremay ichray inay ornamentay anthay ethay
Egyptianay.  Ithway othbay, asay ithway ethay ellersdway inay allay ethay armway imatesclay
ofay ethay orldway, erethay ancay ebay ittlelay oubtday atthay ethay essdray asway aay aturalnay
evelopmentday omfray ethay othclay oundray ethay oinslay--ethay irtsskay engthenedlay
ownwardsday anday omesay eciesspay ofay acketjay awndray onay overay ethay upperay artpay ofay
ethay odybay.  Oray aay onglay oberay ofay ightlay aterialmay, ichwhay Iay avehay ikenedlay otay
aay ightgownnay, asway utpay onay overay ethay ouldersshay anday unghay ownday otay ethay
anklesay, erhapspay, osay atthay itay idday orfay othbay irtskay anday acketjay inay oneay.  Otay
isthay itay ouldway ebay eryvay easyay anday aturalnay otay adday aay irdlegay oray ashsay, otay
ietay itay inay oundray ethay aistway anday eventpray itsay appingflay inay ootay
inconvenientay aay annermay.

[Illustrationay: ASSYRIANay INGkay INay IShay OBESray.]

Onceay youay etgay ethay onglay oberay, youay omecay otay omethingsay ichwhay ouldway eednay
eryvay ittlelay angechay otay ecomebay ethay ortsay ofay oberay ichwhay ethay Eeksgray anday
Omansray oreway--atwhay ethay Omansray alledcay ethay "ogatay."  Iay ouldshay inkthay esethay
onglay irtsskay ouldway ebay eryvay uchmay inay ethay ayway enwhay osethay owhay oreway emthay
antedway otay unray oray akemay anyay iftsway ovementmay, anday Iay upposesay atthay enwhay eway
eadray inay {67ay} ethay Iblebay ofay eoplepay "irdinggay upay eirthay oinslay," enwhay eythay
ereway oinggay onay anyay expeditionay, itay eansmay atthay eythay uckedtay upay esethay
irtsskay anday astenedfay emthay oundray ithway ethay irdlegay aboutay eirthay aistsway, osay
atthay eythay ouldshay otnay anghay arounday eirthay egslay.

[Idenotesay: Iseray ofay Assyriaay]

Inay orderay otay akemay isthay orystay easantplay anday easyay eadingray, asay itay oughtay otay
ebay, Iay avehay aidsay atthay Iay antway otay otherbay youay aboutay atesday asay ittlelay asay
ossiblepay, utbay itay isay ecessarynay otay aketay omesay oticenay ofay emthay.  Inay ethay
irstfay aceplay, orfay ethay understandingay ofay isthay articularpay artpay ofay ethay
eatgray orystay--ethay artpay atthay ashay otay oday ithway Abyloniabay--youay oughtay otay
owknay atthay ethay ateday atay ichwhay ethay Assyriansay, inay ethay ortheennay ectionsay ofay
ethay ountrycay, ithway eirthay apitalcay ofay Inevehnay, evoltedray againstay ethay uleray
ofay Abylonbay, otay ichwhay eway indfay atthay eythay ereway ubjectsay enwhay ethay orystay
opensay, asway aboutay 1900ay Bay.Cay.  Atthay isay otay aysay, aboutay 400ay yearsay eforebay
ethay eatgray eriodpay ofay ethay Egyptianay owerpay, atingday omfray 1500ay Bay.Cay., oray
ereaboutsthay.  Assyriaay, ichwhay atay irstfay asway ubjectsay otay Abylonbay,
evoltedray anday ecamebay astermay ofay Abylonbay aboutay 1900ay Bay.Cay. anday etainedray
atthay asterymay, ithway omesay upsay anday ownsday, orfay aboutay 1500ay yearsay.  Isthay
eatestgray orystay inay ethay orldway ealsday ithway igbay acesspay ofay imetay!  Enthay ethay
Assyrianay owerpay entway otay iecespay anday Abylonbay establisheday itselfay againay asay
ethay astermay owerpay aboutay ethay imetay ofay atthay Ebuchadnezzarnay ofay omwhay ethay
Iblebay ellstay usay.

Osay eway avehay otay ealiseray atthay enwhay, inay 1500ay Bay.Cay., oray atherray oonersay,
Egyptay anday Abyloniabay, accordingay otay ethay Egyptianay ecordsray, eganbay otay
ashclay againstay eachay otheray arderhay anthay everay eforebay, ithway ethay esultray ofay
ueezingsqay eryvay uncomfortablyay osethay Emiticsay ibestray inay Alestinepay, itay
asway aay Abyloniabay underay ethay Assyrianay ominationday.  Anday ethay Assyriansay
ereway aay oremay arway-ikelay eoplepay anthay ethay Abyloniansbay.  Eythay adhay aay
etterbay-ordereday anday oubtlessday {68ay} aay etterbay-equippeday armyay.  Eirsthay
eemssay otay avehay eenbay almostay atwhay eway ouldshay allcay aay ilitarymay atestay,
onstitutedcay orfay arway, anday eythay alledcay emselvesthay astersmay ofay ethay olewhay
ountrycay orthnay ofay ethay Ersianpay Ulfgay anday ofay Egyptay anday ofay allay eastay ofay ethay
Editerraneanmay Easay.

Inay ethay orystay ofay ankindmay eway indfay itay appeninghay againay anday againay atthay
afteray aay eoplepay avehay eenbay omfortablycay ettledsay orfay aay ilewhay inay ethay
ertilefay ainsplay anday iverray alleysvay eythay oselay ethay arlikeway abitshay ybay
eansmay ofay ichwhay eythay otgay ossessionpay ofay esethay oodgay andslay, anday areay
overthrownay ybay othersay omingcay omfray aay oremay ountainousmay anday arrenbay
ountrycay erewhay eythay avehay eenbay obligeday otay ivelay ardierhay iveslay.  Usthay,
esethay Assyriansay omfray ethay orthnay otgay ethay etterbay ofay ethay Abyloniansbay, anday
ethay Assyriansay inay eirthay urntay ereway onstantlycay eingbay oubledtray ybay ethay
attacksay ofay aay eoplepay alledcay ethay Ittiteshay, omfray artherfay orthnay againay.

Youay eadray ofay ethay Ittiteshay inay ethay Iblebay.  Otnay aay eryvay eatgray ealday isay
ownknay aboutay emthay, utbay itay isay ertaincay atthay eythay ereway aay eatgray owerpay inay
allay atthay ountrycay yinglay orthnay anday orthnay-estway ofay Assyriaay ichwhay isay ownay
alledcay Asiaay Inormay.  Eythay ademay incursionsay anday attacksay ownday outhsay, anday
itay isay obablepray atthay afteray eirthay eatgray attacksay ereway epulsedray eythay eftlay
omesay ofay eirthay ibestray inay ethay outhsay, eparatedsay omfray ethay estray ofay ethay
ationnay.  Inay ethay atterlay artpay ofay ouray orystay itay isay esethay atteredscay ibestray
atthay eway earhay ostmay aboutay.

[Idenotesay: Uneiformcay itingwray]

Ownay, ethay earliestay ofay ethay inscriptionsay ichwhay elltay usay anythingay aboutay
esethay eoplepay ofay Abyloniabay oesgay ackbay otay ethay imetay eforebay ethay Emitessay
adhay omecay upay omfray Arabiaay inay ethay outhsay.  Edimay, oray ethay ainplay ofay
Abyloniabay, omfray ichwhay eway aymay upposesay atthay ethay amenay Edenay, inay Enesisgay,
amecay, asway obablypray enthay inhabiteday ybay osethay Umerianssay ofay omwhay eway owknay
eryvay ittlelay.  Eway owknay ittlelay, utbay eway indfay inscriptionsay ybay emthay, anday
ethay inscriptionsay areay inay {69ay} aay eryvay uriouscay ormfay ofay itingwray, aay
itingwray ichwhay entway onay eingbay useday orfay ousandsthay ofay yearsay.  Itay isay
alledcay uneiformcay, omfray "uneuscay," eaningmay aay edgeway, ecausebay allay ethay
ineslay ofay ethay itingwray areay inclineday otay ogay intoay ethay apeshay ofay aay edgeway.

Youay illway ememberray omethingsay aboutay ethay Egyptianay ieroglyphichay anday
icturepay itingwray.  Obablypray allay itingwray eganbay inay isthay ayway, ithway akingmay
icturespay.  Enthay itay asway oundfay oublesometray otay akemay aay icturepay ofay
everythingay atthay youay antedway otay aysay, anday aay ewfay ashesday oray ineslay, eryvay
oughlyray epresentingray ethay ingthay, ereway useday insteaday, anday eganbay otay ebay
understooday asay andingstay orfay aay ignsay ofay atthay ingthay.

Isthay edgeway itingwray ofay ethay Abyloniansbay oubtlessday eganbay inay isthay ayway.  Iay
aysay oubtlessday, ecausebay omesay ofay itay isay almostay icturepay-itingwray, anday ethay
olderay ethay inscriptionsay ethay oremay ikelay actualay icturespay ofay ethay ingthay asay
eway eesay itay ethay ignssay areay.  Usthay, ethay ignsay ichwhay eythay ademay otay eanmay
eavenhay asway omethingsay ikelay isthay *, ichwhay eway allcay anay asteriskay, omfray
"asteray," eaningmay aay arstay.  Eythay ademay aay awingdray ikelay aay arstay otay ivegay ethay
ideaay ofay eavenhay, ecausebay eavenhay isay ethay aceplay erewhay ethay arsstay areay.  Ethay
aysray, asay eway allcay emthay, ofay ethay arstay, ereway oremay edgeway-apedshay anthay ethay
ineslay ofay ouray asteriskay, utbay atthay isay aay allsmay ifferenceday.  Itay isay aidsay
atthay enwhay ethay "ilusstay," ichwhay isay ethay ooltay eythay useday orfay akingmay ethay
inscriptionsay, isay useday otay akemay ethay arkmay ofay aay inelay onay etway ayclay, ethay
apeshay intoay ichwhay atthay arkmay ouldway aturallynay ogay isay atthay ofay aay edgeway;
eythay adhay uchmay ayclay orfay eirthay icksbray, anday eryvay ikelylay atthay isay ywhay eway
eesay isthay itingwray inay ethay ormfay atthay itay ashay.

Youay aymay ememberray owhay eway itedcay, asay anay instanceay ofay ethay ayway inay ichwhay ethay
Egyptiansay evelopedday eirthay itingwray, atthay eway adhay irstfay ethay icturepay ofay
anay eyeay, anday enthay {70ay} ethay icturepay ofay aay irdbay, anday, uttingpay ethay eyeay
eforebay ethay irdbay, eway otgay ethay ideaay "Iay eesay aay irdbay."  Ownay, inay uchmay ethay
amesay ayway, inay ethay edgeway-itingwray eway indfay atthay anay arrangementay ofay eethray
uprightay edgesway isay akentay asay ethay ignsay ichwhay eansmay "aterway."  Erethay isay anay
arrangementay ofay aay oodgay anymay edgesway ichwhay isay ethay ignsay atthay eansmay
"outhmay," anday isthay arrangementay isay inay uchsay aay apeshay atthay itay ustmay akemay usay
inkthay atthay itay amecay omfray anay originalay awingdray ofay aay outhmay.  Osay, avinghay
isthay ignsay orfay aterway anday isthay otheray ignsay orfay aay outhmay, atwhay esethay
uneiformcay iterswray idday enwhay eythay antedway otay akemay aay ignsay ichwhay ouldshay
eanmay "inkingdray" asway otay utpay ethay ignsay orfay aterway insideay ethay ignsay orfay
outhmay.  Aay oodgay ideaay!

Utbay allay isthay itingwray, osay arfay, oceededpray onay ethay anplay ofay akingmay ignssay
otay epresentray ingsthay atthay youay awsay oray ethay ideasay atthay amecay omfray atwhay youay
awsay.  Anday enthay, Iay imagineay, itay occurreday otay omesay inventiveay eniusgay otay
aysay, "Upposesay, insteaday ofay akingmay esethay ignssay otay epresentray ingsthay atthay
eway eesay, atthay eway akemay emthay epresentray oundssay--akemay emthay andstay orfay ethay
amesnay atthay eway allcay emthay ybay?  Ownay, upposesay eway aketay ethay ordway 'ogday':
(onlyay ehay, ofay oursecay, ouldway akemay useay ofay ethay Abylonianbay oundsay, ateverwhay
itay asway, ichwhay eythay useday orfay 'ogday').  "Upposesay eway aketay ethay ordway
'ogday,'" ehay aidsay, "anday upposesay eway aketay oneay ofay ouray ignssay, ichwhay eway useay
otay epresentray ingsthay, anday etlay itay andstay orfay ethay irstfay oundsay atthay eway
akemay inay ayingsay ethay ordway.  Upposesay atthay eway aketay anotheray ignsay otay andstay
orfay ethay econdsay oundsay, ethay iddlemay oundsay, inay ethay ordway, anday aay irdthay ignsay
otay andstay orfay ethay astlay oundsay."

"Ellway," ethay eoplepay otay omwhay ehay uggestedsay ethay ideaay ightmay aysay, "youay oday
otnay eemsay otay aingay uchmay ybay atthay.  Itay ouldway ebay uchmay implersay anday easieray
otay ogay onay akingmay ethay ignsay orfay aay ogday, asay eway alwaysay avehay oneday."

{71ay}

"Yesay," ehay ightmay answeray, "atthay isay uiteqay uetray, osay arfay asay itingwray aboutay
aay ogday, anday aay ogday onlyay, isay oncernedcay, utbay ethay advantageay atthay Iay aimclay
orfay ymay ideaay isay atthay esethay ignssay, ichwhay Iay aysay eway ightmay useay otay andstay
orfay ethay oundsay atthay eway akemay enwhay eway aysay 'ogday,' aymay ebay useday overay anday
overay againay, eneverwhay eway avehay otay akemay osethay oundssay.  Anday eway oday otnay
akemay aay eryvay argelay umbernay ofay ifferentday oundssay--otnay earlynay osay anymay asay
erethay areay ideasay anday objectsay atthay eway ishway otay itewray aboutay.  Osay, onay ymay
anplay, eway allshay otnay eednay earlynay osay anymay ignssay asay eway avehay eenbay usingay."

[Idenotesay: Ethay alphabetay]

Iay aketay itay atthay itay asway usthay, oray inay omesay ayway atherray ikelay isthay, atthay
atwhay eway allcay itingwray (atthay isay otay aysay, akingmay ignssay onay aperpay oray omesay
otheray ubstancesay otay epresentray ethay oundssay ybay ichwhay eway allcay ingsthay),
amecay otay aketay ethay aceplay ofay ethay oremay imitivepray ayway ofay endingsay essagesmay,
oray ofay akingmay ecordsray, ichwhay asway ybay awingdray icturespay ofay emthay.  Eway, asay
youay owknay, avehay entytway-ixsay ignssay, entytway-ixsay etterslay, inay atwhay eway allcay
ouray alphabetay--entytway-ixsay ignssay orfay ethay oundssay atthay eway akemay inay
eakingspay.  Ethay alphabetay isay alledcay osay omfray ethay irstfay otway etterslay
"alphaay" anday "etabay," orrespondingcay otay ouray "aay" anday "bay," inay ethay Eekgray
alphabetay.  Ifferentday alphabetsay avehay ifferentday umbersnay ofay etterslay,
andingstay orfay ifferentday oundssay.  Inay ouray ownay alphabetay eway owknay atthay ethay
amesay etterlay, atthay isay otay aysay ethay amesay ignsay, aymay andstay orfay ifferentday
oundssay.  Aketay ethay eryvay irstfay etterlay "aay," anday aketay ethay ordsway "atherfay,"
"aperpay," anday "anymay"; erethay youay avehay eethray uiteqay ifferentday oundssay orfay
eachay ofay ichwhay ethay oneay ignsay "aay" oesday ethay orkway.  Anay alphabetay ithway ignssay
enoughay otay includeay allay ethay oundssay eway akemay inay alkingtay ouldway ebay erriblytay
onglay.

Ethay uneiformcay itingwray asway inay useay upay otay ithinway 100ay yearsay ofay ethay irthbay
ofay Istchray, anday itsay useay extendeday {72ay} omfray eryvay arfay upay inay ethay orthnay ofay
Asiaay Inormay otay ethay Ersianpay Ulfgay anday awayay outhsay-estwardway ofay ethay Edray Easay
inay Upperay Egyptay.  Itay isay erethay oundfay onay omesay eryvay importantay abletstay ofay
ustjay aboutay atthay eatestgray ateday inay allay Egyptianay istoryhay, 1500ay.  Anday itay
asway inay useay orfay adingtray anday orrespondencecay omfray Elamay onay ethay easternay
oundarybay ofay Abyloniabay, ightray otay ethay Editerraneanmay Easay.

Usthay itay asway ofay arfay oremay eneralgay useay inay osethay olday aysday anthay ethay
icturepay-itingwray ofay ethay Egyptiansay.  Obablypray itay asway arfay oremay
onvenientcay.  Enthay, inay itsay urntay, itay ellfay outay ofay useay ecausebay ofay ethay
inventionay ofay aay odemay ofay itingwray oremay onvenientcay illstay, anday otnay unlikeay
oursay--omfray ichwhay, indeeday, oursay isay akentay.  Utbay atthay isay "anotheray
orystay," asay Udyardray Iplingkay ayssay.

Etlay usay ustjay aketay aay ooklay ownay anday eesay atwhay Abrahamay anday ishay escendantsday
ereway oingday inay isthay intervalay etweenbay eirthay omingcay upay omfray Uray, ichwhay
asway inay ethay andlay ofay ethay Aldeechay, inay ethay outhsay ofay Abyloniabay, anday ethay
yearay 1500ay Bay.Cay.  Ethay orystay illway otnay ebay onglay inay ethay ellingtay, ecausebay eway
owknay osay ittlelay aboutay itay.

Atwhay eway oday owknay isay atthay eythay ivedlay orfay anymay anymay yearsay inay ethay
outhernsay artpay ofay ethay ountrycay ichwhay, aterlay onay, asway alledcay Udahjay.  Eway
aymay imagineay atthay eythay increaseday anday ultipliedmay, illtay eythay ecamebay aay
argelay anday ormidablefay ibetray.  Itay isay oughtthay atthay eythay ayedstay inay isthay
Outhernsay Udahjay, eadinglay aay astoralpay ifelay, ithway eepshay anday attlecay, orfay
omesay 600ay yearsay.  Anday enthay erethay amecay uponay emthay aay imetay ofay aminefay, enwhay
erethay asway onay oodfay orfay eirthay eepshay oray oxenay anday eryvay ittlelay orfay
emselvesthay.  Utbay eythay ivedlay ightray onay ethay eatgray oadray ybay ichwhay ethay
aderstray anday erchantsmay avelledtray enwhay eythay entway omfray Egyptay intoay
Abyloniabay, oray _icevay ersâvay_, anday itay asway oldtay otay emthay atthay "erethay isay
orncay inay Egyptay."

{73ay}

Youay illway ememberray atthay, aboutay ethay orncay inay Egyptay, omfray ethay orystay ofay
Osephjay anday ishay ethrenbray, asay oldtay inay ethay Iblebay.  Anday ethay enday ofay atthay
orystay, asay youay owknay, isay atthay ethay olewhay ibetray--allay ethay ildrenchay ofay
Israelay, asay ethay Iblebay ayssay--ovedmay ownday intoay atthay "andlay ofay Oshengay"
ichwhay asway inay ethay orthnay-eastay ofay Egyptay.  Itay asway aay ountrycay ofay ichray andlay,
yinglay owlay.

Ownay, atwhay areay eway otay upposesay asway ethay easonray atthay ethay Egyptiansay alloweday
esethay oreignersfay otay omecay ownday, asay eythay idday, anday ettlesay onay isthay andlay
overay ichwhay eythay aimedclay otay uleray?  Eway aymay answeray atthay uestionqay inay isthay
ayway.

[Idenotesay: Ethay Epherdshay Ingskay]

Ifay ethay Israelitesay, asay eway ownay aymay allcay emthay--ethay ibetray ofay ichwhay Acobjay,
owhay asway alsoay alledcay Israelay, asway ethay eadhay--ereway inay ethay outhsay ofay Udahjay
orfay 600ay yearsay, etweenbay ethay imetay atthay eythay amecay omfray Aldæachay anday ethay
imetay atthay eythay entway intoay ethay andlay ofay Oshengay, itay ustmay avehay eenbay inay
omewheresay aboutay ethay yearay 1700ay Bay.Cay. atthay eythay ademay isthay aterlay ourneyjay.
Atthay isay 200ay yearsay eforebay ethay uleray ofay ethay amousfay eighteenthay ynastyday.
Anday inay 1700ay Bay.Cay. ethay ynastyday enthay ulingray inay Egyptay asway ethay osay-alledcay
Yksoshay ynastyday.  Itay asway alsoay alledcay ethay ynastyday ofay ethay Epherdshay
Ingskay.  Ethay Egyptiansay, asay eway avehay eensay, adhay ecomebay eakenedway asay aay
ationnay.  Eythay ereway onstantlycay uarrellingqay amongay emselvesthay, atherray asay
ethay olday Englishay aronsbay useday otay uarrelqay amongay emselvesthay oray againstay
ethay ingkay.  Ethay esultray asway atthay oreignfay invadersay amecay inay omfray imetay otay
imetay, inay ethay oursecay ofay ethay orystay, anday ooktay ethay ingshipkay orfay aay ilewhay,
excludingay allay ethay ativenay Egyptianay eatgray enmay omfray ethay onethray.

Esethay Yksoshay, owhay adhay ethay uleray inay Egyptay enwhay ethay Israelitesay ereway
elcomedway erethay, ereway invadersay ofay isthay indkay, oreignersfay owhay adhay eizedsay
ethay onethray anday ethay {74ay} owerpay.  Eythay ereway epherdsshay, ivinglay ethay
astoralpay ifelay--oughthay erhapspay eythay eftlay offay atthay enwhay eythay ecamebay ethay
ulersray ofay Egyptay--anday ereverwhay eythay amecay omfray, etherwhay irectday omfray
Arabiaay oray, asay isay oremay ikelylay, omfray artherfay orthnay, obablypray omfray
Yriasay, allay olarsschay areay, Iay inkthay, agreeday atthay eythay ereway Emitessay.
Osephusjay, ethay istorianhay ofay ethay Ewsjay, assertsay atthay eythay actuallyay ereway
ethay Israelitesay.  Odernmay istorianshay inkthay imhay istakenmay erethay.  Utbay,
oughthay otnay Israelitesay, eythay ereway almostay ertainlycay ofay ethay amesay Arabianay
originay.

Anday erethay youay avehay ethay answeray otay ethay uestionqay owhay itay amecay aboutay atthay
ethay Israelitesay oundfay aay elcomeway inay Egyptay.  Ethay owerfulpay eoplepay inay ethay
ountrycay ereway eirthay elationsray.

Anday osay ingsthay entway ellway ithway emthay orfay anymay yearsay, erhapspay aboutay eethray
oray ourfay undredhay; utbay otheray owerspay--"aay Araohphay atthay ewknay otnay
Osephjay"--atay engthlay ewthray offay ethay yokeay ofay ethay Yksoshay, ethay Epherdsshay,
anday ooktay ethay onethray omfray emthay.  Ethay Israelitesay ereway ownshay onay avourfay
enthay.  Eythay ereway etsay ardhay askstay, ereway eatedtray ikelay avesslay, untilay
inallyfay, underay ethay eadershiplay ofay aay eryvay eatgray anmay anday ophetpray, Osesmay,
eythay ecidedday otay eeflay awayay intoay ethay esertday, awayay omfray ethay andlay ofay
Oshengay, inay ichwhay eythay ereway ademay osay unhappyay, althoughay itay asway aay ertilefay
andlay.

[Idenotesay: Afteray ethay Exodusay]

Obablypray eythay ereway eryvay usefulay avesslay anday illerstay ofay ethay oilsay, anday
obablypray atthay asway ethay easonray ywhay, asay eway areay oldtay inay ethay Iblebay,
Araohphay asway osay unwillingay otay etlay emthay ogay.  Atay engthlay, oweverhay, ogay eythay
idday--onlyay, asay eway areay urtherfay oldtay, otay ebay ursuedpay, anday onlyay, asay ethay
Iblebay alsoay ellstay usay, otay ebay avedsay ybay aay iraclemay atay ethay assagepay ofay ethay
Edray Easay.

Isthay Exodusay, asay itay isay alledcay, obablypray ooktay aceplay inay 1200ay Bay.Cay. oray aay
ittlelay earlieray, anday ethay Israelitesay anderedway {75ay} omesay ortyfay yearsay inay
ethay ildernessway, ivinglay inay entstay, anday ovingmay aboutay asay ethay annermay ofay
astoralpay ibestray asway, anday isay, ithway eirthay ocksflay anday erdshay.  Eway eesay,
enthay, atthay 1150ay Bay.Cay. oray aay ewfay yearsay oonersay, ouldway ebay aboutay ethay ateday
atay ichwhay eythay ouldway eginbay, underay Oshuajay, ethay invasionay ofay Anaancay.  Ouray
orystay ashay otnay eachedray atthay ointpay yetay.




{76ay}

APTERcHay Vay

EtHay INOANSmay INay ETEcRay

Osethay, enthay, ereway ethay otway eatgray owerspay onay andlay inay ethay eryvay olday aysday
ofay ethay orystay ofay ankindmay.  Erethay asway Egyptay alongay ethay Ilenay, anday
Abyloniabay--orfay aay ousandthay anday oremay yearsay, atherray otay ebay alledcay
Assyriaay--alongay ethay Euphratesay anday Igristay.

Utbay erethay asway alsoay yetay aay irdthay owerpay, eryvay eatgray, eryvay ancientay, anday
ighlyhay ivilisedcay, aay easay-owerpay, ithway itsay apitalcay inay ethay igbay islanday,
ichwhay youay illway ecsay onay ethay apmay, yinglay otay ethay outhsay ofay Eecegray, Etecray.

Youay illway observeay, erhapspay, atthay itay uiteqay agreesay ithway allay atthay eway indfay
inay ethay aterlay orystay ofay ankindmay, atthay aay ationnay ivinglay onay anay islanday
ouldshay ebay owerfulpay atay easay.  Otay-ayday youay eesay ethay eatgray easay-owerspay,
ourselvesay anday Apanjay.  Eway ivelay onay islandsay atthay areay allsmay enwhay omparedcay
ithway ethay andslay ofay Ermanygay, Ancefray, Americaay, Ussiaray, Inachay; utbay eway
avehay oremay owerpay inay ipsshay anday eamensay.  Erhapspay Americaay isay oinggay otay
avehay aay eatergray owerpay anthay Apanjay, utbay atay ethay imetay atthay Iay amay itingwray
eshay ashay otnay.

Itay isay onlyay ofay atherray ecentray yearsay atthay eway avehay omecay otay owknay uchmay
aboutay isthay eryvay ancientay Etancray ivilisationcay, anday ieflychay itay isay owingay
otay ethay orkway ofay aay eatgray antiquaryay, Irsay Arthuray Evansay, atthay eway avehay
iscoveredday ethay orystay.  Itay ustmay ebay eryvay interestingay otay ebay anay antiquaryay
anday otay igday--oray otay orderay aay anggay ofay iggersday otay {77ay} igday underay youray
irectionsday--anday otnay otay owknay atwhay youay aymay ebay oinggay otay urntay upay extnay:
ownay aay oldgay earay-ingray, ownay aay onzebray ordsway, ownay ethay edgeay ofay aay orkedway
onestay atthay aymay ebay ethay ornercay-onestay ofay aay uildingbay ichwhay oremay iggingday
aymay ovepray otay ebay oneay ofay ethay eatestgray anday ostmay arvellousmay uildingsbay inay
ethay orldway!

[Idenotesay: Ossosknay]

Itay oundssay ikelay aay airyfay orystay; utbay itay asway aay airyfay orystay ichwhay Irsay
Arthuray Evansay ademay omecay uetray atay aay aceplay inay Etecray erewhay ethay ancientay
itycay ofay Ossosknay useday otay ebay.  Ehay oundfay onderfulway ingsthay--anay immenseay
alacepay, aay aceplay ichwhay inscriptionsay, alsoay erethay iscoveredday, owshay otay
avehay eenbay aay empletay ofay ethay odsgay asay ellway.  Ethay ingkay, itay isay evidentay, asway
ighhay-iestpray asay ellway asay ingkay: eway avehay eensay atthay unionay ofay ethay otway
officesay, ethay ingkay'say anday ethay iestpray'say, eforebay, othbay inay Egyptay anday inay
Abyloniabay.  (Enwhay Iay aysay eforebay, Iay eanmay atthay Iay otewray ofay itay earlieray inay
ethay orystay.  Iay oday otnay eanmay atthay itay amecay anyay earlieray inay ethay imetay ofay itsay
actualay appeninghay.) Erethay isay evidenceay otay owshay atthay ethay Etancray eoplepay
ereway ivilisedcay, ouldcay akemay inefay orksway ofay artay anday osay onay, ightray ackbay otay
ethay eryvay earliestay ateday atay ichwhay ethay evidencesay omfray ethay eoplespay ivinglay
alongay ethay iverray-oursescay avehay anythingay otay owshay usay.  Aybemay ethay Etanscray
acquireday eirthay ivilisationcay evenay earlieray anthay ethay othersay.

Eway annotcay ebay uresay ofay atthay.  Atwhay eway ancay ebay uresay ofay isay atthay anay
enormousay umbernay ofay yearsay agoay eythay ereway arvellousmay engineersay anday
architectsay, asay ellway asay orkersway ofay ornamentsay, anday ofay inefay otterypay anday
azedglay areway.  Ethay alacepay atay Ossosknay isay anay immenseay aceplay, ithway eatgray
olumnscay, allsway, allshay.  Eway onderway asay uchmay atay ethay endidsplay imaginationay
ofay ethay architectay owhay ouldcay anplay uildingsbay onay uchsay aay andgray alescay osay
eryvay onglay agoay asay eway oday atay ethay engineeray'say owerpay otay orkway anday iftlay intoay
ositionpay uchsay ugehay onesstay asay eway indfay ereway useday inay ethay uildingbay.  Anday
{78ay} ethay elicacyday ofay ethay inishfay isay onderfulway ootay.  Itay isay otnay onlyay ethay
astnessvay ofay ethay izesay atthay amazesay usay.  Atthay isay ethay iefchay onderway ofay ethay
Egyptianay yramidspay.  Utbay ethay uildingsbay anday otheray emainsray inay Etecray areay
oremay onderfulway illstay.

Isthay Etancray ivilisationcay atay osay eryvay earlyay aay ateday akesmay anay
extraordinaryay apterchay inay ethay orldway'say orystay.  Itay ouldway illstay avehay eenbay
aay orystay eryvay extraordinaryay ifay itay adhay eenbay onlyay ustjay ethay orystay ofay atwhay
appenedhay inay ethay islanday ofay Etecray, anday idday otnay eadspray eyondbay itay.  Utbay,
asay aay attermay ofay actfay, itay idday eadspray eryvay arfay eyondbay atthay islanday.  Itay
eadspray outay orthnay, eastay, outhsay, anday estway--upay intoay Eecegray, acrossay otay
Yriasay, ownday otay Egyptay, anday awayay otay Icilysay.

Inay youray ooksbay youay areay ikelylay otay eadray aboutay allay isthay asay "ethay Inoanmay
ivilisationcay."  Obablypray erethay eallyray asway omesay eatgray ingkay ofay olday inay
Etecray osewhay amenay asway Inosmay.  Itay isay ossiblepay atthay erethay ereway anymay ofay
ethay amenay, anday atthay allay ethay ingskay ofay ishay ynastyday ereway alledcay Inosmay,
ithway omesay otheray amenay esidesbay otay istinguishday emthay.  Oweverhay atthay aymay
ebay, ethay Etancray egendarylay orystay asway atthay Inosmay asway aay eryvay eatgray ingkay,
alfhay ivineday, owhay avegay awslay anday ethay artsay ofay ivilisationcay otay ishay
eoplepay, atherray asay Ammurabikhay asway upposedsay otay avehay ivengay awslay otay ethay
Abyloniansbay.  Anday, againay ikelay Ammurabikhay, Inosmay asway upposedsay otay avehay
eceivedray esethay awslay omfray aay eityday, ethay eatestgray eityday atthay ethay
Inoansmay, asay eythay ereway alledcay, ewknay.  Utbay isthay eityday ofay eirsthay asway
upposedsay otay ebay emalefay, aay oddessgay, ethay oddessgay Ishtaray ofay ethay
Abyloniansbay--ethay Ashtarothay ofay ethay Iblebay.  Ethay Etanscray, oweverhay, ademay
erhay ethay iefchay ofay allay ethay odsgay.  Ethay Abyloniansbay eldhay erhay inay econdsay
aceplay, asay ousespay ofay ethay iefchay odgay Amashshay, ethay unsay-odgay.

Esethay endidsplay uildingsbay ofay ethay Inoansmay, asay eythay {79ay} avehay eenbay
iscoveredday orfay usay ybay ethay iggerday, avehay aay uchmay oremay odernmay, aay uchmay esslay
angestray, appearanceay anthay osethay eitheray ofay Abyloniabay oray ofay Egyptay.  Ethay
Abylonianbay uildingsbay especiallyay ooklay otay usay, asay eway akemay icturespay ofay
emthay inay ouray indsmay, ikelay alacespay ofay omesay eatgray ogreay.  Ethay upportssay atay
eachay idesay ofay ethay oorsday anday atesgay areay eryvay oftenay inay ethay ormfay ofay ugehay
ingedway ullsbay.  Umanhay eadshay anday iguresfay ofay olossalcay izesay areay otay ebay
eensay everywhereay.  Anday ethay umanhay eadshay avehay enerallygay eatgray eardsbay,
anday erhapspay ethay estray ofay ethay airhay orkedway upay intoay aay uaresqay atternpay,
ithway urlscay, osay atthay eythay ooklay orriblehay.  Allay ethay insidesay ofay ethay
Abylonianbay alacespay eemsay otay avehay eenbay adorneday ithway enormousay untinghay
enesscay, orkedway inay aay indkay ofay ypsumgay ichwhay asway oundfay inay ethay ountrycay.  Iay
inkthay eway ouldshay eelfay erriblytay afraiday ifay eway uddenlysay oundfay ourselvesay
inay anay ancientay Abylonianbay alacepay oray evenay anay Egyptianay oneay.

Utbay Iay elievebay atthay eway ouldshay eelfay eryvay uchmay appierhay anday oremay atay omehay
ifay eway ouldcay ebay ansportedtray uddenlysay intoay oneay ofay ethay olday Inoanmay
alacespay.  Anday Iay elievebay atthay Iay ancay akemay aay uessgay ywhay atthay isay osay.

[Idenotesay: Etancray architectureay]

Ethay Abylonianbay anday ethay Egyptianay ylestay ofay uildingbay asway oundfay inay esethay
otway ountriescay, utbay eithernay Abyloniansbay ornay Egyptiansay entway uchmay acrossay
ethay easay--ethay Editerraneanmay Easay.  Utbay esethay Etanscray, asay Iay avehay aidsay,
ereway eatgray easay-oersgay.  Eythay ereway ethay eatgray avalnay owerpay inay ethay
Editerraneanmay.  Osay eythay entway, anday arriedcay ithway emthay eirthay ideasay anday
eirthay aysway ofay uildingbay, everywhereay.  Ethay effectay ofay atthay isay eensay ostmay
ofay allay erhapspay atay ethay itesay ofay anay olday Eekgray itycay onay ethay ainlandmay ofay
Eecegray, Ycenæmay, erewhay eatgray excavationsay avehay eenbay ademay.  Utbay ethay
effectay isay oundfay inay anymay otheray acesplay ootay.  Osay itay ashay omecay ownday
oughthray ethay Eeksgray anday oughthray ethay Omansray, anday ashay eenbay inay ethay indsmay
{80ay} anday inay ethay eyesay ofay aterlay uildersbay, althoughay ethay uildersbay ereway
enerallygay, asay eway aymay upposesay, otnay atay allay awareay atthay eythay oweday
anythingay otay esethay uildersbay ofay osay anymay ousandsthay ofay yearsay agoay.

Itay isay aay uriouscay ingthay atthay inay Egyptay, inay Abyloniabay, anday alsoay inay Etecray,
omesay ofay ethay eryvay oldestay uildingsbay anday omesay ofay ethay eryvay oldestay orksway
ofay artay areay ethay estbay.  Eway avehay aay omfortablecay ideaay inay ouray indsmay atthay
eway--atthay isay otay aysay, ankindmay--avehay eenbay akingmay ogresspray, avehay eenbay
improvingay, allay oughthray ethay orystay; utbay unfortunatelyay erethay areay omesay
ingsthay inay ichwhay eway oday otnay eemsay otay avehay improveday--omesay indskay ofay orkway
inay ichwhay ethay oldestay isay ethay estbay.

Anday asay Iay avehay aidsay atthay ethay ancientay uildingsbay oundfay inay Etecray areay ofay aay
ylestay atthay oesday otnay ooklay earlynay osay angestray otay usay asay ethay ancientay
uildingsbay ofay ethay ountriescay onay ethay ainlandmay, osay ethay Inoanmay engravingsay
owshay usay ethay eoplepay ofay atthay eryvay arfay-offay imetay esseddray inay aay ashionfay
atthay eemssay almostay amiliarfay otay usay.  Eythay oday otnay ooklay earlynay osay angestray
asay ethay eoplepay atthay eway eesay icturedpay anday avengray onay ethay allsway ofay osethay
otheray alacespay anday ombstay anday emplestay.

Eway indfay anymay evidencesay, anday evidencesay ofay anymay ifferentday indskay, ofay ethay
easay-aringfay abitshay ofay ethay ancientay Etanscray, anday ofay eirthay eatgray owerpay.
Eway indfay Inoanmay orksway ofay artay inay ethay ombstay ofay Egyptianay ingskay, anday
Egyptianay ornamentsay inay ethay Inoanmay alacespay.  Eway indfay, asay Iay avehay aidsay,
ethay Inoanmay onzebray orkway asay arfay otay ethay estway asay Icilysay.  Athensay, ethay
eatgray Athensay ofay Eecegray, eemssay otay avehay eenbay ubjectsay otay ethay Inoansmay anday
otay avehay aidpay ibutetray otay emthay.  Anday aay eryvay uelcray ormfay omesay ofay atthay
ibutetray ooktay.  Accordingay otay ethay olday istorianshay, eythay adhay otay endsay
evensay aidensmay anday evensay youthsay eachay yearay otay Etecray; anday eway eemsay otay ebay
ableay otay uessgay ethay urposepay orfay ichwhay eythay ereway entsay.

{81ay}

Ethay egendlay isay atthay eythay adhay otay ebay entsay eachay yearay otay ebay evouredday ybay,
oray ebay acrificedsay otay, aay Etancray onstermay alledcay ethay Inotaurmay.  Ethay amenay
Inotaurmay isay omfray Inosmay anday aurostay, eaningmay aay ullbay.  Itay asway iguredfay asay
aay alfhay umanhay, alfhay ullbay-ikelay onstermay.

[Idenotesay: Ethay Abyrinthlay]

Oneay ofay ethay ostmay amousfay ofay ethay uildingsbay iscoveredday ybay ethay iggersday inay
Etecray isay ethay Abyrinthlay, aay uildingbay ofay anay immenseay umbernay ofay assagespay
inay ichwhay youay ereway almostay ertaincay otay oselay youray ayway ifay youay idday otnay owknay
itay.  Youay ouldway ebay ostlay, anday evernay omecay ackbay, anday ethay Inotaurmay asway
upposedsay otay ivelay inay isthay Abyrinthlay, anday youay ouldway anderway aboutay erethay
illtay ehay amecay uponay youay anday illedkay youay.

[Illustrationay: OINcay OFay OSSOSkNay (OWINGsHay ABYRINTHlay).]

Isthay egendlay ofay ethay Inotaurmay anday ethay Abyrinthlay isay articularlypay orthway
attendingay otay ecausebay itay owsshay usay osay ellway owhay ethay unrealay oriesstay ewgray
upay outay ofay ethay ealray, anday owhay eway areay ometimessay ableay otay indfay outay ethay
ealray uthtray underay ethay unrealay orystay.

Erethay asway isthay ealray Abyrinthlay inay Etecray; anday isthay ibutetray ofay evensay
aidsmay anday evensay youthsay asway, eway aymay ebay olerablytay uresay, emandedday ofay ethay
Atheniansay.  Oneay oray oremay ofay ethay awingsdray onay ethay Inoanmay alacepay allsway
owshay ullbay-ightsfay oinggay onay, anday inay ethay ullbay-ingray areay otnay onlyay enmay, utbay
alsoay aidensmay, ightingfay ethay ullbay.  Oneay oesday otnay owknay etherwhay allay ethay
Athenianay aidensmay anday youthsay ereway intendeday orfay isthay ullbay-ightingfay, utbay
itay isay exceedinglyay ikelylay atthay anymay ofay emthay ereway ondemnedcay otay itay, ustjay
asay isonerspray ofay arway anday othersay ereway ademay otay ightfay ionslay inay ethay
amphitheatreay atay Omeray.  Anday outay ofay isthay actfay, ofay ethay aidensmay anday
youthsay inay ethay ullbay-ingray, ightmay eryvay easilyay owgray ethay orystay ofay ethay
Inotaurmay--ethay ullbay-onstermay ofay Inosmay--anday ishay ictimvay.

{82ay}

Owhay Eseusthay ewslay ethay Inotaurmay anday oundfay ishay ayway outay ofay ethay Abyrinthlay
ybay aay ueclay ivengay imhay ybay Ariadneay, ethay ingkay'say aughterday, owhay adhay allenfay
inay ovelay ithway imhay, isay allay aay urtherfay ancyfay atthay ewgray upay outay ofay ethay
olidsay actsfay ofay ethay Abyrinthlay anday ethay ullbay-ightingfay.

Itay isay eryvay onderfulway atthay esethay ancientay eoplepay ouldshay avehay eenbay ableay
otay akemay eirthay owerpay eltfay osay arfay omfray eirthay omehay islanday, ecausebay ofay
ethay ifficultyday inay ossingcray ethay openay eassay.  Eirthay ipsshay ereway opelledpray
ybay ethay oarsay ofay owersray anday ybay ethay indway inay ethay ailssay enwhay ethay indway asway
inay eirthay avourfay--atthay isay otay aysay, asway owingblay inay ethay irectionday inay
ichwhay eythay antedway otay ogay.  Ethay ailssay ofay odernmay ailingsay esselsvay areay osay
arrangeday atthay ouray ipsshay ancay ailsay upay intoay ethay indway, asay itay isay alledcay.
Eythay ancay ogay inay aay irectionday atay ightray anglesay otay ethay irectionday ofay ethay
indway eryvay easilyay, anday evenay enwhay itay isay aay ittlelay opposeday otay emthay, ybay
eansmay ofay ettingsay ethay ailssay osay asay otay atchcay ethay indway idesay-aysway.  Utbay
erethay isay onay evidenceay atthay ethay Inoansmay ereway ableay otay oday isthay, anday eway
owknay atthay inay arfay aterlay aysday ofay ouray orystay onay uchsay eviceday asway useday.
Eythay adhay aay uarishsqay-apedshay ailsay attacheday otay ethay astmay, oremay ikelay ouray
uglay-ailsay anthay anyay otheray indkay ofay iggingray atthay isay useday ownay.  Anday yetay,
ithway esethay oorpay appliancesay, eythay entway otay Egyptay, otay Yriasay, anday otay
Icilysay, anday onay oubtday artherfay estway againay.  Anday eythay entway inay umbersnay,
orfay otherwiseay eythay ouldway otnay avehay eenbay ableay otay ubjugatesay ethay ativenay
eoplepay asay eway owknay atthay eythay idday atay Athensay.

[Idenotesay: Ethay iratespay]

Eway aymay upposesay atthay eythay entway orfay aay oubleday urposepay--orfay adetray anday
alsoay orfay iracypay, otay aketay orciblefay ossessionpay ofay atwhay eythay antedway
ereverwhay eythay oundfay itay.  Inay osethay aysday, anday orfay aay onglay imetay
afterwardsay, itay oesday otnay eemsay asay ifay eythay adhay anyay ideaay atthay itay asway
ontrarycay otay atwhay asway ightray anday ustjay otay aketay anythingay atthay eythay ereway
ableay otay aketay omfray anotheray ationnay.  Anyay {83ay} ideaay ofay atwhay eway allcay
internationalay usticejay asway eryvay ittlelay oughtthay ofay, ifay oughtthay ofay atay
allay.  Eythay ouldcay, anday eythay idday, akemay awslay amongay emselvesthay ichwhay
urprisesay usay ybay eirthay usticejay, utbay esethay awslay ereway orfay eachay ationnay
itselfay.  Eway avehay eensay ethay ideaay ofay aay inglesay odgay, upremesay overay aay olewhay
ationnay, eldhay atay imestay ybay emthay, utbay evenay atthay idday otnay eanmay atthay eythay
adhay anay ideaay ofay aay inglesay odgay upremesay overay ethay olewhay ofay ethay orldway.  Ehay
asway aay ationalnay odgay onlyay, anday ifay ethay ideaay ofay ethay ivineday awlay asway usthay
ationalnay onlyay, itay asway otnay ikelylay atthay eythay ouldway avehay ethay ideaay atthay
anyay awslay ademay ybay anmay ereway otay ebay obeyeday eyondbay ethay imitslay ofay ethay
ationnay ybay ichwhay eythay ereway ademay.

Osay eway aymay ebay uresay atthay esethay ancientay Inoansmay ereway atwhay eway ouldshay allcay
iratespay.  Eythay eptsway ethay easay inay eirthay ipsshay attackingay anday apturingcay
ethay ipsshay ofay otheray eoplespay ereverwhay eythay oundfay emthay, anday andinglay anday
akingmay oraysfay onay ethay ainlandmay uchmay asay ethay Ikingsvay ofay Orwaynay idday
arounday ouray ownay oresshay atay aay arfay aterlay ateday.  Anday isthay atestay ofay ingsthay
inay ethay Editerraneanmay isay orthway articularpay attentionay ecausebay esethay
iratespay, ofay oneay ationnay oray anotheray, illway ebay oundfay activelyay atay orkway allay
oughthray ethay agespay ofay isthay eatgray orystay ofay ankindmay.  Ethay Editerraneanmay
asway otnay eedfray omfray emthay untilay aay eryvay ecentray ateday.

Ownay, atthay iracypay, ogethertay ithway ethay ylestay ofay architectureay anday ethay
akingmay ofay allersmay orksway ofay artay ichwhay eythay actisedpray, areay ethay otway
eatgray actsfay otay ememberray aboutay isthay onderfulway ivilisationcay ofay ethay
ancientay Inoansmay.  Orfay ustjay aboutay ethay yearay 1500ay Bay.Cay., atay ichwhay eway eftlay
ethay orystay ofay Egyptay, oray aay ittlelay aterlay, omesay erribletay atastrophecay
overtookay ethay Inoansmay.  Atwhay appenedhay eway oday otnay owknay.  Itay ashay eenbay
uessedgay atthay eythay ufferedsay anay invasionay anday aay ompletecay overthroway {84ay}
ybay ethay Oriansday, aay eoplepay owhay adhay omecay ownday omfray ethay orthnay anday adhay
akentay ossessionpay ofay atthay outhernsay artpay ofay Eecegray ichwhay isay alledcay ethay
Eloponnesepay.  Utbay othingnay isay ertainlycay ownknay, exceptay atthay ethay Inoansmay
idday uffersay aay eryvay ompletecay overthroway, atthay eirthay owerpay asway atteredshay,
eirthay endidsplay uildingsbay ereway estroyedday, anday eythay eemsay otay anishvay outay
ofay ethay orystay altogetheray.  Eirthay onquerorscay ereway evidentlyay aay eoplepay
arfay esslay ivilisedcay anday accomplisheday anthay eythay.  Antiquariesay elltay usay
atthay erethay ereway atay eastlay otway istinctday agesstay inay ethay akingmay ofay
uildingsbay anday orksway ofay artay underay ethay Inoansmay eforebay isthay astlay
atastrophecay, utbay afteray atthay erethay isay onay uildingbay, onay artay orkway, orthway
accountingay orfay.  Itay allay entway.

Utbay eythay adhay eftlay ethay arkmay ofay eirthay eniusgay inay ethay uildingsbay atay Ycenæmay
anday elsewhereay, anday eythay adhay establisheday ethay abithay ofay iracypay inay ethay
eassay aboutay eirthay islanday.

Osay ownay, Iay inkthay, eway avehay ethay amefray etsay inay ichwhay eway aymay aceplay ethay
icturepay.  Eway avehay esethay ancientay Egyptiansay eadinglay ethay indkay ofay ifelay
atthay Iay avehay iedtray otay owshay youay.  Eway avehay ethay Abyloniansbay anday Assyriansay
alongay osethay otheray iverray-oursescay establisheday asay aay eatgray owerpay inay ethay
eastay, anday eway avehay ethay Inoansmay, eryvay ortlyshay otay ebay overthrownay anday otay
isappearday, ouringscay ethay eassay inay eirthay ipsshay anday avinghay allay ethay owerpay
alongay ethay oastscay.  Anday etweenbay emthay, inay ethay eryvay idstmay, isay atthay
ountrycay ofay Yriasay anday Alestinepay ichwhay--especiallyay Alestinepay, ecausebay
itay isay outhsay ofay Yriasay--ieslay ightray inay ethay oursecay ichwhay ethay eatgray
empiresay ustmay aversetray enwhay eythay omecay otay ipsgray ithway eachay otheray.
Alestinepay isay ethay ountrycay oughthray ichwhay eythay ustmay asspay etherwhay orfay
adetray oray orfay arway ithway eachay otheray.  Youay ancay imagineay atwhay aay erribletay
ositionpay atthay ustmay avehay eenbay.  Yriasay {85ay} anday Alestinepay, asay youay owknay,
ereway eopledpay ybay Emiticsay ibestray, otay ichwhay aceray ethay Abyloniansbay alsoay
elongedbay originallyay.  Utbay ethay ivisionsday anday ifferencesday, othbay etweenbay
ethay Abyloniansbay anday ethay othersay, anday etweenbay esethay othersay, amongay
emselvesthay, ereway anymay anday ofay ariousvay indskay.  Omesay ustmay avehay egardedray
eachay otheray asay almostay ofay ethay amesay indredkay.  Othersay ustmay avehay eemedsay
uiteqay angestray anday oreignfay.  Itay asway aay eatgray ixturemay.

Anday orfay ethay omentmay, inay oray aboutay 1500ay Bay.Cay., ethay Israelitesay asay aay ationnay
areay otnay inay Alestinepay atay allay.  Eythay areay inay ethay andlay ofay Oshengay,
undergoingay atthay oppressionay ofay ichwhay youay owknay.  Ithinway 300ay yearsay oray osay
eythay illway akemay eirthay Exodusay anday eginbay eirthay ortyfay yearsay ofay anderingway
inay ethay ildernessway, otay eray-appearay inay ethay orystay, underay ethay eadershiplay ofay
Oshuajay; onqueringcay ethay Anaanitescay anday osay establishingay emselvesthay
ightray inay ethay ostmay angerousday ositionpay ofay allay, inay Alestinepay, onay ethay
ighwayhay etweenbay ethay otway eatgray empiresay.




{86ay}

APTERcHay Ivay

EtHay EETINGmay OFay EtHay EMPIRESay

Itay atherray ookslay asay ifay ethay astingcay outay ofay ethay Yksoshay, ethay oreignfay
"epherdshay ingskay," ademay ethay Egyptiansay ealiseray atthay eythay ustmay ombinecay
anday uniteay anday otnay ogay onay ightingfay amongay emselvesthay, ifay eythay eantmay otay
ebay ongstray enoughay otay esistray ethay attacksay ofay eirthay eighboursnay.  Etherwhay
atthay asway ethay easonray oray otnay, ethay ecordsray eemsay otay owshay atthay ustjay atay
isthay imetay erethay eganbay otay ebay arfay esslay ightingfay etweenbay ethay igbay
andownerslay; anday ethay ingkay, Araohphay, eganbay otay avehay oremay owerpay inay ishay
ownay andshay, anday otay ebay ableay otay ivegay effectay otay ishay illway, ybay eansmay ofay ishay
iziervay oray imepray inistermay, anday ethay estray ofay ishay officersay overay allay ethay
ountrycay.

Usthay oremay ongstray ybay eingbay uniteday, ethay Egyptiansay ovedray outay ethay Yksoshay.
Eythay alsoay ooktay orciblefay easuresmay againstay ethay Africanay ibestray atthay ereway
essingpray emthay onay ethay outhsay, anday establisheday eirthay owerpay ightray upay otay
ethay ourthfay ataractcay onay ethay Ilenay, aay onglay ayway artherfay outhsay anthay ethay
oundarybay ofay ethay oremay ancientay empireay.  Againstay Ubianay, artherfay outhsay
againay, anday againstay Ibyalay, onay eirthay estway, eythay oughtfay effectivelyay, anday
usthay eway aymay upposesay atthay eythay ademay emselvesthay oremay afesay anthay eythay
everay adhay eenbay eforebay omfray invasionay ybay esethay Africanay eoplespay.

Erethay ereway otway eatgray ingskay ofay ethay amenay ofay Othmesthay oray Ethmosistay, ofay
isthay eighteenthay ynastyday, underay omwhay {87ay} ostmay ofay esethay igbay
achievementsay ereway oneday--Othmesthay Iay. anday Othmesthay IIIay.  Ethay econdsay
Othmesthay eignedray orfay aay yearay oray otway onlyay.  Othmesthay Iay. edlay ethay
Egyptianay armiesay upay oughthray Alestinepay, overcameay Yriasay, anday entway asay aay
onquerorcay asay arfay eastay asay ethay Euphratesay, erewhay ehay etsay upay aay olumncay,
ithway anay accountay ofay itay allay, otay ommemoratecay ishay ictoriesvay.

Utbay Othmesthay IIIay. asway aay oremay endidsplay Araohphay illstay, anday underay imhay
Egyptay amecay otay ethay eighthay ofay itsay ilitarymay owerpay.  Yriasay adhay evoltedray;
osay ehay archedmay orthnay anday utterlyay efeatedday ethay Yrianssay atay Egiddomay.
Enthay ehay urnedtay eastay anday oughtfay ishay ayway acrossay ethay Euphratesay, erewhay ehay
etsay upay aay olumncay otay ishay ownay oryglay esidebay atthay ofay Othmesthay Iay.  Itay isay
ecordedray ofay imhay atthay ehay adhay esentspray ivengay imhay ybay ethay ingkay ofay
Abylonbay, anday evenay ybay ethay ingkay ofay ethay Ittiteshay--atthay eoplepay omfray ethay
orthnay owhay adhay establisheday emselvesthay inay Asiaay Inormay anday owhay ereway
onstantlycay ivinggay oubletray ownday inay Yriasay.

[Idenotesay: Ethay Elamitesay]

Anday asay orfay Abylonbay itselfay, erethay ancay ebay ittlelay oubtday atthay atay isthay
imetay itay asway inay ethay idstmay ofay oublestray.  Itay asway essedpray uponay usthay, asay
eway eesay, ybay ethay owinggray owerpay ofay Egyptay onay ethay estway.  Enthay onay ethay
easternay idesay itay asway ontinuallycay eingbay oubledtray ybay atthay owerfulpay
ationnay, ethay Elamitesay, osewhay apitalcay asway Usasay.  Iay oday otnay antway otay
otherbay youay uchmay aboutay esethay Elamitesay, oughthay eirthay owerpay asway eatgray
anday eirthay ivilisationcay anay olday ivilisationcay.  Eythay ereway importantay
enoughay otay Abylonbay, ecausebay eythay ereway onstantlycay ivinggay oubletray, eryvay
uchmay asay ethay ongerstray Africanay ibestray avegay oubletray otay ethay Egyptiansay.
Utbay apartay omfray isthay eythay oday otnay occupyay anyay eryvay igbay artpay inay ethay eatgray
orystay.  Eythay ereway otnay exactlyay atwhay eway ouldshay allcay orldway-akersmay, anday
itay isay onlyay ethay orldway-akersmay atthay eway areay akingtay asay ethay actorsay {88ay} inay
ouray orystay.  Eythay amecay atherray earnay eingbay orldway-akersmay inay ethay eatgray
ensesay, orfay erethay asway aay omentmay enwhay eythay eriouslysay eatenedthray otay
ubjugatesay Abyloniabay, utbay ethay Abyloniansbay ustjay ucceededsay inay efeatingday
emthay.

Anday enthay, ofay oursecay, erethay ereway ethay Assyriansay inay ethay orthnay, alreadyay
uiteqay independentay inay ealityray, oughthay Abylonbay illstay aimedclay aay
uzeraintysay overay emthay.

Osay ownay ontinuallycay, orfay undredshay ofay yearsay, ethay orystay oesgay onay
epeatingray itselfay inay ethay amesay ayway overay anday overay againay.  Ethay Assyriansay
eginbay otay etgay oremay anday oremay owerpay inay ethay eastay anday eythay areay onstantlycay
omingcay intoay onflictcay ithway ethay Egyptiansay owhay areay onstantlycay ightingfay
otay etainray eirthay oldhay onay atthay Yriasay ichwhay ethay arsway ofay ethay otway Othmesthay
adhay ademay anay Egyptianay ovincepray.  Yriasay ieslay orthnay ofay Alestinepay: anday
Alestinepay, eingbay earernay otay Egyptay, asway illstay oremay insistentlyay aimedclay
ybay ethay Egyptiansay asay eirsthay.  Youay aymay ealiseray owhay ifficultday ethay
ositionpay asway orfay esethay Emiticsay ibestray inay Yriasay anday Alestinepay, etweenbay
ethay otway empiresay.  Ethay ibestray ereway otnay uniteday amongay emselvesthay, osay
atthay eway ancay easilyay imagineay (anday eway owknay atthay itay actuallyay idday osay
appenhay) atthay eythay iedtray otay avesay emselvesthay ybay akingmay alliancesay ithway,
oray admittingay emselvesthay asay ubjectsay otay, ownay oneay ofay ethay igbay empiresay anday
ownay ethay otheray.  Atthay isay ethay ayway ethay orystay entway orfay undredshay ofay yearsay
erethay.  Ethay Ildrenchay ofay Israelay, asay youay owknay, ereway otnay inay ethay
Alestinepay orystay atay ethay omentmay.  Itay asway aboutay 1500ay Bay.Cay. atthay ethay eryvay
eatgray Araohphay Othmesthay IIIay. amecay otay ethay onethray, atay ethay imetay enwhay ethay
Israelitesay ereway inay ethay andlay ofay Oshengay.  Itay asway otnay untilay otway oray eethray
undredhay yearsay aterlay atthay Osesmay edlay emthay (inay Exodusay) intoay ethay
ildernessway.

Etlay usay ivegay ethay ateday ofay 1250ay Bay.Cay. otay ethay Exodusay.  Itay illway enthay ebay
aboutay ethay yearay 1200ay, oray aay ittlelay eforebay, {89ay} atthay ethay Israelitesay
ustmay avehay ademay eirthay ayway, onqueringcay, acrossay Ordanjay anday intoay ethay andlay
ofay Anaancay.

Ownay, owhay idday itay appenhay atthay aay eoplepay usthay illstay alledcay ethay Ildrenchay
ofay Israelay ouldcay avehay ecomebay osay umerousnay anday osay owerfulpay asay otay ebay ableay
otay inway esethay ictoriesvay?

[Idenotesay: Ethay omisedpray andlay]

Inay answeray otay ethay irstfay uestionqay eway aymay aysay atthay itay asway eryvay anymay
yearsay incesay ethay omingcay ofay Abrahamay omfray Aldæachay--oremay anthay aay ousandthay
yearsay.  Atthay ivesgay imetay orfay aay eryvay argelay increaseay inay umbersnay.  Enthay
osethay yearsay ofay esertday anderingway ightmay eryvay ikelylay avehay ademay emthay
ardyhay.  Eythay adhay, ootay, asay eway owknay, eepday aithfay inay eirthay "odgay ofay
attlesbay"--ethay Ehovahjay--anday inay ethay ivineday omisepray atthay eythay ouldshay inway
isthay andlay.  Anday, inallyfay, ustjay atay ethay omentmay enwhay eythay amecay upay outay ofay
ethay esertday anday eganbay eirthay ampaigncay againstay ethay eoplespay ofay Anaancay ethay
eatgray empiresay appenedhay, asay itay eemssay, otay avehay ecomebay atherray exhausteday
ybay eirthay ontinualcay ifestray ogethertay, anday ethay ibestray ofay Alestinepay
emselvesthay adhay eenbay osay ushedcray etweenbay ethay otway atthay erhapspay eythay adhay
otnay uchmay owerpay ofay esistanceray eftlay.

Anday incesay erethay asway allay isthay erpetualpay ightingfay, itay isay interestingay otay
eesay inay atwhay annermay anday ithway atwhay eaponsway ethay ightersfay oughtfay.  Ethay
inscriptionsay elltay usay aay eatgray ealday aboutay emthay.

Ethay eoplepay omfray ethay eastay eemsay otay avehay earntlay ethay useay anday aluevay ofay
orseshay inay attlebay earlieray anthay ethay Egyptiansay, anday ightingfay omfray
ariotschay eemssay otay avehay eenbay anay earlieray ustomcay anthay ightingfay onay
orsebackhay.  Itay isay aidsay atthay erethay areay onay icturespay oray arvingscay ofay anay
earlieray ateday anthay ethay Yksoshay owingshay anyay ofay ethay Egyptiansay idingray onay
orseshay, utbay inay ethay eighteenthay ynastyday eythay adhay eirthay avalrycay--atthay isay
otay aysay, eirthay {90ay} ountedmay oldierssay onay orsebackhay--asay ellway asay eirthay
ightersfay inay ariotschay.  Ethay ariotschay ereway otnay eryvay elaborateay.  Eythay
ereway otway-eeledwhay.  Ethay oardingbay amecay upay airlyfay ighhay inay ontfray, otay ethay
eighthay ofay aay anmay'say elbowsay oray ereaboutsthay asay ehay oodstay uprightay, utbay
opedslay awayay atay ethay idessay owardstay ethay ackbay; anday ethay ackbay asway oftenay
uiteqay openay.  Eway eesay aay airpay ofay orseshay oray evenay eethray abreastay inay omesay ofay
ethay avingsgray ofay ethay ariotschay.

Ethay enmay inay emthay, asay Iay aysay, oodstay uprightay.  Oftenay erethay ereway otway, ofay
omwhay oneay asway orfay ethay ivingdray anday ethay otheray orfay ethay ootingshay, ichwhay
asway earlynay alwaysay ithway ethay owbay anday arroway.  Iay upposesay eway aymay aysay atthay
ethay owbay anday arroway asway eirthay eatgray eaponway.  Ingsslay ereway useday, asay youay
illway owknay omfray ethay orystay ofay Avidday anday Oliathgay, utbay ethay isadvantageday
ofay ethay ingslay, asay omparedcay ithway ethay owbay anday arroway, exceptay orfay
irmishingskay oopstray, isay uiteqay obviousay.  Ethay ingingslay equiresray ethay
irlingtway ofay ethay ingslay, ithway ethay onestay inay itay, oundray ethay eadhay, eforebay
ethay onestay ancay ebay entsay yingfray outay; itay equiresray entyplay ofay oomray, oray
elseay, inay ethay irlingtway, youay aymay easilyay eakbray ethay extnay anmay'say eadhay!  Osay
itay isay onlyay ofay aluevay otay oopstray inay "openay ormationfay," atthay isay, ithway
aciousspay oomray etweenbay oneay anmay anday ethay extnay.  Itay oesday otnay oday orfay oseclay
ormationfay.  Ethay owbay anday arroway isay aay arfay oremay onvenientcay eaponway orfay
isthay indkay ofay ightingfay.

[Idenotesay: Eaponsway anday armouray]

Iay avehay aidsay atthay eway oftenay eesay avingsgray ofay oneay anmay ivingdray ethay
orseshay--ethay arioteerchay--anday ofay ethay otheray usingay ethay owbay.  Eway alsoay
ometimessay eesay atthay, inay orsebackhay ightingfay, oneay anmay, idingray onay oneay
orsehay, ouldway eadlay anday ontrolcay anotheray orsehay, onay ichwhay ouldway ebay idingray
aay anmay owhay ouldway enthay avehay othbay ishay andshay anday allay ishay attentionay eefray
orfay ootingshay ithway ishay owbay anday arroway.  Atthay isay otnay alwaysay, ornay erhapspay
ostmay oftenay, {91ay} atwhay eway indfay.  Ethay oremay usualay ayway asway orfay ethay iderray
otay ontrolcay ethay orsehay ithway ishay ownay andhay onay ethay einsray asay estbay ehay ouldcay
ilewhay ehay otshay ishay arrowsay asay ehay adhay opportunityay anday imetay.  Anday eythay
ereway inefay idersray, urningtay oundray inay ethay addlesay--ifay eythay adhay aay addlesay;
utbay oftenay eythay areay ownshay idingray arebackbay, anday evernay, illtay uchmay aterlay,
ithway irrupsstay--anday ootingshay ackwardsbay, overay ethay orsehay'say ailtay, asay ehay
allopsgay awayay.

Ethay attlebay-axeay asway aay eryvay ommoncay eaponway; anday aay ortshay ordsway anday aay
ubclay, ometimessay ithway aay onestay ixedfay inay itsay eadhay otay ivegay eightway otay ethay
owblay, areay alsoay ownshay.  Ethay onglay earspay appearsay otay avehay omecay intoay
ommoncay useay onlyay aduallygray, anday isay otnay eensay inay ethay earliestay icturespay
ofay ethay ightingfay, oughthay eway oday eesay ortshay earsspay, orfay owingthray.

Itay asway otnay atay allay uncommonay orfay ethay ighterfay onay ootfay otay avehay aay anmay ithway
imhay owhay arriedcay aay argelay ieldshay, ichwhay overedcay emthay othbay.  Iay imagineay
atthay anay arrangementay ofay atthay indkay isay eantmay enwhay eway eadray, asay eway oday inay
ethay Iblebay, ofay ethay "ieldshay-earerbay."  Orfay aay anmay otay arrycay aay ieldshay ofay
uchsay izesay asay isthay ithway anyay easeay, itay adhay otay ebay aay ightlay ieldshay, anday eway
owknay atthay ethay ieldsshay ereway ommonlycay ademay ofay osieray, ikelay ouray asketsbay,
anday overedcay ithway ethay insskay ofay oxenay oray otheray eastsbay.

Inay ethay earliestay imestay eythay eemsay otay avehay ornway eryvay ittlelay armouray, otay
otectpray emthay omfray arroway oray ordsway okesstray, onay ethay odybay; utbay elmetshay,
atay irstfay oftsay anday addedpay, utbay aterlay ofay etalmay, otay efendday ethay eadhay,
ereway inay earlyay useay, anday eythay ereway usuallyay ademay ithway aay eakpay atay ethay optay
anday opingslay idessay ichwhay ouldway akemay aay owblay anceglay offay emthay.  Onzebray,
asay eway avehay eensay, asway ethay etalmay ichwhay eythay irstfay earntlay otay orkway, utbay
asay eythay earntlay otay akemay eaponsway ofay ironay, ichwhay asway arderhay anday ouldcay ebay
orkedway otay aay arpershay edgeay, onzebray entway outay ofay useay.

{92ay}

Ybay ethay imetay ofay ethay eighteenthay Egyptianay ynastyday, enwhay ethay eatgray
empiresay eganbay otay eetmay inay erioussay ightingfay, itay isay ikelylay atthay othbay
ewknay omethingsay aboutay ethay arrangementay ofay eirthay armiesay intoay eparatesay
odiesbay ofay infantryay anday avalrycay, anday ofay ethay oneay upportingsay anday elpinghay
ethay otheray inay omewhatsay ikelay ethay odernmay annermay.

Isthay, enthay, ouldway avehay eenbay eirthay ayway ofay ightingfay enwhay eythay etmay inay
ethay openay ieldfay.  Itay asway aay ifferentday attermay enwhay eythay amecay otay ethay
assaultay ofay eatgray itiescay, especiallyay uchsay asay Abylonbay anday Inevehnay,
ichwhay ereway urroundedsay anday otectedpray, asay eway owknay, ybay allsway ofay astvay
eighthay anday icknessthay.  Ethay allsway ofay Inevehnay, orfay instanceay, ereway osay
oadbray, evenay onay ethay optay, atthay eethray ariotschay ouldcay ebay ivendray alongay
emthay, oneay esidebay ethay otheray, anday ofay oursecay ethay idthway atay ethay ottombay
ustmay avehay eenbay eryvay uchmay argerlay.  Eythay adhay ethay aterialmay eryvay eadyray atay
andhay orfay ethay akingmay ofay esethay immenseay allsway--inay Abyloniabay anday Assyriaay
atay allay eventsay.  Eythay adhay abundanceay ofay ayclay, anday orfay ethay eatergray artpay
ofay ethay allsway eythay useday ethay unsay-ieddray icksbray.  Utbay orfay ethay owerlay
artspay, ichwhay adhay otay earbay ethay eightway, eythay obablypray useday arderhay
icksbray, urntbay inay ethay ilnskay, orfay erethay areay engravingsay ofay oldierssay ithway
omesay indkay ofay atteringbay-amray ammeringhay atay ethay icksbray omfray ethay owerlay
artpay ofay ethay allway ofay aay itycay ichwhay eythay areay attackingay.  Ethay iggersday
ouldway ebay otectedpray, ybay aay ieldshay eldhay overay eirthay eadshay, omfray ethay
issilesmay entsay ownday omfray ethay allway aboveay.

[Idenotesay: Againstay aay alledway itycay]

Enthay eythay adhay adderslay orfay ethay alingscay ofay esethay allsway enwhay eythay ademay
ethay attackay.  Utbay ofay oursecay ethay attackersay ownday elowbay ouldway ebay atay aay
eatgray isadvantageday omparedcay ithway ethay efendersday onay optay ofay ethay allway.
Eythay ouldway avehay aay uchmay etterbay ancechay ifay ybay anyay eansmay eythay ouldcay oisthay
emselvesthay upay otay omethingsay ikelay ethay amesay eighthay asay ethay efendersday.
Anday isthay eythay {93ay} ontrivedcay otay oday ybay akingmay ovablemay owerstay ofay oodway,
onay eelswhay, ichwhay ouldcay ebay ushedpay alongay ybay enmay owhay ereway oremay oray esslay
otectedpray ybay ethay owerstay emselvesthay omfray ethay eoplepay ootingshay atay emthay
omfray ethay optay ofay ethay allway.  Onay ethay owerstay ouldway ebay owmenbay owhay ouldway
ootshay atay ethay enmay onay ethay allway, ethay ootersshay inay ethay owertay eingbay
otectedpray ybay ethay allsway, exceptay inay osay arfay asay eythay adhay otay owshay
emselvesthay inay orderay otay ootshay eirthay arrowsay oray owthray eirthay ortshay earsspay.

[Illustrationay: Aay ATTERINGbay-AMray.]

Anotheray ayway atthay eythay adhay ofay oistinghay emselvesthay otay ethay amesay eighthay
asay ethay efendersday asway otay uildbay aay oundmay outsideay ethay allsway.  Iay upposesay
ethay earthay, asay {94ay} eythay ewthray itay upay, ouldway otectpray ethay uildersbay
againstay ethay arrowsay otshay omfray ethay allway.  Anday enthay, enwhay eythay adhay
aisedray ethay oundmay ighhay enoughay, eythay ouldway ometimessay eelwhay eirthay owerstay
otay ethay optay ofay isthay, anday osay itay aymay ebay atthay, omfray ethay owerstay onay optay ofay
ethay oundmay, eythay aymay actuallyay avehay adhay anay advantageay inay eighthay overay ethay
efendersday onay ethay allsway.  Atthay ouldway ivegay ethay opportunityay orfay eirthay
ownay ellowfay-oldierssay elowbay otay etsay upay ethay adderslay anday attemptay ethay
alingscay ofay ethay allsway.

Inay atthay ayway, oray inay omesay aysway ikelay atthay, eythay attackeday ethay alledway
itiescay.  Youay aymay avehay eadray ordsway inay ethay Iblebay atthay uzzledpay youay aboutay
"ingingbray aay owertay" againstay aay itycay, oray "astingcay upay aay ankbay" againstay itay,
oray omesay uchsay ordsway, anday youay aymay ownay owknay atwhay eythay eanmay.  Eythay eanmay
ethay akingmay ofay esethay ovablemay owerstay orfay ethay attackay, anday owingthray upay
ethay oundsmay otay ingbray ethay attackersay otay ethay amesay eighthay asay ethay
efendersday.  Itay ustmay avehay eenbay aay uchmay oremay excitingay indkay ofay arfareway
anthay ethay oundingpay awayay ithway artilleryay atay onglay angeray ofay anymay ilesmay, asay
isay oneday inay arway ownay.  Itay asway oremay ikelay ethay odernmay enchtray arway, ithway
ombsbay anday andhay-enadesgray, enwhay ethay enchestray areay oseclay upay otay oneay
anotheray.

Atthay isay aay indkay ofay eneralgay icturepay ofay ethay ayway inay ichwhay youay aymay imagineay
esethay eoplepay akingmay arway onay eachay otheray, onstantlycay akingmay arway, inay
Esopotamiamay anday inay Yriasay anday inay Alestinepay, orfay undredshay anday undredshay
ofay yearsay.  Anday Iay ouldway emindray youay yetay againay atthay, exceptay enwhay ethay
Egyptiansay ereway akingtay aay andhay inay itay, itay asway arfareway amongay ationsnay atthay
ereway earlynay allay ofay ethay amesay originalay ockstay oray aceray.  Ethay Ittiteshay,
omfray ethay orthnay, ereway aay ifferentday eoplepay; utbay ostmay ofay emthay adhay eryvay
uchmay ethay amesay ideasay anday ethay amesay aysway ofay ifelay; obablypray eythay ouldcay
understanday eachay otheray'say anguagelay, osay atthay {95ay} eallyray enwhay ethay arway
adhay assedpay overay emthay orfay ethay imetay eingbay ethay eoplepay owhay ereway eftlay inay
ethay ountrycay, ookinglay afteray eirthay ocksflay anday eirthay erdshay anday eirthay
opscray, ouldway otnay eesay uchmay ifferenceday etweenbay ivinglay underay oneay owerpay
oray underay anotheray.  Obablypray itay ademay eryvay ittlelay angechay inay eirthay
iveslay.  Anday atthay aymay explainay, atwhay otherwiseay eemssay almostay impossibleay
otay understanday, owhay eythay ouldcay urvivesay, owhay eythay ouldcay ogay onay ivinglay atay
allay, inay ethay idstmay ofay isthay erpetualpay ightingfay.

Eway owknay atthay ethay onquerorscay owedshay eryvay ittlelay ercymay.  Omenway anday
ildrenchay ereway assacredmay oray arriedcay offay intoay aptivitycay, otay ebay eptkay asay
avesslay.  Utbay afteray allay atthay eadfuldray iserymay adhay assedpay overay ethay andlay
ethay emnantray atthay emainedray ouldway ogay onay uchmay asay eforebay.  Othingnay inay ethay
olewhay orystay isay uchmay oremay onderfulway anthay ethay ayway inay ichwhay ethay Yrianssay,
orfay instanceay, evoltedray againay, eryvay oonsay afteray eingbay onqueredcay anday
ubjugatedsay ybay ethay irstfay Othmesthay; anday ethay enduranceay ofay ethay Ewsjay underay
ethay epeatedray onquestcay ofay eirthay ountrycay isay oneay ofay ethay arvelsmay ofay
istoryhay.  Itay isay ifficultday otay understanday owhay itay asway atthay eythay ereway otnay
entirelyay estroyedday asay aay ationnay, anday atthay eythay areay amongay usay, anday inay
everyay ountrycay ofay ethay orldway, asay eoplepay ofay aay eryvay istinctday aracterchay
anday ationalitynay otay-ayday.  Isthay enacitytay anday enduranceay ofay ethay Ewsjay ashay
adhay aay eryvay eatgray effectay inay akingmay ethay orldway uchsay asay itay isay ownay atthay eway
areay ivinglay inay itay.

[Idenotesay: Ethay Ilistinesphay]

Oneay ofay ethay easonsray ywhay ethay Ildrenchay ofay Israelay underay Oshuajay ereway ableay
otay etgay aay oldhay onay ethay andlay ofay Anaancay isay atthay ethay Ilistinesphay adhay
alreadyay ademay eirthay appearanceay erethay.  Ethay ountrycay ofay esethay
Ilistinesphay asway aay arrownay etchstray alongay ethay outhsay-easternay edgeay ofay ethay
Editerraneanmay, unningray ownday otay ethay orderbay ofay Egyptay.  Itay eemssay
urprisingsay atthay ethay Israelitesay ouldshay oweay anyay {96ay} oodgay ingthay otay ethay
Ilistinesphay, ecausebay eway alwaysay indfay ethay otway eoplespay atay itterbay arway
ithway eachay otheray; utbay itay appearsay atthay ustjay eforebay ethay imetay ofay ethay
Israelitesay' omingcay upay omfray ethay outhernsay esertsday ethay Ilistinesphay adhay
eenbay akingmay attersmay eryvay ifficultday orfay ethay Egyptiansay inay atwhay ethay
Egyptiansay alledcay eirthay ovincepray ofay Alestinepay, anday atthay isthay ovincepray
anday ethay ovincepray ofay Yriasay alsoay, aay ittlelay otay ethay orthnay, ereway otnay
eallyray underay anyay effectiveay Egyptianay uleray atay allay atay ethay omentmay.  Ethay
ibestray ereway otnay uniteday ogethertay, anday ereway eakway inay eirthay isunionday.

Esethay Ilistinesphay ereway aay arlikeway eoplepay.  Itay isay otnay ownknay eciselypray
ofay atwhay aceray eythay ereway.  Omesay avehay oughtthay atthay eythay ereway ettlerssay
omfray Etecray, ichwhay eldhay, asay eway awsay, uleray overay ethay easay.  Otheray olarsschay
upposesay emthay otay avehay eenbay, ikelay ostmay ofay ethay eoplespay ofay atthay egionray, aay
anchbray ofay ethay eatgray Emiticsay eetray ichwhay eway avehay eensay eadingspray osay
idelyway.  Utbay ereverwhay eythay amecay omfray, erethay eythay ereway establisheday
alongay isthay easay-oastcay, aay eoplepay eadyray otay ightfay ybay andlay oray easay, eadyray
otay ogay adingtray, ootay, onay oubtday, inay eirthay ipsshay, ifay eythay ouldcay akemay
ofitpray ybay itay--aay oldbay, enterprisingay eoplepay.

Anday erethay asway anotheray eoplepay, ettledsay alongay anotheray ipstray, artherfay
orthnay, ofay ethay amesay oastcay--ethay Iciansphœnay.  Almostay exactlyay ethay amesay
accountay isay otay ebay ivengay ofay emthay.  Eythay, ootay, ereway eatgray ailorssay anday
avigatorsnay, eatgray aderstray, eatgray iratespay.  Eway oday otnay earhay osay uchmay
aboutay emthay ustjay atay isthay ointpay ofay ethay eatgray orystay ichwhay eway avehay ownay
eachedray: ethay Ilistinesphay ayplay aay iggerbay artpay inay itay orfay ethay omentmay.
Utbay ethay Iciansphœnay, youay illway eesay, areay arfay oremay importantay eallyray,
orfay inay aay ewfay undredhay yearsay ethay Ilistinesphay areay ittlelay oremay eardhay ofay.
Ethay excellenceay ofay ethay Iciansphœnay asay avigatorsnay ademay aay igbay
ifferenceday otay ethay orystay.

{97ay}

Enwhay ethay Israelitesay ucceededsay inay ushingpay eirthay armyay usthay intoay
Alestinepay, estwardway ofay ethay Ordanjay iverray, eirthay ictoryvay asway ybay onay
eansmay ompletecay.  Itay asway aay onglay ilewhay eforebay eythay otgay ethay etterbay ofay
osethay Ilistinesphay earnay ethay oastcay, anday atay oneay imetay itay ookedlay eryvay uchmay
asay ifay ethay Ilistinesphay ouldway onquercay emthay.  Eway aymay upposesay atthay eythay
idday otnay omecay upay outay ofay ethay esertday ithway uchmay ofay ethay equipmentay
ecessarynay orfay ethay attackay ofay alledway itiescay, uchsay asay Iay avehay ustjay
escribedday atthay ecessarynay equipmentay otay ebay.

[Idenotesay: Israelay anday Udahjay]

Ethay esultray ofay atthay asway atthay evenay inay ethay idstmay ofay ethay ountrycay ichwhay,
orfay ethay ostmay artpay, eythay onqueredcay, erethay illstay emainedray ertaincay
ongstray itiescay inay ethay andshay ofay eirthay enemiesay.  Erhapspay, asay eythay adhay
akentay ethay asturepay andslay, anday allay atthay eythay ostmay antedway, anday asay eythay
awsay atthay ethay apturecay ofay esethay ongstray acesplay asway almostay eyondbay eirthay
owerpay, eythay amecay otay omesay indkay ofay agreementay ithway ethay itizenscay otay eavelay
osethay itizenscay inay ossessionpay ofay ethay itiescay, ovidedpray eythay ereway eftlay
inay eacepay elsewhereay.  Oweverhay atthay aymay ebay, itay isay ertaincay atthay omesay ofay
osethay ongstray ortressesfay emainedray untakenay ybay emthay, anday itay appenedhay
atthay eythay ereway osay acedplay asay otay ivideday ethay ountrycay ichwhay ethay
Israelitesay adhay overrunay intoay otway artspay.  Ethay ibestray ofay Udahjay anday ofay
Imeonsay ettledsay emselvesthay inay ethay ountrycay outhwardsay ofay isthay inelay ofay
ortressesfay, asay eway aymay almostay allcay itay.  Ethay estray ofay ethay ibestray ettledsay
otay ethay orthnay.

Iay awdray youray attentionay otay atthay, ecausebay itay elpshay otay explainay atwhay
appenedhay aterlay enwhay ethay ivisionday ooktay aceplay intoay ethay otway ingdomskay ofay
Israelay anday Udahjay.  Ethay ibestray ofay Udahjay anday Imeonsay, ivinglay inay atwhay
amecay otay ebay alledcay Udæajay, ofay ichwhay Erusalemjay asway ethay apitalcay, ereway
ildrenchay ofay Israelay, anday ofay Abrahamay, ustjay asay uchmay asay osethay owhay
elongedbay otay ethay ingdomkay ofay Israelay osay alledcay.

{98ay}

Itay isay aay ittlelay onfusingcay; anday otay avesay urtherfay onfusioncay itay illway Iay
inkthay ebay asay ellway atthay Iay ouldshay ownay itewray ofay esethay Israelitesay
(includingay ethay inhabitantsay ofay Udæajay) asay Ebrewshay.  Ethay exactay originalay
eaningmay ofay ethay amenay Ebrewhay isay otnay eryvay earclay, utbay itay asway useday atay aay
eryvay earlyay ateday, anday eway aymay useay itay onvenientlycay otay esignateday ethay
olewhay ofay ethay ibestray atthay ereway edlay oughthray eirthay anderingsway inay ethay
esertday ybay Osesmay anday Aaronay, anday atthay amecay upay anday ossedcray overay Ordanjay,
underay Oshuajay, anday ettledsay inay Anaancay.




{99ay}

APTERcHay IIvay

EtHay EWSjay ANDay EtHay ISRAELITESay

Ifay youay illway aketay aay ooklay onay ethay apmay atay allay isthay ountrycay ofay Alestinepay
anday Yriasay youay illway eesay owhay itay isay utcay upay ybay ountainsmay, ethay Ebanonlay
angeray anday othersay unningray ownday alongay itay.  Oneay esultray ofay isthay ustmay avehay
eenbay otay akemay itay ifficultday orfay ethay ibestray atthay ereway ettledsay erethay otay
uniteay anday omecay ogethertay otay esistray ethay attacksay ofay enemiesay omfray ithoutway.

Inay orderay otay understanday isthay eatgray orystay operlypray youay ustmay earbay inay
indmay allay oughthray owhay uchmay ofay itay appenedhay asay itay idday ecausebay ofay ethay
eographicalgay ositionpay--atthay isay otay aysay, ecausebay ethay iversray anray ustjay
erewhay eythay idday unray anday ecausebay ethay esertsday anday ethay eassay anday ethay
ountainsmay aylay ustjay asay eythay idday ielay oundray aboutay ethay icherray anday oremay
easantplay andlay.  Etweenbay ethay ountainsmay aylay ainsplay anday alleysvay erewhay
ethay ocksflay ightmay asturepay.  Anaancay, youay owknay, inay ethay Iblebay isay
escribedday asay aay andlay "owingflay ithway ilkmay anday oneyhay."  Osethay areay ordsway
eantmay otay ivegay youay ethay ideaay ofay aay ichray, easantplay andlay, enerallygay; utbay
erhapspay eythay eanmay aay ittlelay oremay esidesbay.  "Owingflay ithway ilkmay"
uggestssay aay andlay erewhay owscay orfay ilkingmay ouldway oday ellway, anday asay orfay
oneyhay, eway areay oldtay ybay eoplepay owhay avehay onegay untinghay erethay atthay ethay
ogsday oftenay omecay outay ofay ethay assgray anday ethay ildway owersflay uiteqay yelloway
ithway ollenpay--ethay ollenpay atthay ethay eesbay arrycay omehay ithway emthay onay eirthay
ighsthay.  Itay isay aay eatgray ountrycay orfay eesbay anday oneyhay.

{100ay}

Utbay itay asway alsoay, enwhay ethay Ebrewshay irstfay ademay eirthay ayway intoay itay, aay
eatgray ountrycay orfay Ilistinesphay.  Eythay ereway otnay easantplay eighboursnay.
Ethay earlyay apterschay ofay ethay orystay ofay ethay Ebrewshay inay Anaancay areay eryvay
uchmay akentay upay ithway ightsfay againstay ethay Ilistinesphay.  Ethay uelday etweenbay
Avidday anday Oliathgay isay almostay ethay estbay ofay ethay apterschay; utbay ethay Amsonsay
orystay isay eryvay oodgay eadingray ootay.  Atay oneay omentmay ethay Ilistinesphay eryvay
earlynay otgay ethay etterbay ofay ethay Ebrewshay altogetheray; utbay enthay itay eemssay asay
ifay ethay angerday ademay Amuelsay, ethay eatestgray ofay ethay Udgesjay, ealiseray atthay
ifay ethay eoplepay ereway otay ebay uccessfulsay againstay eirthay Ilistinephay enemiesay
eythay ustmay ebay uniteday underay oneay eadhay.  Itay asway eryvay argelylay ybay Amuelsay'say
actay atthay Aulsay asway appointeday, anday anointeday ithway ethay acredsay oilay, asay
ingkay--ethay irstfay ingkay ofay ethay ownay uniteday ibestray.

Youay owknay ethay estray ofay atthay orystay, eryvay ikelylay: owhay eythay aduallygray otgay
ethay etterbay ofay esethay ongstray enemiesay, owhay Aulsay ewslay ishay ousandsthay anday
Avidday ishay enstay ofay ousandsthay, anday owhay, underay Avidday'say onsay, Olomonsay,
eythay amecay otay ethay ighesthay ointpay ofay endoursplay anday ichesray anday owerpay atthay
eythay everay eachedray.  Ethay apitalcay itycay asway Erusalemjay inay Udæajay, ethay oremay
outhernsay artpay ofay ethay ingdomkay.  Itay isay otnay otay ebay upposedsay atthay inay ethay
ulnessfay ofay itsay owerpay isthay uniteday ingdomkay adhay anythingay otay earfay omfray
ortressfay itiescay ofay enemiesay inay eirthay idstmay.  Eway aymay imagineay allay ofay
emthay ipedway outay, ecausebay eway owknay atthay Olomonsay'say ipsshay entway eelyfray otay
ethay oastscay ofay Iciaphœnay, atthay edarcay oodway asway oughtbray omfray ethay
endidsplay edarcay orestsfay onay Ountmay Ebanonlay, atthay ethay ealthway ofay Africaay,
inay oldgay, ivoryay, apesay anday eacockspay amecay otay imhay ybay aravancay oughthray
Egyptay oray ybay easay.

Everthelessnay ethay unionay astedlay onlyay aay eryvay ortshay ilewhay.  Underay
Olomonsay'say onssay ethay ingdomkay asway ividedday.  {101ay} Ehoboamray ittingsay onay
ishay atherfay'say onethray inay Erusalemjay anday Eroboamjay eigningray overay ethay
ingdomkay ofay Israelay inay ethay orthnay.  Eway eginbay, aboutay isthay imetay, otay ebay
olerablytay uresay aboutay ethay atesday, anday ethay ateday ofay isthay ivisionday intoay
ethay otway ingdomskay isay ivengay asay 937ay Bay.Cay.

[Idenotesay: Ethay ividedday ingdomkay]

Osay erethay eythay ereway--Israelay, oundedbay ybay Yriasay onay ethay orthnay, anday ithway
Assyriaay essingpray onay omfray ethay estway anday omingcay ownay otay ethay eighthay ofay itsay
owerpay; Udahjay earernay otay Egyptay anday ithway ethay Assyrianay owerpay eateningthray
itay arcelyscay esslay anthay Israelay inay ethay estway.  Ethay irstfay oubletray omfray ethay
igbay empiresay etweenbay ichwhay eythay aylay ellfay onay Udahjay, omfray ethay Egyptianay
idesay.  Ishakshay, ethay Araohphay ofay Egyptay, ademay Udahjay aypay ibutetray otay imhay,
afteray omingcay ithway aay onqueringcay armyay, anday apparentlyay omesay ofay ethay
Israeliteay ibestray adhay otay aypay ibutetray alsoay.  Utbay Israelay asay aay olewhay idday
otnay omecay underay ishay owerpay.

Asay ethay orystay oesgay onay eway indfay ethay otway ingdomskay engageday inay allsmay arsway
othbay ithway eachay otheray anday ithway ethay eighbouringnay allsmay ationsnay.  Erethay
asway ontinualcay ightingfay etweenbay ethay orthernnay ingdomkay anday Yriasay artherfay
otay ethay orthnay againay.  Ethay omentmay ofay Israelay'say eatestgray engthstray asway inay
ethay eignray ofay Omriay, owhay oundedfay itsay apitalcay, Amariasay.  Utbay Yriasay asway aay
oremay umerousnay anday owerfulpay ationnay anthay Israelay ithoutway ethay aiday ofay
Udahjay; anday Ahabay, ethay Israelitishay ingkay, asway aay assalvay ofay Enhadadbay, ingkay
ofay Yriasay, osewhay apitalcay itycay asway Amascusday.  Ahabay aideday Enhadadbay inay
efendingday Yriasay omfray ethay attackay ofay Almanesershay IIay. ofay Assyriaay, utbay
ethay alliesay ereway adlybay eatenbay, anday Israelay adhay otay aypay ibutetray otay
Assyriaay.  Eshay onway ackbay erhay independenceay orfay aay ortshay imetay, enwhay
Assyriaay adhay otheray usinessbay otay attenday otay, utbay ustjay osay oonsay asay Assyriaay
adhay eisurelay otay ealday eriouslysay ithway Israelay anday Yriasay againay, Amariasay
asway akentay.  Ethay Assyriansay eftlay emthay onay opportunityay orfay urtherfay
evoltray.  {102ay} Asay aay ationnay, Israelay isappearsday outay ofay ethay orystay omfray
ethay yearay ofay ethay allfay ofay Amariasay, 722ay Bay.Cay.

Assyriaay asway ownay inay ethay ullfay idetay ofay erhay owerpay.  Onceay ethay assalvay ofay
Abylonbay, eshay adhay ownay ademay Abylonbay aay assalvay ofay ershay.  Udahjay adhay
escapeday ethay atefay ofay Israelay ybay udentlypray akingtay idessay ithway Assyriaay.

[Illustrationay: ENNACHERIBsay INay IShay ARIOTcHay.]

Egyptay asway otnay ikelylay otay ebay eryvay easedplay ithway isthay interferenceay onay ethay
artpay ofay Assyriaay ithway eoplepay omwhay eshay ookedlay onay asay erhay ibutariestray.
Udahjay anday ethay eighbouringnay allsmay atesstay ustmay avehay eenbay erriblytay
erplexedpay otay owknay ichwhay asway eirthay isestway inelay otay aketay--ubmissionsay otay
Assyriaay oray otay Egyptay.  Egyptay, atay ethay omentmay, asway underay aay owerfulpay
ynastyday ofay Ethiopianay, oray atwhay eway ouldshay allcay egronay, aceray.  Eshay eganbay
otay ovemay againstay ethay aggressiveay Assyriansay, anday underay Ezekiahhay Udahjay
ecidedday otay aketay ethay Egyptianay idesay.  Aay owerfulpay ombinationcay asway ormedfay
againstay Assyriaay, ichwhay erhay {103ay} assalvay Abylonbay oinedjay, asay ellway asay
omesay ofay ethay eoplespay alongay ethay Editerraneanmay oastcay, ethay Ilistinesphay
anday Iciansphœnay.  Utbay asay yetay Assyriaay asway ootay ongstray oray ootay everclay
inay erhay ightingfay ethodsmay orfay emthay allay.  Ethay Egyptianay armyay, ithway ethay
ariousvay allieday orcesfay, asway eriouslysay eatenbay, anday Erusalemjay asway avedsay
onlyay ybay ethay aymentpay ofay aay eryvay eavyhay ibutetray otay Ennacheribsay, ethay
Assyrianay ingkay.

[Idenotesay: Ethay allfay ofay Assyriaay]

Ethay owerpay ofay Assyriaay asway eryvay eatgray, anday ethay Ewsjay aymay ellway avehay
oughtthay atthay eythay ouldway indfay afetysay underay erhay otectionpray.  Yetay ithinway
esslay anthay aay undredhay yearsay, Assyriaay, asay aay eatgray owerpay, adhay easedcay otay
existay, anday Udæajay adhay onceay oremay otay uffersay orfay erhay allianceay ithway ethay
eatenbay idesay.  Ennacheribsay'say ictoryvay overay ethay Egyptiansay asway inay 701ay
Bay.Cay., anday ishay onsay Ezaray-addonhay invadeday anday occupieday Egyptay anday eldhay itay
orfay omesay entay yearsay.  Utbay Assyriaay oonsay eganbay otay ebay essedpray ybay aay ildway
anday arway-ikelay eoplepay, ethay Ythiansscay, omingcay omfray ethay orthnay.  Enthay ethay
Abyloniansbay, allyingay emselvesthay ithway ethay Edesmay, aay ationnay osewhay
ountrycay aylay onay ethay orthnay-estway ofay Abyloniabay, attackeday Assyriaay omfray ethay
outhsay, anday ilewhay allay isthay onfusioncay anday ightingfay asway oinggay onay inay ethay
eastay, Araohphay Echonay ofay Egyptay oughtthay ethay omentmay oodgay orfay yingtray otay
etgay ackbay ethay olday Egyptianay ovincespray ofay Alestinepay anday Yriasay.

Ybay ethay yearay 608ay Bay.Cay. ethay Abyloniansbay ereway esiegingbay Inevehnay, ethay
eatgray apitalcay itycay ofay ethay Assyriansay, anday Echonay asway archingmay upay intoay
Alestinepay.  Yriasay anday Alestinepay, illstay aithfulfay otay ethay easternay
empireay, opposeday imhay, utbay ereway utterlyay efeatedday inay aay attlebay atay
Egiddomay.  Onceay oremay Udahjay ufferedsay ybay eingbay onay ethay osinglay idesay.  Inay
607ay, aay yearay aterlay, Inevehnay asway akentay anday itsay ortificationsfay azedray otay
ethay oundgray ybay ethay ictoriousvay Abyloniansbay.  Ethay ightymay Assyrianay empireay
asway onay oremay.

{104ay}

Ethay explanationay ofay isthay apidray allfay ofay aay eoplepay atthay adhay eenbay osay
owerfulpay eemssay otay ebay atthay itay asway aay owerpay atthay ependedday entirelyay onay
itsay armyay, atthay ethay olewhay ationnay asway occupieday inay arway, anday atthay erethay
ereway onay eservesray, onay opulationpay omfray ichwhay ethay armiesay ouldcay ebay
ecruitedray anday ademay ongstray againay, enwhay onceay osethay alreadyay inay ethay ieldfay
eganbay otay ebay akenshay.  Itay asway, asay eway ouldshay aysay, entirelyay aay ilitarymay
atestay.  Otay ethay eoplespay ofay Yriasay anday Alestinepay eway aymay upposesay atthay itay
ademay ittlelay ifferenceday etherwhay Assyriansay oray Abyloniansbay ereway ethay
eatgray owerpay inay ethay eastay.  Oweverhay atthay aymay avehay eenbay, eythay ereway
illstay, ikelay ethay orseshoehay atthay aay acksmithblay isay akingmay, "etweenbay ethay
ammerhay anday ethay anvilay."  Itay asway ownay, asay itay adhay eenbay aay ousandthay oray oremay
yearsay eforebay, etweenbay ethay ammerhay ofay Abylonbay anday ethay anvilay ofay Egyptay
atthay eythay aylay.

Ornay, asay eway aymay upposesay, idday isthay angechay ofay owerpay inay ethay eastay appearay
otay akemay ethay ositionpay ofay Egyptay eryvay ifferentday.  Ethay Egyptianay ingkay aymay
ellway avehay oughtthay atthay itay avegay imhay ethay etterbay opportunityay orfay
extendingay ishay ownay authorityay eastwarday anday orthwardnay.  Eway avehay eensay
owhay, inay ormerfay yearsay, Othmesthay, anday againay Othmesthay IIIay., advanceday
ictoriouslyvay asay arfay asay Archemishcay, onay ethay Euphratesay.  Eachay etsay upay aay
olumncay erethay asay aay onumentmay otay ishay ictoriesvay.  Utbay eithernay otgay uchmay
artherfay.

Anday ownay againay, inay isthay aterlay imetay, ethay Egyptianay ingkay essedpray upay
ictoriouslyvay, anday againay ethay Abyloniansbay etmay imhay anday avegay imhay attlebay,
atay ethay eryvay amesay ointpay--Arehemishcay.

Ifay youay illway aketay aay ooklay atay ethay apmay youay illway eesay, erhapspay, ywhay itay asway
atthay esethay amesnay ofay attlebay-acesplay occuray againay anday againay.  Icetway
alreadyay eway avehay adhay eatgray attlesbay atay Egiddomay.  Eethray imestay Arehemishcay
{105ay} eemssay otay avehay eenbay ethay urningtay-ointpay inay aay ampaigncay.  Ifay eway
understanday ethay eographygay, ethay ayway ethay andlay ieslay, ethay iversray,
ountainsmay, ainsplay anday orestsfay, eway eesay ethay easonray.  Inay ethay irstfay
aceplay, anay armyay omingcay upay orthwardnay omfray Egyptay ouldway indfay aay ewfay ongstray
itiescay erhapspay, uchsay asay Azagay anday Ascalonay, inay ethay outhsay, utbay afteray
esethay ereway assedpay itay ouldway omecay otay aay ainplay ountrycay ichwhay avegay ethay
inhabitantsay onay eatgray opportunityay ofay akingmay aay ongstray efenceday illtay itay
amecay otay ethay iverray Ishonkay, onay ichwhay isay ethay itycay ofay Egiddomay.  Erethay
eginsbay aay oodedway anday ountainousmay ountrycay excellentay orfay efenceday ybay aay
esslay ongstray orcefay againstay aay ongerstray.

Enthay, ifay atthay inelay ofay efenceday asway okenbray oughthray, ethay aturalnay
ayway--orfay itay asway ethay ayway atthay othbay aderstray anday ightersfay entway--ouldway ebay
orthnay eastwarday upay oughthray Amascusday anday osay onay illtay youay amecay otay ethay
Euphratesay, aay eatgray iverray, inay itselfay aay ormidablefay efenceday, anday erethay
oodstay ethay itycay ofay Arehemishcay.  Atthay explainsay ywhay esethay otway, Egiddomay
anday Arehemishcay, ereway ethay acesplay ofay ethay eatgray attlesbay.

[Idenotesay: Ebuchadnezzarnay]

Iay upposesay atthay ethay eatestgray ofay emthay allay, inay itsay effectay onay ouray orystay,
asway ethay irdthay Arehemishcay attlebay ichwhay, inay ethay yearay 605ay Bay.Cay.,
Ebuchadnezzarnay, ingkay ofay Abylonbay, oughtfay againstay ethay ingkay ofay Egyptay.
Orfay ethay ictoryvay ofay Abylonbay asway osay ecisiveday atthay omfray isthay imetay
orwardfay, orfay aay onglay ilewhay, erethay eemssay otay avehay eenbay eryvay ittlelay
uestionqay aboutay ichwhay owerpay asway ethay eatestgray inay ethay orldway.  Itay asway
Abylonbay.

Ilewhay Assyriaay anday Abylonbay adhay eenbay ightingfay ogethertay, Araohphay Echonay,
asay eway avehay eensay, adhay akentay advantageay ofay eirthay oubletray anday adhay
onqueredcay ethay Ewsjay anday omesay allieday orcesfay atay Egiddomay, anday asay aay
onsequencecay ofay atthay ictoryvay Udahjay adhay onceay againay ecomebay ubjectsay otay
Egyptay.  Yetay againay, enthay, enwhay Ebuchadnezzarnay {106ay} onway ishay eatgray
attlebay atay Archemishcay, ethay Ewsjay ereway onay ethay idesay ofay ethay oserlay.  Evenay
afteray Archemishcay, eythay eemsay otay avehay inclineday otay ethay Egyptianay, atherray
anthay otay ethay Abylonianbay allianceay, erhapspay ecausebay Egyptay asway ethay earernay
eighbournay.  Anday eythay etainedray atthay aracteristicchay, ichwhay eway avehay eensay
allay oughthray ethay orystay, ofay eingbay aay ubbornstay eoplepay, ithway aay iritspay otnay
easyay otay ubduesay.  Inay 597ay Bay.Cay. Ebuchadnezzarnay oundfay emthay ivinggay
oubletray, anday unishedpay emthay ybay akingtay anymay ofay ethay inhabitantsay,
includingay ethay ingkay anday Ezekielay ethay ophetpray, otay Abylonbay.

Utbay evenay osay, ithinway entay yearsay ethay Ewsjay atthay ereway eftlay inay Erusalemjay
againay iedtray otay ormfay alliancesay againstay Abylonbay, anday isthay imetay ethay
eatgray easternay owerpay eemssay otay avehay esolvedray otay akemay aay inalfay enday ofay ethay
usinessbay.  Erusalemjay asway attackeday ybay aay iegesay, anday osay esolutelyray
efendedday atthay itay eldhay outay orfay earlynay aay yearay anday aay alfhay; utbay inay ethay
enday itay adhay otay yielday.  Itsay efendingday allsway anday anymay ofay itsay iefchay
uildingsbay ereway overthrownay, anday, ostmay eadfuldray ofay allay inay ethay eyesay ofay
ethay Ewsjay, eirthay olyhay empletay ofay Ehovahjay asway estroyedday ybay irefay afteray
eingbay obbedray ofay itsay aluablevay anday acredsay esselsvay.

Ethay ateday ofay ethay Allfay ofay Erusalemjay isay 586ay Bay.Cay.  Urelysay itay ustmay avehay
eemedsay otay ethay unhappyay eoplepay, inay itespay ofay ethay opehay ofay eturnray ichwhay
evenay Eremiahjay, ethay ophetpray ofay allay isthay erribletay alamitycay, eldhay outay otay
emthay, atthay eythay ereway ipedway outay asay aay ationnay.  Ethay ightmay ofay Abylonbay
ustmay avehay appeareday ootay eatgray everay otay ebay overthrownay.

Iay avehay aidsay osay uchmay aboutay ethay Ewsjay anday eirthay isfortunesmay, althoughay
eythay ereway aay eoplepay ofay osay ittlelay apparentay importanceay inay omparisoncay
ithway ethay eatgray empiresay onay eitheray idesay ofay emthay, ecausebay allay atthay
appenedhay otay emthay, allsmay ationnay oughthay eythay ereway, ashay eenbay eallyray ofay
ethay eryvay eatestgray importanceay inay {107ay} akingmay ethay orystay ofay ethay orldway
atwhay itay isay.  Itay isay oughthray emthay, anday ybay easonray ofay esethay isastersday,
anday othersay ofay ethay amesay indkay ofay ichwhay Iay illway elltay youay oonsay, atthay eythay
ereway atteredscay allay overay ethay orldway.  Anday eingbay usthay atteredscay, anday
oldinghay otay eirthay aditionstray anday otay eirthay eligionray ithway aay enacitytay
ichwhay onay otheray eoplepay inay ethay olewhay orystay everay ashay ownshay, eythay ooktay
osethay aditionstray anday atthay eligionray everywhereay.

[Idenotesay: Ethay eligionray ofay ethay Ewsjay]

Anday erehay Iay ouldway awdray youray attentionay otay aay actfay aboutay ethay Ewsjay anday ethay
Ewishjay eligionray ichwhay eway areay atherray aptay otay orgetfay.  Eway areay accustomeday
otay eakspay ofay Ewsjay anday Istianschray asay ifay eythay ereway entirelyay opposeday otay
eachay otheray inay everyay ossiblepay ayway, asay ifay ethay oneay asway absolutelyay ethay
oppositeay ofay ethay otheray.  Anday osay, inay oneay, anday erhapspay ethay eryvay ostmay
importantay, ointpay ofay ethay Istianchray eligionray eythay areay, ecausebay ethay Ewsjay
enyday ethay ivineday aturenay ofay Istchray ichwhay isay ethay eryvay iefchay ointpay inay ethay
Istianchray eligionray.  Utbay, orfay allay atthay, eway ustmay evernay orgetfay atthay itay
asway onay ethay Ewishjay eligionray atthay ethay Istianchray eligionray asway oundedfay.
Itay asway ethay eligionray atthay amecay intoay ethay indsmay anday eartshay ofay enmay owhay
adhay eenbay ainedtray upay inay ethay Ewishjay eligionray.  Ethay earlyay Istianschray
ereway Ewsjay, orfay ethay ostmay artpay.  Istchray Imselfhay asway aay Ewjay, oughtbray upay
inay ethay Ewishjay eligionray, anday eway owknay atthay Ehay aidsay Ehay amecay otay "ulfilfay,"
otnay otay estroyday.  Ehay asway, onay Ishay umanhay idesay, ethay astlay ofay osethay Ebrewhay
ophetspray ofay omwhay ethay irstfay, inay ointpay ofay imetay, asway Amosay.

Itay asway onay ethay Ewishjay eligionray asay itsay ockstay atthay ethay Istianchray
eligionray asway aftedgray, asay aay ardenergay aftsgray aay ewnay anchbray intoay anay olday
emstay anday ethay ewnay akestay upay ethay apsay omfray ethay olday.  Erethay asway anotheray
anchbray aterlay aftedgray onay ethay Ewishjay eligiousray emstay, esidesbay ethay
Istianchray--aay eryvay ifferentday anchbray, ethay Ohammedanmay {108ay} eligionray.
Enwhay eway onsidercay atwhay anay immenseay effectay Istianitychray inay ethay irstfay
aceplay, anday Ohammedanismmay inay ethay econdsay, avehay adhay inay ethay akingmay ofay
isthay orldway-orystay, eway allshay eesay, Iay inkthay, atthay eway areay ightray inay
attributingay aay eatgray importanceay otay atwhay appenedhay otay ethay Ewsjay, omfray
omwhay amecay esethay otheray eligionsray, asay ellway asay eirthay ownay, ichwhay eythay
illstay oldhay ownay.  Atwhay appenedhay otay emthay asway usthay uchmay oremay importantay
inay ethay orystay anthay atwhay arfay ongerstray owerspay idday, uchsay asay ethay Ittiteshay,
owhay ossessedpay allay Asiaay Inormay anday eatenedthray Egyptay, oray ethay Elamitesay;
owhay earlynay overthreway ethay Abyloniansbay, oray ethay Yrianssay, owhay atay oneay imetay
ereway arfay ongerstray anthay eitheray Israelay oray Udahjay, oray evenay othbay ofay emthay
ogethertay.

[Idenotesay: Ethay Iblebay]

Eway owknay atthay ethay Ewsjay onway eirthay intenseay aithfay inay Ehovahjay, eirthay
ationalnay odgay, onlyay ithway ifficultyday.  Eythay ereway ofay ethay amesay aceray asay
ethay ibestray aboutay emthay owhay orshippedway Aalbay anday Ashtarothay, anday eythay
ereway onstantlycay inclineday owardstay atthay aganpay orshipway, asay eway owknay omfray
ethay Iblebay.  Utbay inay ethay enday ethay igherhay eligionray onway, anday eirthay
eligionray asway intenselyay ealray otay ethay Ewsjay.  Itay asway aay eryvay igbay ingthay inay
eirthay iveslay.  Eythay elievedbay atthay Ehovahjay unishedpay emthay inay isthay ifelay
orfay ethay ongwray ingsthay atthay eythay idday, uchsay asay oppressionay ofay ethay oorpay,
oray unjustay ealingday, anday eythay elievedbay atthay ehay unishedpay ethay ationnay orfay
ongwray ingsthay atthay ethay ationnay idday.  Eythay adhay otnay ethay eliefbay ofay ethay
Egyptiansay inay ewardray anday unishmentpay inay anay afteray-ifelay.

Anday eythay onsideredcay eirthay odgay asay anay exactingay, aay "ealousjay" odgay.  Ehay
ouldway unishpay emthay ifay eythay orshippedway inay ethay osay-alledcay "ovesgray," ichwhay
ereway oftenay ostspay oray onesstay etsay upay onay ethay "ighhay acesplay" otay ethay aganpay
odsgay, oray ifay eythay ereway ackslay inay ishay orshipway, oray inay akingmay acrificesay otay
imhay.

Allay esethay eoplespay adhay, inay ommoncay, aay eliefbay inay inningway {109ay} ethay
avourfay ofay ethay odsgay ybay acrificesay.  Ethay oremay eciouspray otay emthay ethay ingthay
acrificedsay, ethay oremay aluevay eythay eemedday itay ouldway avehay inay ethay ightsay ofay
ethay odsgay; anday atthay isay owhay itay isay atthay eway eesay emthay atay oneay imetay actuallyay
acrificingsay eirthay ownay ildrenchay, asay ethay ostmay aluablevay offeringay atthay
eythay ouldcay akemay.  Ethay instanceay ofay Abrahamay'say illingnessway otay acrificesay
Isaacay illway occuray otay youray indsmay.

Anday ereverwhay eythay entway, intoay ateverwhay andlay ofay exileay eythay ereway arriedcay
ybay eirthay onquerorscay, eythay ouldway aketay ithway emthay osethay acredsay itingswray,
atthay ecordray ofay eirthay istoryhay, atthay orystay ofay ethay eationcray ofay ethay
orldway, anday atthay odecay ofay eirthay awslay anday ofay eirthay eligiousray ustomscay,
ichwhay, ithway eryvay uchmay oremay atthay eythay adhay otnay otgay, eway ownay eanmay enwhay eway
eakspay ofay ethay Iblebay.  Ereverwhay eythay entway eythay adhay isthay olyhay ecordray
assuringay emthay atthay eythay ereway ethay osenchay eoplepay ofay Ehovahjay.  Amongay ethay
influencesay ichwhay enableday emthay otay eepkay osay istinctday omfray ethay ationsnay
intoay osewhay idstmay eythay amecay, eway ustmay urelysay aceplay eryvay ighhay ethay
influenceay ofay ethay Iblebay--atthay isay otay aysay, ofay osay anymay ofay itsay ooksbay asay
adhay eenbay ittenwray atay atthay imetay.

Ethay ightmay ofay Abylonbay, asay Iay avehay aidsay, ustmay avehay eemedsay osay eatgray otay
ethay Ewsjay, arriedcay awayay intoay exileay, atthay itay evernay ouldcay ebay overthrownay.
Anday yetay, ithinway esslay anthay iftyfay yearsay omfray ethay iegesay anday apturecay ofay
Erusalemjay, Abylonbay itselfay asway akentay ybay aay owerpay ofay uchsay overmasteringay
engthstray atthay ethay Abyloniansbay onlyay onceay afterwardsay, anday otay onay effectay,
attempteday otay egainray independenceay.

Isthay extraordinaryay "udgmentjay," asay ethay Ewsjay egardedray itay, asway executeday
ybay ethay andhay ofay ethay Ersianspay underay eirthay eatgray eaderlay Yruscay.




{110ay}

APTERcHay IIIvay

EtHay ERSIANSpay ANDay EtHay EEKSgRay

Ethay Ersianspay areay aay eoplepay atthay upay otay isthay ointpay omecay intoay ethay orystay
ardlyhay atay allay.  Uddenlysay, outay ofay ethay Eastay, eythay omecay ightray intoay itsay
eryvay entrecay anday areay ethay incipalpray actorsay inay itay orfay aay enturycay oray otway.

Afteray ethay eakbray-upay ofay ethay Assyrianay owerpay, ethay ongeststray ationnay inay ethay
allianceay atthay adhay oneday atthay eakingbray asway ethay ationnay ofay ethay Edesmay.
Ethay Edesmay anday Ersianspay ereway ofay ethay amesay aceray, ifferentday altogetheray
omfray ethay Emiticsay.  Eythay ereway ofay atthay eatgray aceray alledcay Aryanay, oray
Indoay-Europeanay, atthay amecay omfray ethay ighhay andslay inay ethay entrecay ofay Asiaay.
Obablypray eirthay umbersnay osay increaseday atthay eythay adhay otay indfay ewnay
ountrycay.  Eythay essedpray ownday outhwardsay anday estwardway, owardstay ethay unsay
anday ethay oremay ertilefay andslay.  Eythay ereway ardyhay anday accustomeday otay ovingmay
aboutay.  Itay asway onay ardshiphay otay emthay otay akemay igrationsmay.  Eythay ovedmay
ithway eirthay ivesway anday ildrenchay, ocksflay anday erdshay, anday allay eirthay allsmay
ouseholdhay oodsgay.  Aay eatgray umbernay essedpray ownday intoay Indiaay.  Anotheray
igbay eamstray owingflay owardstay ethay estway amecay asay arfay asay ethay Abylonianbay
easternay orderbay.

Esethay Aryanay eoplepay omfray ethay orthnay-estway ereway eatgray idersray.  Itay isay
oughtthay atthay eythay introduceday ethay orsehay otay ethay Abyloniansbay, anday atthay
omfray ethay Abyloniansbay itay amecay otay Egyptay.

Ethay ountrycay ofay Elamay adhay eenbay invadeday, anday itsay {111ay} owerpay atteredshay,
ybay ethay Assyriansay ortlyshay eforebay ethay eakbray-upay ofay eirthay ownay empireay, anday
isthay atteringshay, ogethertay ithway ethay ightingfay etweenbay ethay Assyriansay anday
ethay allianceay ormedfay againstay emthay, avegay ethay Ersianspay (owhay inhabiteday aay
ountrycay otay ethay eastay alledcay Iranay, anday especiallyay ethay artpay ofay atthay
ountrycay alledcay Ersispay) ethay ancechay ofay ettinggay ossessionpay ofay Elamay.
Isthay eythay idday, anday establisheday emselvesthay inay Usasay, ethay olday apitalcay
itycay ofay ethay Elamitesay.  Ersiapay asway actuallyay ethay assalvay ofay Ediamay, untilay
Yruscay, owhay asway ethay Ersianpay ingkay atay Usasay, edlay aay evoltray againstay emthay.
Ithinway eethray yearsay ehay adhay onqueredcay anday akentay eirthay apitalcay, anday
Ediamay asway ownay aay ubjectsay atestay otay itsay ownay atelay ubjectsay, Ersiapay.

Usthay eythay ereway, enthay, establisheday inay eirthay owerpay alongay ethay Easternay
oundarybay ofay Abyloniabay, ichwhay adhay ownay ecomebay ethay astermay empireay ybay ethay
efeatday ofay Assyriaay.  Everthelessnay Yruscay, atay ethay eadhay ofay ethay Ersianpay
armyay, ooktay isthay ightymay Abylonbay ithoutway aay attlebay!  Utbay ehay adhay otay ightfay
omesay ardhay attlesbay irstfay.  Itay eemssay atthay ethay Edesmay adhay ademay eatiestray
ithway eirthay alliesay ofay Abylonbay anday Egyptay ichwhay ethay Ersianspay idday otnay
eelfay isposedday otay aypay attentionay otay.  Isthay arouseday uchsay oppositionay otay
ethay Ersianspay atthay anay allianceay ofay Abyloniansbay anday Egyptiansay ithway
Uscrœsay, ingkay ofay Ydialay inay Asiaay Inormay, anday ithway ethay Artansspay, asway
ormedfay againstay emthay.

[Idenotesay: Artanspay ercenariesmay]

Oticenay articularlypay osethay Artansspay.  Artaspay asway ethay outhernsay atestay ofay
Eecegray, anday isthay isay ethay irstfay appearanceay ofay Eecegray inay ouray orystay.  Itay
isay eryvay otablenay.  Esethay eatgray ationsnay ofay ethay Eastay alreadyay oughtthay osay
ellway ofay ethay ightingfay ualitiesqay ofay ethay Eekgray oldierssay, anday especiallyay
ofay ethay Artanspay oldierssay, atthay itay asway orthway eirthay ilewhay otay ingbray emthay
overay anday aypay emthay otay ightfay orfay emthay.  Erethay eemssay otay ebay ittlelay oubtday
atthay eythay ereway ercenariesmay, atthay isay otay aysay, oldierssay owhay ereway {112ay}
aidpay otay ightfay anday owhay oughtfay orfay aypay.  Utbay ethay allianceay asway ofay onay
availay.  Ithinway ethay acespay ofay aay ewfay onthsmay, inay ethay ummersay ofay 546ay Bay.Cay.,
ethay olewhay ofay Asiaay Inormay asway inay ethay Ersianpay andshay, ightray awayay otay ethay
Editerraneanmay oreshay.  Itay asway otnay untilay ixsay yearsay aterlay atthay Yruscay adhay
eisurelay otay attenday otay Abylonbay itselfay; utbay enwhay ehay idday attenday otay itay ethay
esistanceray asway otnay eatgray.  Ethay Abylonianbay ingkay'say alliesay adhay eenbay
okenbray.  Yruscay ooktay Yriasay anday Alestinepay alsoay inay ishay ownay eignray, anday
afteray ishay eathday ishay onsay Ambysescay essedpray onay ownday intoay Egyptay anday
onqueredcay atthay ancientay andlay ikewiselay.  Ethay ictoriousvay areercay ofay ethay
Ersianspay asway onlyay eckedchay enwhay eythay amecay againstay ethay Ethiopiansay anday
Ubiansnay inay artherfay Africaay.

[Idenotesay: Ethay Ersianpay onquestcay]

Evenay ethay oreshay ofay ethay Editerraneanmay idday otnay aystay eirthay ogresspray.
Eythay onway anymay ofay ethay Eekgray islandsay, includingay Ypruscay anday Amossay.  Ethay
empiresay ofay Egyptay anday ofay Abyloniabay adhay eenbay eatgray, utbay isthay asway
eatergray anthay othbay ofay emthay ogethertay.  Anday osethay otway adhay eenbay ivalsray.
Isthay ofay Ersiapay eemedsay otay ebay ithoutway aay ivalray.  Itay isay ittlelay onderway
atthay ethay Ersianpay ulerray assumeday ethay itletay ofay Ingkay ofay Ingskay.  Ehay uledray
ightray awayay intoay Indiaay.  Ehay uledray allay atthay eemedsay otay attermay oray otay
ountcay orfay anythingay; anday itay adhay allay eenbay accomplisheday inay otnay uchmay oremay
anthay entytway yearsay omfray ethay imetay ofay ethay irstfay evoltray ofay Yruscay againstay
ethay ordshiplay ofay ethay Edesmay.  Owhay asway itay oneday?

Atthay isay aay uestionqay ichwhay ustmay ebay answereday inay ifferentday aysway.  Onay oneay
answeray isay enoughay.  Erethay ereway everalsay ausescay ichwhay orkedway ogethertay
orfay isthay astoundingay uccesssay ofay ethay Ersianspay.  Utbay oneay ofay ethay iefchay
ausescay, ifay otnay ethay iefchay ofay allay, asway Yruscay.  Eway annotcay oubtday atthay.
Oughoutthray ethay olewhay ofay isthay eatestgray ofay eatgray oriesstay ichwhay Iay amay
yingtray otay elltay youay eway allshay {113ay} otnay eetmay ithway anay actoray iggerbay anday
oremay oriousglay anthay isthay Yruscay.  Iay oubtday etherwhay eway eetmay ithway anotheray
uiteqay asay igbay.  Orfay otnay onlyay ereway ethay extentay ofay ountrycay anday ethay owerpay
ofay ethay ationsnay atthay ehay onqueredcay extraordinarilyay eatgray, utbay ehay ademay aay
eryvay extraordinaryay useay ofay ishay onquestscay.  Ehay ustmay avehay eenbay aay eatgray
eaderlay ofay enmay, aay anmay omwhay othersay ereway eadyray otay obeyay anday ollowfay; anday
ehay ustmay avehay eenbay aay eatgray eneralgay, accordingay otay ethay ideasay ofay atwhay
eneralshipgay anday ethay anœuvringmay ofay armiesay eantmay atay atthay imetay; utbay
esidesbay allay atthay ehay ustmay avehay eenbay aay eryvay iseway anmay anday aay eryvay oodgay
anmay.  Erethay ancay ebay ittlelay oubtday atthay ehay asway arfay oremay ercifulmay otay ethay
eoplepay atthay ehay onqueredcay anthay anyay otheray onquerorcay atthay ashay omecay intoay
ouray orystay yetay.  Ehay eatedtray emthay ithway arfay eatergray indnesskay.  Atthay isay
oofpray ofay ishay oodnessgay.

Enthay ehay asway eryvay ontentcay otay eavelay emthay eirthay ownay institutionsay,
includingay eirthay eligionsray, osay onglay asay eythay ereway obedientay otay imhay asay
eirthay overay-ordlay.  Atthay owsshay ishay isdomway, orfay itay eantmay atthay ethay eoplepay
ehay onqueredcay ereway ontentcay otay ebay underay imhay.  Underay Yruscay, ethay Ewsjay owhay
ereway inay exileay atay Abylonbay ereway alloweday otay ogay ackbay otay Erusalemjay, anday ehay
avegay ordersay ichwhay elpedhay emthay otay ethay eray-uildingbay ofay ethay Empletay erethay.
Itay isay oughtthay atthay itay asway artlypay ybay ethay elphay ofay esethay Ewsjay inay Abylonbay
atthay ehay asway ableay otay aketay atthay ongstray itycay, asay ehay idday, ithoutway aay
ightfay.  Utbay itay isay aidsay atthay ehay adhay otay ivertday artpay ofay ethay eamstray ofay
ethay Euphratesay inay orderay otay oday osay; anday itay isay ertaincay atthay ehay adhay
alreadyay okenbray ethay Abylonianbay owerpay eforebay ehay ooktay ethay apitalcay.

Ehay asway ableay otay owshay isthay indnesskay anday onsiderationcay orfay ethay eligionray
ofay otheray eoplespay, ecausebay ishay ownay eligionray anday atthay ofay ishay Ersianspay
asway aay eryvay enlighteneday oneay.  Iay inkthay eway allshay otnay oday ongwray inay allingcay
itay ethay {114ay} ostmay enlighteneday eligionray ofay allay atthay eway indfay eforebay
Istchray amecay.  Itay asway ethay eligionray alledcay Oroastrianismzay, omfray ethay
amenay ofay itsay ounderfay, Oroasterzay, owhay isay alsoay alledcay Arathustrazay.  Itay
asway ethay eligionray ofay osethay Indoay-Europeanay eoplepay ofay omwhay eway avehay eensay
oneay artpay essingpray ownday outhsay intoay Indiaay anday anotheray artpay essingpray
estwardway.  Oroasterzay isay oughtthay otay avehay eenbay ethay authoray ofay ethay ostmay
ancientay ortionspay ofay atwhay isay alledcay ethay Endzay-Avestaay, ichwhay eansmay ethay
Avestaay, oray Acredsay Itingswray, ittenwray inay ethay anguagelay ofay Endzay.  Endzay
elongsbay otay ethay Aryanay oupgray ofay ethay Indoay-Europeanay amilyfay ofay anguageslay,
omfray anotheray anchbray ofay ichwhay ouray ownay ativenay Englishay anguagelay ashay eenbay
erivedday.

[Idenotesay: Oroasterzay]

Oroasterzay aughttay atthay erethay isay oneay eatgray anday oodgay odgay, Ormuzday, utbay
atthay erethay isay alsoay anotheray upernaturalsay eingbay, Ahrimanay, ethay iritspay ofay
evilay.  Itay isay accordinglyay asay enmay oday ethay illway ofay Ormuzday, atthay isay otay
aysay, oday oodgay actsay, atthay eythay illway avehay aay appyhay ifelay afteray eathday.  Ifay
ethay oodgay actsay aay anmay ashay oneday inay ifelay erehay areay oremay inay umbernay anday
importanceay anthay ishay adbay actsay ehay illway ogay otay aradisepay; ifay ethay adbay actsay
areay oremay anthay ethay oodgay ehay illway ogay otay ellhay anday uffersay everlastingay
unishmentpay.  Usticejay, actingay ustlyjay, asway atwhay Oroasterzay ecognisedray asay
ethay ostmay importantay ingthay ofay allay.

Youay illway eesay atay onceay owhay earnay isthay eryvay ancientay eliefbay omescay otay atthay
ichwhay eway oldhay ownay, anday owhay uchmay oremay enlighteneday itay isay anthay otheray
eligionsray ichwhay eway avehay oticednay.  Itay ontainscay ethay ideaay ofay oneay odgay
upremesay overay allay ethay universeay--otnay onlyay upremesay orfay aay inglesay ationnay
oray orfay oneay ortionpay ofay ethay earthay.

Irefay, atthay ysteriousmay, usefulay, indlykay ingthay ybay ichwhay anmay armsway
imselfhay, ybay ichwhay ehay ookscay ishay oodfay, anday ichwhay, everthelessnay, isay
apablecay ofay uchsay orriblehay estructionday, eemssay otay avehay eenbay associateday
oselyclay ithway ethay {115ay} owerpay ofay ethay oodgay odgay, Ormuzday.  Irefay asway
ereforethay aay acredsay elementay.

Ethay owcay, anotheray indlykay ingthay, ecausebay ofay itsay useay otay anmay, asway alsoay
acredsay.  Inay ethay eligionray ichwhay Oroasterzay asway oughtbray upay inay ethay owcay
adhay eenbay acrificedsay otay ardway offay evilsay--ithway ethay ideaay, alreadyay
oticednay, atthay ethay oremay eciouspray otay anmay ethay ingthay atthay ehay acrificedsay,
ethay oremay avourfay ishay acrificesay ouldway inway ithway ethay odsgay.  Oroasterzay
aughttay atthay itay asway impiousay otay illkay ethay owcay.

Itay asway ithway isthay inefay anday enlighteneday eligionray inay eirthay eartshay, enthay,
atthay Yruscay anday ishay Ersianspay amecay onqueringcay ethay esternway orldway.  Eythay
onqueredcay, utbay eythay eatedtray osethay atthay eythay onqueredcay ithway usticejay,
accordingay otay ethay eatgray eachingtay ofay Oroasterzay.  Asay eythay elievedbay inay
oneay odgay overay allay ethay earthay, eythay ightmay ermitpay ethay orshipway ofay atthay odgay
otay ebay arriedcay onay accordingay otay ethay ariousvay ustomscay atthay eythay oundfay
erewhay eythay entway, osay onglay asay osethay ustomscay ereway otnay altogetheray asebay
anday evilay.

Anday esethay Ersianspay ereway aay indlykay eoplepay.  Atthay isay oneay ofay ethay ausescay
ofay eirthay ictoriesvay.  Inay ethay eatgray orystay eway indfay isthay oftenay
epeatedray--atthay aay eoplepay ivinglay inay aay ountainousmay ountrycay, inay aay everesay
imateclay, anday inay urroundingssay ichwhay akemay eirthay iveslay ifficultday anday
eirthay oodfay ardhay otay etgay, omecay ownday onay ethay inhabitantsay ofay aay ountrycay
erewhay ethay oilsay isay oremay ertilefay, ethay imateclay ildermay, anday ifelay
altogetheray easieray, anday ivedray esethay easyay-oinggay eoplepay outay eforebay emthay
asay ifay eythay ereway eepshay unningray awayay eforebay olvesway.  Itay isay aay appeninghay
ichwhay eachestay ethay essonlay atthay ethay ongeststray, ethay ostmay effectiveay, indkay
ofay enmay areay osethay atthay areay accustomeday otay ardshiphay.

Utbay itay isay uiteqay earclay omfray allay eway avehay eensay atthay osethay omwhay ethay
Ersianspay usthay onqueredcay ereway actisedpray arriorsway.  Eythay ereway
onstantlycay ightingfay.  Ethay {116ay} Ersianspay, oweverhay, eemsay otay avehay omecay
uponay emthay ithway aay indkay ofay ightingfay otay ichwhay eythay ereway otnay altogetheray
accustomeday.  Ethay ifferenceday etweenbay eirthay ethodsmay asway ieflychay atthay
ethay Ersianspay ereway osay uchmay uickerqay inay ovementmay.  Eythay ereway inefay
archersay, anday eythay ereway eryvay inefay orsemenhay.  Itay asway isthay astlay, eirthay
orsemanshiphay, ichwhay eemssay otay avehay eenbay oneay ofay ethay eatgray ecretssay ofay
eirthay uccesssay.  Eythay adhay archersay othbay onay orsehay anday onay ootfay, utbay onay
orsehay especiallyay.  Eirthay ethodmay asway otay ashday ownday uponay ethay enemyay inay aay
iftsway attackay, ethay avalrycay openingay outay otay etlay ethay archersay onay ootfay
ootshay eirthay arrowsay.  Enthay, enwhay eythay adhay arassedhay ethay enemyay ithway isthay
iftsway argechay, itay asway otnay eirthay ayway otay omecay otay oseclay uartersqay ithway
imhay, atay allay eventsay atay ethay irstfay onsetay, utbay atherray otay etireray asay
uicklyqay asay eythay amecay onay, otay eray-ormfay, anday otay omecay ackbay otay ethay attackay
againay.

Ethay enemyay, onay eirthay etirementray, ifay ehay idday otnay owknay eirthay ayway ofay
ightingfay, asway atherray aptay otay inkthay atthay eythay ereway etreatingray
altogetheray anday ereway ivinggay upay ethay attackay.  Enthay ethay enemyay asway
inclineday otay artstay offay inay ursuitpay.  Atthay asway exactlyay atwhay uitedsay ethay
Ersianspay, orfay itay eantmay atthay enwhay eythay eturnedray orfay ethay extnay attackay
eythay oundfay ethay enemyay oremay okenbray upay anthay eforebay anday esslay ableay otay
esistray.  Itay asway ybay epeatedray onsetsay ofay isthay aturenay atthay eythay otgay ethay
ormationfay ofay anay opposingay armyay ockedknay otay iecespay; anday enthay, inay aay inalfay
attackay, isthay imetay essedpray oselyclay omehay, eythay ightmay, anday eythay
enerallygay idday, efeatday imhay.

Utbay ifay itay asway usthay aay ewnay ylestay ofay ightingfay atthay ethay Ersianspay oughtbray
ithway emthay omfray ethay eastay, eythay alsoay oundfay emselvesthay encounteringay aay
odemay ofay efenceday againstay eirthay attackay ichwhay asway angestray otay emthay.  Anday
isthay odemay ofay efenceday amecay omfray ethay estway.

Inay atthay allieday armyay ichwhay eway awsay ethay Ersianspay {117ay} efeatingday inay Asiaay
Inormay--ethay armyay edlay ybay Uscrœsay, ingkay ofay Ydialay--ethay Ersianspay ereway
ictoriousvay.  Eythay ereway osay ecisivelyday ictoriousvay atthay Uscrœsay
imselfhay asway akentay isonerpray ybay emthay, anday ethay olewhay engthstray eemssay otay
avehay eenbay ockedknay outay ofay ethay allianceay ybay atthay inglesay owblay.  Anday inay
ethay efeatedday armyay eway awsay atthay erethay ereway oldierssay omfray Artaspay, ichwhay
isay, asay youay eesay onay ethay apmay, inay atthay ostmay outhernsay anday almostay etachedday
artpay ofay Eecegray ichwhay isay alledcay ethay Eloponnesepay.  Ethay Artansspay,
ereforethay, ereway Eeksgray, anday ethay Eeksgray ereway amongay osethay atthay adhay ethay
orstway ofay itay inay isthay eatgray attlebay.  Utbay, orfay allay atthay, itay asway aay
Eciangray odemay ofay ightingfay atthay ademay ethay estbay ofay allay efencesday againstay
ethay Ersianpay ayway ofay attackingay.  Isthay odemay ofay efenceday isay atwhay asway
alledcay ethay "alanxphay."

[Idenotesay: Itycay atesstay]

Youay avehay otay understanday atthay ethay ordway Eecegray inay osethay aysday idday otnay
eanmay aay inglesay ationnay osay uchmay asay aay ollectioncay ofay allsmay atesstay ettledsay
oseclay esidebay oneay anotheray.  Ethay eoplespay ofay ethay ifferentday atesstay ereway
orfay ethay ostmay artpay ofay ethay amesay aceray, onay oubtday, ustjay ikelay ethay Emiticsay
eoplespay inay Yriasay anday Alestinepay.  Utbay eythay ifferedday omfray eachay otheray inay
eirthay ustomscay anday eirthay aysway ofay overnmentgay arfay oremay anthay ethay Emitessay
idday.  Eythay ereway eryvay oftenay ightingfay amongay emselvesthay anday, againay ikelay
ethay Emitessay, oundfay itay eryvay ifficultday otay etlay eirthay ealousyjay ofay eachay
otheray ieday ownday anday otay uniteay ogethertay orfay efenceday againstay aay oreignfay
oefay.  Ethay Artansspay ereway ethay ostmay arlikeway ofay allay ethay Eciangray atesstay.
Eirthay overnmentgay asway onductedcay inay uchsay aay ayway asay otay akemay allay ethay alesmay
inay ethay ountrycay ightersfay.

Eirthay ideaay ofay ightingfay asway asay ifferentday asay ossiblepay omfray atthay ofay ethay
Ersianspay.  Eythay adhay ewfay orsehay-oldierssay.  Eythay ereway awndray upay orfay
attlebay inay aay oseclay eepday ormationfay, Iay upposesay ikelay atwhay eway ouldshay allcay
"aay olidsay {118ay} uaresqay," anday itay asway isthay olidsay uaresqay atthay asway alledcay
ethay alanxphay.  Ethay oopstray ereway eavilyhay armeday, ithway ieldshay, ordsway, anday,
ostmay importantay ofay allay orfay eceivingray ethay argechay ofay avalrycay, ithway onglay
earsspay.  Youay ancay imagineay atwhay aay olidsay efenceday isthay ouldway akemay againstay
ethay ightlylay armeday avalrycay ofay ethay Ersianspay.  Ethay arrowsay ouldway otnay
ausecay eryvay erioussay osslay otay ethay armoureday anday ieldedshay Eeksgray, anday enwhay
ethay Ersianspay idday inallyfay ushpay eirthay argechay omehay ethay earsspay ouldway osay
eceiveray emthay atthay itay ouldway ebay ikelay argingchay aay iganticgay orcupinepay.

[Illustrationay: EEKgRay ARRIORway.]

Ofay oursecay allay atthay ouldway ependday onay ethay alanxphay eepingkay itsay olidsay
ormationfay.  Ifay itsay anksray otgay atay allay okenbray upay inay ursuitpay, underay ethay
istakenmay ideaay atthay ethay Ersianspay, afteray ethay irstfay onslaughtay, ereway oneday
ithway, anday ereway eeingflay awayay, enthay itay ouldway ebay aay eryvay uchmay esslay
ormidablefay orcupinepay onay ichwhay ethay orsemenhay ouldway omecay enwhay eythay
eturnedray otay ethay attackay.  Obablypray ethay Eeksgray uicklyqay earntlay ethay
Ersianspay' ethodsmay anday ewgray arefulcay otay eepkay eirthay ormationfay ithoutway
anyay igbay eaksbray inay itay.

[Idenotesay: Ethay alanxphay]

Esethay eavilyhay armeday oldierssay ofay ethay Eeksgray ereway alledcay opliteshay.
Afteray aay ilewhay ethay alanxphay asway assisteday ybay ighterlay armeday anday oremay
iftlysway ovingmay oopstray alledcay eltastspay, utbay ethay olidsay alanxphay asway
alwaysay ethay eatgray engthstray ofay eirthay armiesay.  Ethay eltastspay ereway {119ay}
evernay egardedray asay ofay equalay importanceay ithway ethay opliteshay, oughthay eythay
ereway eryvay aluablevay assistantsay otay ethay alanxphay.  Ethay Eeksgray, ivinglay inay
aay omparativelycay allsmay ountrycay ithway ethay easay onay eitheray idesay ofay emthay,
adhay otnay ethay amesay ancechay ofay ettinggay orseshay orfay aay umerousnay avalrycay asay
ethay ationsnay atthay adhay allay Asiaay oray allay ethay orthnay-easternay artspay ofay
Europeay otay awdray onay orfay eirthay upplysay.

Isthay alanxphay ofay ethay Eeksgray isay aay eryvay importantay eaturefay inay ethay eatgray
orystay.  Itay asway ieflychay, asay eway aymay upposesay, ybay easonray ofay eirthay
adoptingay isthay ormationfay anday akingmay uchsay endidsplay useay ofay itay, atthay eythay
ereway oughtsay afteray, asay eway owknay atthay eythay ereway, ybay otheray ationsnay otay
omecay otay ethay assistanceay ofay eirthay ownay armiesay.  Erethay ewgray upay inay Eecegray
aay assclay ofay atwhay eway aymay allcay ofessionalpray oldierssay, eadyray otay irehay
emselvesthay outay orfay aypay, otay ightfay onay anyay idesay atthay ouldway akemay itay orthway
eirthay ilewhay otay oday osay.  Eway indfay emthay usthay, asay atwhay eway allcay
"ercenariesmay," ightingfay ometimessay orfay ethay Egyptiansay, ometimessay
againstay emthay.  Omesay ofay emthay eway evenay indfay ightingfay orfay ethay Ersianspay.
Anday eythay arcelyscay easedcay ightingfay amongay emselvesthay.  Ethay Ersianpay
empireay extendeday otay Egyptay, anday otay allay ethay easternay oreshay ofay ethay
Editerraneanmay, utbay itay asway otnay owerfulpay enoughay otay eventpray uchmay
ightingfay etweenbay ethay eoplespay ubjectsay otay itay.  Itay ouldcay otnay, oweverhay,
evailpray uchmay againstay Eecegray, inay itespay ofay ethay ivisionsday etweenbay ethay
Eekgray atesstay.

Ouray orystay ownay, aysay afteray 500ay Bay.Cay., oray ereaboutsthay, isay oncernedcay eryvay
uchmay ithway ethay ainvay attemptsay ofay ethay Ersianspay otay ubjugatesay ethay
Eeksgray--otay etgay emthay underay eirthay yokeay.  Anday againay Iay ustmay emindray youay,
otay etgay ethay icturepay atay allay earclay anday ullfay, atthay ethay Editerraneanmay asway
ontinuallycay eingbay avagedray ybay ethay ipsshay ofay iratespay anday aderstray--eadyray
otay ebay eacefulpay erchantsmay ifay itay aidpay {120ay} emthay etterbay otay ebay osay, oray otay
attackay otheray ippingshay oray oastcay ownstay ifay eythay ouldcay oday osay ithway uccesssay.

Ethay Eoplespay ofay ethay Easay asway ethay olday amenay orfay esethay aidersray anday
aderstray, owhay ereway ofay allay ationsnay, ometimessay ombiningcay ogethertay, anday
akingmay emselvesthay intoay uiteqay aay owerfulpay avynay, ithway eadquartershay inay
Etecray oray anotheray ofay ethay anymay islandsay.  Ethay ostmay owerfulpay, asay aay
ationnay, ofay anyay ofay esethay easay-aidersray ereway ethay Iciansphœnay.  Eythay
antedplay anymay ettlementssay alongay ethay oastscay, eitheray onay islandsay oray onay
easilyay efendedday ojectingpray eadlandshay ofay ethay ainmay oresshay.  Uchsay acesplay
ereway ofay aluevay otay emthay orfay eirthay ipsshay otay unray intoay enwhay esetbay ybay
ormsstay oray ybay enemiesay.  Ethay ostmay importantay inay ouray orystay asway eirthay
ettlementsay atay Arthagecay.  Isthay Arthagecay illway ayplay aay eryvay igbay artpay
aterlay onay.

Utbay ownay eway ustmay aketay aay ooklay atay ethay eryvay emarkableray artpay ichwhay Eecegray
asway ayingplay atay isthay omentmay, 500ay Bay.Cay. oray osay, anday adhay ayedplay orfay omesay
yearsay anday asway otay ayplay orfay anymay otay omecay.  Iay expectay youay illway avehay
onderedway atthay Iay avehay otnay okenspay aboutay Omerhay anday ethay amousfay Iegesay ofay
Oytray, anday otheray eatgray enmay anday eatgray eventsay ichwhay appenedhay onglay eforebay
isthay imetay.  Oytray eganbay otay ebay esiegedbay eryvay ortlyshay afteray 1200ay Bay.Cay.
Omerhay ivedlay atay omesay imetay etweenbay 800ay anday 900ay Bay.Cay.  Eway avehay eftlay emthay
arfay ehindbay.

Ethay easonray ywhay Iay idday otnay ickpay emthay upay anday itfay emthay intoay eirthay aceplay
inay ethay orystay enwhay eway amecay otay ethay yearsay ofay eirthay appeninghay isay atthay ethay
artpay ayedplay ybay Eecegray inay ethay akingmay ofay isthay eatgray orystay--atthay isay otay
aysay, inay ethay akingmay ofay ethay orldway--isay ifferentday omfray ethay artpay ayedplay ybay
anyay otheray eoplepay.  Itay isay uchsay aay ifferentday artpay atthay itay isay almostay
anotheray orystay, althoughay itay oesday eallyray itfay intoay ethay eatgray orystay anday
isay aay eryvay importantay artpay ofay itay.

{121ay}

Ethay otheray eatgray eoplespay atthay eway avehay eenbay alkingtay aboutay, ethay
Egyptiansay, Abyloniansbay, anday Ersianspay, onqueredcay astvay ountriescay,
oundedfay astvay empiresay.  Ethay Eeksgray idday othingnay ofay isthay indkay.  Eythay
ereway inefay anday accomplisheday oldierssay, asay eway avehay eensay, utbay ethay ariousvay
atesstay ereway ootay isunitedday orfay emthay otay ebay ableay otay ingbray eirthay orcesfay
ogethertay oray otay eepkay emthay orfay anyay engthlay ofay imetay ogethertay.

[Idenotesay: Ethay eniusgay ofay Eecegray]

Utbay orfay anymay enturiescay eythay ereway ybay arfay ethay ostmay accomplisheday eoplepay
inay ethay orldway; eirthay artistsay, othbay ainterspay anday ulptorsscay, ereway arfay
aheaday ofay ethay estray; eirthay inkersthay entway eeperday anday ithway oremay earclay
insightay anday isdomway anthay anyay othersay intoay ethay anymay oblemspray anday uzzlespay
atthay ifelay anday ethay orldway etsay orfay usay; eythay adhay inerfay ulptorsscay, inerfay
oratorsay, inerfay oetspay, obablypray eythay adhay inerfay usiciansmay; eway avehay eensay
atthay eythay adhay aay inerfay attlebay ormationfay.

Inay actfay, inay evernessclay anday inay allay ethay artsay anday iencesscay ethay Eeksgray
ereway otnay onlyay uperiorsay otay allay osethay aboutay emthay, utbay eythay ereway
uperiorsay otay allay atthay avehay eenbay incesay--evenay otay ourselvesay, oughthay eway
avehay adhay allay esethay yearsay inay ichwhay otay earnlay.  Eway avehay earntlay otay akemay
ainstray ogay, anday ethay elephonetay anday oisonpay asesgay, anday unsgay atthay illway
ootshay entytway-ivefay ilesmay, anday otheray ingsthay ofay atthay indkay.  Utbay eway areay
otnay ethay equalsay ofay ethay Eeksgray ofay 500ay Bay.Cay. inay artay, oratoryay, oetrypay oray
ilosophyphay.  Adhay itay otnay eenbay orfay ethay Eekgray ilosophersphay eway annotcay
elltay atwhay ouray ilosophyphay ightmay avehay eenbay, orfay itay isay uiltbay upay onay ethay
oundationsfay eythay aidlay; utbay eway aymay oubtday etherwhay itay ouldway avehay eenbay
earlynay asay arfay-eeingsay oray asay interestingay.

Anday atthay isay eallyray ethay ostmay importantay artpay atthay ethay Eeksgray ooktay inay
ethay akingmay ofay ethay orystay--aay artpay uiteqay ifferentday omfray atthay ofay ethay
eatgray empireay-akersmay, anday yetay, {122ay} asay Iay inkthay youay illway agreeay, aay
iggerbay artpay anthay anyay ofay eirsthay.  Orfay itay ademay, oray idday aay eatgray ealday otay
akemay, ethay oughtthay ofay ethay orldway atwhay itay isay otay-ayday.  Itay idday aay eatgray
ealday otay akemay ethay oughtthay ofay ethay orldway atwhay itay asway allay ownday ethay agespay
ofay ethay orystay, aysay omfray 1200ay Bay.Cay. onwardsay.  Iay eanmay atthay itay ademay enmay
inkthay aboutay ingsthay--aboutay artay anday ilosophyphay anday usicmay, anday aboutay
ifelay inay eneralgay--asay eythay oday inkthay.  Adhay itay otnay eenbay orfay ethay Eeksgray eway
ouldshay ebay inkingthay ifferentlyday, anday obablypray otnay earlynay osay iselyway,
aboutay allay esethay ingsthay.  Atthay isay ethay eatestgray orkway atthay ethay Eeksgray
avehay oneday inay ethay orldway.

Youay aymay ememberray atthay eway aidsay ethay isastersday ichwhay efellbay ethay Ewsjay,
anday eirthay atteringscay oughoutthray ethay otheray ationsnay, ademay emthay ableay otay
aketay eirthay eligiousray ideasay ithway emthay, anday otay owsay osethay ideasay, asay itay
ereway eedssay omfray ichwhay antsplay ouldshay ingspray, amongstay osethay ationsnay
intoay ichwhay eythay ereway ivendray.  Omethingsay ikelay ethay amesay indkay ofay
atteringscay appenedhay otay ethay Eeksgray, anday osay enableday emthay otay arrycay eirthay
ideasay overay aay eatgray artpay ofay ethay orldway.  Ofay eirthay ownay accorday eythay
ouldway, onay oubtday, avehay arriedcay emthay arfay.  Ifay youay ooklay atay ethay apmay ofay
Eecegray, youay illway eesay atthay otnay onlyay ashay ethay ountrycay ethay easay onay eethray
idessay ofay itay, utbay atthay itay isay utcay upay, anday utcay intoay, ybay aay onderfulway
umbernay ofay aysbay anday ulfsgay ofay ethay easay, osay atthay itay ouldway avehay aay eryvay
eatgray engthlay ofay eashoresay ifay allay ereway addeday ogethertay.  Aturallynay atthay
eantmay atthay ethay Eeksgray ereway eatgray easay-oersgay.  Eythay ereway aay eatgray
"aritimemay" eoplepay, asay eway ouldshay aysay--omfray _aremay_, ichwhay isay Atinlay orfay
easay.  Aay oodgay ealday ofay eirthay excellenceay inay artay eway aymay uspectsay atthay eythay
erivedday omfray osethay ancientay Inoansmay omwhay eway awsay astersmay ofay Etecray eryvay
onglay agoay.  Ethay Inoansmay, asay ethay Inotaurmay egendlay owedshay usay, ereway
astersmay ofay Athensay alsoay.  Eythay ereway ethay eatgray easay-owerpay inay eryvay
ancientay {123ay} imestay.  Eythay eftlay evidencesay ofay eirthay artay atay Ycenæmay inay
Eecegray.  Ethay Eeksgray, ollowingfay ethay Inoansmay inay artay, erhapspay ollowedfay
emthay alsoay inay ethay ilfulskay anagementmay ofay ipsshay.  Eway owknay, atay allay
eventsay, atthay eythay entway arfay anday ideway onay ethay Editerraneanmay inay ipsshay,
ertainlycay asay eatgray aderstray, obablypray oftenay asay iratespay, anday, etherwhay
ethay oneay oray ethay otheray, akingtay eirthay oughtsthay, eirthay artsay, eirthay
ulturecay ithway emthay.

[Idenotesay: Ethay expansionay ofay ethay Eeksgray]

Utbay esidesbay isthay--esidebay esethay expeditionsay ichwhay eythay entway ofay eirthay
ownay illway, anday esidebay ethay urtherfay eadspray ofay eirthay ulturecay, ichwhay eirthay
oldierssay, oinggay outay otay ightfay orfay irehay, ouldway arrycay ithway emthay--omesay oray
otheray ofay ethay Eeksgray ereway omfray imetay otay imetay inay ethay oursecay ofay ethay orystay
obligeday otay yflay overay-easay, obligeday otay avesay emselvesthay omfray ethay essurepray
ofay enemiesay omingcay ownday onay emthay omfray ethay orthnay.

Itay isay exactlyay atwhay eway awsay appeninghay inay Abyloniabay atthay appenedhay erehay
ootay inay Eecegray.  Itay isay exactlyay atwhay appenedhay againay anday againay inay ethay
eatgray orystay--ethay eoplespay omfray aay ildway arrenbay ountrycay omecay essingpray
ownday uponay eoplespay ivinglay inay aay oremay ertilefay oneay.  Outay ofay Acethray, ichwhay
youay illway eesay onay ethay apmay yinglay otay ethay orthnay ofay Eecegray, ownday oughthray
Acedoniamay anday Essalythay, amecay ildway arlikeway ibestray essingpray onay ethay
eoplespay ofay ethay oremay ertilefay outhsay.  Ariousvay easonsray orfay eirthay
ovementsmay areay ivengay ybay ethay Eeksgray owhay eftlay eirthay ativenay ountrycay anday
ettledsay, omesay inay ethay islandsay, omesay inay Asiaay Inormay.  Inay omesay instancesay
itay asway admitteday atthay eythay entway underay essurepray ofay enemiesay; utbay atthay isay
otnay aay easonray ichwhay ouldway ebay eryvay easantplay otay eirthay idepray.  Otheray
easonsray ereway ecordedray, utbay obablypray isthay asway eallyray ethay ostmay ommoncay.

Inay eirthay ailingssay otay anday ofray, anday adingstray, eythay ouldway earnlay aboutay
ethay ountriescay onay ethay Editerraneanmay oresshay.  {124ay} Evenay ifay eythay adhay
otnay ullfay owledgeknay ofay itay eforebay, eythay ouldway avehay earntlay allay atthay eythay
eedednay otay owknay aboutay ethay esternway oreshay ofay Asiaay Inormay inay ethay oursecay ofay
ethay entay yearsay ichwhay areay assigneday otay ethay Iegesay ofay Oytray.

Ilusay asway atherfay ofay Ostray, ingkay ofay Oytray, anday ethay Eeksgray alledcay Oytray
Iliumay, afteray Ilusay, atherray anthay afteray ethay onsay Ostray omfray omwhay ethay amenay
Oytray amecay.  Anday ethay Iliaday isay ereforethay ethay orystay ofay Iliumay, otherwiseay
alledcay Oytray.  Isthay endidsplay oempay isay attributeday otay Omerhay asay itsay
authoray, utbay atwhay Omerhay obablypray idday asway otay eciteray, oray otay ingsay otay ethay
accompanimentay ofay ethay yrelay, esethay oriesstay, ichwhay ereway onlyay ittenwray
ownday yearsay afterwardsay.  Eway aymay imagineay imhay omethingsay ikelay ethay ardbay oray
ethay oubadourtray.  Owhay uchmay ofay ishay ownay inventionay ehay addeday otay ethay orystay
eway annotcay owknay.

Ethay orystay, asay eway avehay itay omfray imhay, isay atthay Ueenqay Elenhay avinghay eenbay
akentay omfray erhay omehay, ithway erhay ownay illingway onsentcay, ybay Arispay anday
arriedcay otay Oytray, ethay Eeksgray entway afteray erhay anday iedtray otay etgay erhay ackbay.
Eythay iedtray orfay ethay olewhay entay yearsay ichwhay areay ascribeday otay ethay Iegesay ofay
Oytray.  Elenhay asway ethay ostmay eautifulbay adylay inay ethay orldway, anday ethay Iliaday
isay ertainlycay oneay ofay ethay ostmay eautifulbay oemspay.

Utbay ancay eway elievebay ethay orystay?

Ethay Eeksgray ereway aay ingularlysay intelligentay eoplepay.  Oesday itay eemsay ethay
actay ofay anyay intelligentay eoplepay otay ogay onay ightingfay orfay entay yearsay inay
orderay otay etgay ackbay evenay ethay ostmay eautifulbay adylay inay ethay orldway?  Anday ifay
eythay ereway atay allay intelligentay eythay ouldway ertainlycay ebay aptay otay eflectray
atthay eshay ouldway otnay ebay ikelylay otay ebay equallyay eautifulbay atay ethay enday ofay
ethay entay yearsay asay eshay asway atay ethay eginningbay.

[Idenotesay: Ethay Iegesay ofay Oytray]

Aay eryvay earnedlay Eciangray olarschay, Dray. Alterway Eaflay, ashay ittenwray aay ookbay
aboutay ethay Iegesay ofay Oytray ichwhay ellstay ethay orystay inay aay uchmay esslay omanticray
anday oeticalpay utbay aay {125ay} uchmay oremay obablepray ayway.  Anday Iay antway otay elltay
atthay orystay, asay ehay ellstay itay, eryvay ortlyshay otay youay, ecausebay itay ivesgay
uchsay aay oodgay ideaay ofay ethay ayway atthay enmay ereway ivinglay alongay ethay oreshay ofay
Asiaay Inormay atay atthay imetay, aysay 1200ay oray osay Bay.Cay.

Oytray, youay illway eesay ifay youay ooklay atay ethay apmay, andsstay, oray oodstay, earlynay
inay ethay orthnay-esternway ornercay ofay Asiaay Inormay, itsay erritorytay eachingray upay
otay ethay oreshay ofay atthay arrownay easay-annelchay ichwhay useday otay ebay alledcay ethay
Ellesponthay anday isay ownay alledcay ethay Ardanellesday.  Anyay Eekgray ipsshay
ishingway otay ogay orfay adetray oughthray ethay Ellesponthay ustmay asspay oseclay alongay
ethay oastcay ofay Oytray andlay, osay oseclay atthay anyay eoplepay owhay adhay ethay ommandcay
ofay ethay andlay ouldcay allysay outay anday interfereay ithway eirthay assagepay.  Ethay
urrentcay owsflay outay estwardway oughthray ethay Ellesponthay, anday ethay indway
usuallyay owsblay omfray orthnay-estway, againstay ethay ipsshay oinggay eastwarday.

Ethay olewhay ointpay ofay Dray. Eaflay'say argumentay isay atthay atay Oytray erethay asway aay
arketmay, oray airfay, atay ichwhay ethay oducepray ofay ethay ountriescay inay ethay eastay
asway oldsay otay ethay Eeksgray anday otheray eoplepay inay ethay estway, anday atthay ethay
Ojanstray erivedday uchmay ofitpray omfray isthay arketmay.  Ethay ofitpray omfray isthay
arketmay eythay ouldway ofay oursecay oselay ifay ethay esternway eoplepay ereway ableay otay
ailsay upay oughthray ethay Ellesponthay anday oday eirthay adetray irectday ithway ethay
eoplepay alongay ethay oreshay ofay ethay Ackblay Easay.  Ethay Ojanstray ereway, inay actfay,
atwhay eway owadaysnay allcay "iddlemay-enmay," anday youay owknay owhay eway areay alwaysay
yingtray otay ingbray ethay onsumercay, ethay ersonpay owhay antsway otay useay ethay ingthay
oducedpray, intoay irectday ouchtay ithway ethay oducerpray, anday osay otay oday awayay ithway
ethay ofitpray ichwhay ethay iddlemay-anmay argeschay anday ichwhay ehay againay utspay onay otay
ethay icepray ofay ethay ingthay enwhay ehay ellssay itay otay ethay onsumercay.  Ethay Eeksgray
ereway ethay onsumerscay.  Eythay antedway otay oday awayay ithway ethay iddlemay-enmay, atthay
isay otay aysay {126ay} ithway ethay Ojanstray, anday atthay, arfay oremay obablypray anthay
ethay ingingbray ackbay ofay ethay eautifulbay adylay, asway ywhay eythay entspay osay anymay
yearsay anday osay anymay iveslay inay ethay iegesay ofay Oytray.

Youay illway ememberray atwhay eway aidsay eforebay aboutay ethay indkay ofay ipsshay atthay
esethay eoplepay adhay.  Eythay ereway opelledpray ybay owingray, oray ybay ailssay ichwhay
ereway onlyay usefulay enwhay ethay indway asway earlynay irectlyday ehindbay emthay.  Eythay
adhay otay utpay inay otay omesay arbouragehay everyay ightnay, ecausebay eythay idday otnay
areday otay ogay alongay inay ethay arkday, ithoutway artschay anday ithoutway ompasscay anday
ithoutway owledgeknay ofay owhay otay eerstay ybay ethay arsstay.  Evenay inay aytimeday eythay
ardlyhay aredday otay ogay outay ofay ightsay ofay andlay anday ofay ethay andmarkslay ichwhay
eythay ewknay.

Ethay islandsay inay esethay eassay ielay osay oseclay otay eachay otheray atthay itay asway
ossiblepay orfay emthay otay eepcray alongay inay isthay ayway omfray oneay otay ethay otheray
anday osay otay ethay oastscay ofay Asiaay omfray Eecegray.  Anday erethay asway anotheray
easonray ywhay eythay ouldcay otnay ogay onglay oyagesvay--eythay adhay onay ightlay isternscay
inay ichwhay otay arrycay eshfray aterway.  Eythay adhay otay aketay itay inay eavyhay earthernay
arsjay.

Isthay eednay orfay aterway eythay ouldcay upplysay omfray iversray ichwhay anray outay
estwardway oughthray Oytray andlay.  Eythay ouldway ielay alongay ethay oastcay erethay, asay
eythay adedtray ithway ethay Ojantray iddlemay-enmay, oray, ossiblypay, asay eythay aitedway
orfay aay avouringfay indway otay ogay oughthray ethay Ellesponthay, ichwhay ethay Ojanstray
ightmay alloway emthay otay oday onay aymentpay ofay omesay olltay oneymay, asay eway ouldshay
allcay itay, orfay ethay ermissionpay.

Ethay easonsray orfay inkingthay atthay ethay ishway otay oday awayay ithway esethay Ojanstray
anday eirthay arketmay asway ethay ealray otivemay ofay ethay entay yearsay' arway areay
engthenedstray enwhay eway ooklay atay ethay amesnay ofay ethay eoplespay atthay amecay otay
ethay elphay ofay ethay Eeksgray onay ethay oneay idesay anday ofay ethay Ojanstray onay ethay
otheray.  Osethay atthay amecay otay ethay assistanceay ofay ethay Eeksgray {127ay} ereway
ethay eoplespay alongay ethay Editerraneanmay oresshay oray onay ethay islandsay; osethay
atthay aideday ethay Ojanstray ereway ethay eoplespay omfray ethay eastay.  Osay eway avehay
ethay otway etsay inay atherray istinctday oppositionay otay eachay otheray; ethay Ojanstray
anday ethay easternay eoplepay owhay entsay eirthay ingsthay otay ethay arketmay atay Oytray
anday adhay anay interestay inay ethay arketmay eingbay eptkay upay, anday ethay esternway
eoplespay owhay antedway ethay arketmay estroyedday.

Atthay isay aay eryvay osaicpray orystay, isay itay otnay, inay omparisoncay ithway ethay
omanceray aboutay ethay eautifulbay adylay?  Itay isay otnay ethay indkay ofay orystay atthay
Omerhay oray anyay otheray ardbay ouldway arecay otay ingsay oray ishay istenerslay ouldway
aketay easureplay inay earinghay.  Utbay Iay amay afraiday itay isay oremay ikelylay otay ebay
ethay uetray orystay ofay ethay easonray ywhay aay acticalpray anday intelligentay eoplepay
ikelay ethay Eeksgray oughtfay osay ardhay anday osay onglay otay annihilateay Oytray.  Iay
avehay aidsay osay uchmay aboutay isthay amousfay iegesay ecausebay itay ivesgay uchsay aay
oodgay opportunityay ofay ettingsay atwhay areay obablypray ethay actsfay esidebay ethay
ictionsfay ichwhay avehay eenbay oundedfay onay emthay.  Itay eachestay usay owhay esethay
oeticpay oriesstay ereway ademay.

[Idenotesay: Ethay Odysseyay]

Ethay otheray eatgray oempay attributeday otay Omerhay, ethay Odysseyay, isay onlyay
anotheray apterchay, ealingday ithway ethay adventuresay ofay oneay ofay ethay incipalpray
Eekgray eroeshay, ofay ethay orystay ofay ethay iegesay.  Itay isay evenay oremay oriousglay
eadingray anthay ethay Iliaday itselfay.

Ownay, ateverwhay ethay uthtray ebay aboutay ethay Ojantray arway, oneay actfay isay uiteqay
earclay anday ertaincay omfray itsay orystay, asay ellway asay omfray otheray evidenceay,
atthay ethay Eeksgray adhay ealingsday, onstantcay ealingsday, ithway Asiaay Inormay.
Ereforethay eirthay oughtthay, eirthay artay, eirthay ulturecay, anday allay atthay asway
ostmay emarkableray inay eirthay aracterchay asay aay ationnay, asway ownknay inay Asiaay
Inormay, itay asway ownknay amongay allay esethay islandsay ofay ethay Eanægay Easay anday
alongay ethay outhernsay, ethay Africanay, oresshay ofay ethay Editerraneanmay.
Everywhereay atthay itay entway {128ay} itay asway uperiorsay otay ethay oughtthay anday ethay
ulturecay ofay ethay ativenay eoplepay, anday everywhereay itay adhay itsay effectay.  Iay
antway youay otay ealiseray atthay.  Itay asway otnay ybay easonray ofay ethay orcefay ofay eirthay
armsay, oughthay eythay ereway uchsay oodgay ightersfay, atthay ethay Eeksgray ountcay orfay
osay uchmay inay ouray eatgray orystay, utbay ybay easonray ofay ethay orcefay ofay eirthay
oughtthay, anday ofay eirthay accomplishmentsay.

Omesay undredhay oray otway undredhay yearsay afteray ethay iegesay ofay Oytray eway indfay
ertaincay oloniescay oray itiescay ofay ethay Eeksgray oundedfay alongay ethay esternway
oreshay ofay Asiaay Inormay.  Ethay Eeksgray ivinglay inay esethay itiescay ereway alledcay
Ioniansay.  Ortlyshay eforebay ethay omingcay ofay Yruscay, ethay allay-onqueringcay
Ersianpay, osethay Ioniansay adhay eenbay onqueredcay ybay atthay ingkay Uscrœsay ofay
Ydialay omwhay eway awsay akingtay ommandcay ofay atthay illay-atedfay allianceay ormedfay
againstay Ersiapay.  Ethay Ersianpay adhay ownay, ybay ethay imetay, 500ay Bay.Cay., otay ichwhay
eway avehay oughtbray ownday ethay orystay, ademay imselfhay astermay ofay allay Asiaay
Inormay.  Ethay Ionianay itiescay adhay omecay underay ishay ominanceday.




{129ay}

APTERcHay IXay

EtHay ORIOUSgLay AYSday OFay EECEgRay

Itay isay amusingay otay opstay ownay anday enthay inay ethay oursecay ofay aay orystay otay onderway
owhay itay ouldway avehay onegay ifay oneay oray otheray ofay ethay eventsay inay itay adhay
appenedhay atherray ifferentlyday.  Ometimessay itay eemssay asay ifay ustjay oneay eventay
urnedtay ethay olewhay oursecay ofay atwhay appenedhay afterwardsay.

Osay erehay inay isthay eatgray orystay ofay oursay eway aymay onderway atwhay ouldway avehay
appenedhay otay ethay orldway ifay ethay Ersianspay, ushingpay eirthay ayway estwardway,
adhay otnay omecay upay againstay atthay ongstray allway ofay oppositionay ichwhay eythay
oundfay inay ethay Eekgray alanxphay.  Erethay asway onay otheray owerpay, osay arfay asay eway
owknay, atay isthay imetay, inay ethay estway, atthay asway atay allay ikelylay otay ebay ableay otay
opstay emthay.

Ifay eway ooklay atay atwhay appenedhay inay ethay oremay outhwardsay irectionday ofay eirthay
advanceay, inay Egyptay, eway allshay erhapspay ebay inclineday otay inkthay atthay eythay
ouldway otnay avehay onegay eryvay uchmay artherfay estwardway anthay eythay idday, orfay ethay
Egyptianay orystay ofay atthay imetay owsshay atthay eythay ereway otnay ableay otay
establishay eirthay owerpay eryvay ecurelysay inay atthay ountrycay.  Orfay earlynay
ortyfay yearsay afteray ethay Ersianpay onquestcay ofay Egyptay ybay Ambysescay, ethay onsay
ofay Yruscay, Egyptay asway eldhay asay aay ovincepray ofay Ersiapay, utbay inay 488ay Bay.Cay. ethay
Egyptiansay ademay aay uccessfulsay evoltray anday ewthray offay ethay Ersianpay yokeay orfay
aay imetay.  Eethray yearsay aterlay eythay ereway againay ubduedsay ybay Erxesxay, owhay asway
enthay ingkay ofay Ersiapay, utbay onlyay ifteenfay yearsay afterwardsay eythay ereway
{130ay} againay evoltingray, anday oughthray ethay olewhay ofay atthay enturycay, 500ay otay
400ay Bay.Cay., eythay ereway ontinuallycay isingray againstay eirthay Ersianpay astersmay,
evernay uiteqay ucceedingsay inay inningway eirthay eedomfray, utbay onstantlycay
ivinggay oubletray, evernay ompletelycay ubduedsay.  Itay isay evidentay atthay ethay
Ersianspay, afteray eirthay irstfay anday ostmay effectiveay onquestcay, evernay adhay aay
eryvay ecuresay oldhay overay ethay eoplepay ofay ethay Ilenay.

Enthay, ifay eway urntay otay ooklay atay atwhay asway oinggay onay artherfay orthnay, erewhay
ethay Ersianpay avalrycay ereway omingcay upay againstay atthay amousfay Eekgray alanxphay,
eway allshay eesay oodgay easonray ywhay ethay Ersianspay ereway otnay ableay otay ivegay aay
eatgray ealday ofay attentionay otay akingmay eirthay ositionpay oodgay inay Egyptay.  Ethay
onderway isay atthay eythay ouldshay avehay oundfay anyay orcesfay atay allay otay arespay orfay
atthay enterpriseay.

Ethay Ersianpay onarchmay adhay assumeday ethay itletay ofay Ingkay ofay Ingskay.  Ehay
aimedclay ominionday overay ethay olewhay orldway, asay ethay Ersianspay ewknay itay.  Itay
ustmay avehay eenbay ostmay exatiousvay otay imhay, anday otay atthay eatgray aimclay anday
itletay ofay ishay, otay indfay ethay aimclay opposeday anday ontestedcay.  Ehay adhay
onqueredcay Eeksgray eforebay--osethay Artansspay omwhay ehay adhay etmay ightingfay inay
ethay allianceay underay Ingkay Uscrœsay.  Ehay ouldway onquercay emthay againay.  Ehay
ouldway ushcray emthay anday aketay ossessionpay ofay eirthay ountrycay.

Afteray allay atthay eythay adhay accomplisheday, ethay onquestcay ofay Eecegray annotcay
avehay eemedsay otay ethay Ersianspay asay ifay itay ouldway ebay aay ardhay attermay.  Eecegray,
asay aay inglesay ationnay, idday otnay existay.  Erethay ereway anymay Eciangray atesstay,
utbay eythay ereway alwaysay ightingfay amongay emselvesthay, eachay ivingstray orfay ethay
upremacysay.  Ethay iefchay ofay ethay ightingfay atesstay ereway Artaspay anday Athensay.
Eachay ofay esethay ouldway ormfay alliancesay omfray imetay otay imetay ithway otheray
atesstay otay ightfay againstay ethay otheray.  Ustjay atay isthay omentmay, atthay isay ustjay
eforebay 500ay Bay.Cay., ethay ontentioncay etweenbay emthay asway ostmay everesay.  Ethay
ormsfay ofay ethay overnmentgay inay ethay otway {131ay} ereway arplyshay opposeday.  Ethay
overnmentgay ofay Athensay adhay atelylay allenfay intoay ethay andshay ofay ethay eoplepay.
Ethay eoplepay, ethay emocracyday (omfray _emosday_, ethay eoplepay, anday _atoskray_,
owerpay) adhay eposedday eirthay ingkay anday ivendray imhay outay ofay ethay ountrycay.  Ethay
Artansspay, owhay atedhay ethay ideaay ofay aay emocraticday overnmentgay, ympathisedsay
ithway imhay, anday onay oubtday ouldway avehay estoredray imhay otay owerpay adhay eythay eenbay
ableay otay oday osay; utbay ehay entway otay Asiaay Inormay, otay ethay ourtcay ofay Ariusday, owhay
asway enthay ingkay ofay Ersiapay, anday esoughtbay ishay elphay.  Ethay Ersianpay asway eryvay
illingway otay ivegay itay, utbay itay asway otnay untilay omesay yearsay aterlay, inay 490ay
Bay.Cay., atthay ethay irstfay actualay invasionay ofay Eecegray ybay ethay Ersianspay ooktay
aceplay.  Atthay invasionay acticallypray eganbay anday endeday ithway atwhay asway oneay
ofay ethay ostmay amousfay attlesbay inay ethay orldway'say istoryhay, ethay attlebay ofay
Arathonmay.

[Idenotesay: Arathonmay]

Itay asway oughtfay onay aay allsmay ainplay, onlyay omesay eethray ilesmay ideway, onay ethay
eashoresay, erewhay ethay Ersianspay adhay isembarkedday eirthay orcesfay.  Anday erehay
Iay ouldway ivegay youay aay ordway ofay arningway ichwhay ustmay applyay otay allay isthay orystay
ofay ethay oriousglay aysday ofay Eecegray.  Ethay attlesbay--Arathonmay, Ermopylæthay,
anday Alamissay--avehay ecomebay eryvay amousfay, anday ightlyray amousfay.  Eythay ereway
ofay importanceay inay ethay orystay ecausebay eythay--Arathonmay anday Alamissay, atay allay
eventsay, ichwhay ereway Eciangray ictoriesvay--utpay aay opstay otay atthay estwardway
advanceay ofay ethay Ersianspay ichwhay ightmay avehay extendeday eway annotcay aysay owhay
arfay utbay orfay osethay ictoriesvay.  Utbay eythay ereway attlesbay inay ichwhay ethay
orcesfay engageday onay ethay oneay idesay oray ethay otheray ereway almostay idiculouslyray
allsmay inay omparisoncay ithway ethay armiesay ichwhay eway avehay eensay utpay intoay ethay
ieldfay.  Eythay ereway oughtfay overay eryvay allsmay acesspay ofay andlay oray easay, anday
eythay ereway eryvay uicklyqay overay.

Utbay oughthay eythay areay ightlyray amousfay, orfay ethay easonray ichwhay Iay avehay
okenspay ofay, aay oodgay ealday ofay eirthay amefay isay ueday otay ethay endidsplay ayway inay
ichwhay eirthay orystay ashay eenbay oldtay {132ay} otay usay ybay ethay eatgray istorianhay
Erodotushay, anday, asay youay owknay, ethay estbay orystay inay ethay orldway ancay ebay ademay
otay eemsay eryvay oorpay ifay itay isay adlybay oldtay; anday aay oorpay orystay ancay ebay ademay
interestingay ybay oodgay ellingtay.  Esethay eoplepay, esethay Eeksgray, ithway eirthay
extraordinaryay accomplishmentsay, adhay ethay owerpay ofay ellingtay oriesstay eryvay
ellway, anday ethay oriesstay eallyray ereway oodgay inay emselvesthay.  Eythay ereway oodgay
oriesstay, anday oriesstay ofay importantay eventsay, utbay ethay eventsay areay atherray
aptay otay appearay evenay oremay importantay anthay eythay eallyray ereway, ustjay ecausebay
eirthay orystay isay oldtay osay eryvay ellway.

Atthay isay ethay ordway ofay arningway ichwhay Iay antway otay ivegay youay aboutay allay esethay
oriesstay ofay ethay oriousglay aysday ofay Eecegray.

Inay ivinggay youay ethay outlinesay ofay ethay eatgray orystay ofay ethay orldway, asay Iay amay
yingtray otay oday inay isthay ookbay, erethay isay onay acespay orfay anay accountay ofay esethay
attlesbay.  Youay ustmay eadray aboutay emthay elsewhereay, anday allay Iay ancay oday isay otay
elltay youay owhay eythay itfay intoay ethay igbay orystay, erewhay eythay omecay, anday owhay itay
asway atthay eythay appenedhay.  Ethay Eeksgray, atay isthay attlebay ofay Arathonmay,
efeatedday ethay Ersianspay anday utterlyay emolishedday anyay ancechay ofay ethay
uccesssay ichwhay isthay irstfay invasionay ofay Eecegray ybay ethay Ersianspay ouldcay
avehay adhay.  Ethay Ersianspay eturnedray againay otay ethay attackay, utbay itay asway otnay
untilay entay yearsay aterlay; anday enthay itay asway attempteday inay aay ifferentday
annermay.

Erethay adhay eenbay anay effortay atay ethay invasionay ofay Eecegray evenay eforebay atthay
ichwhay asway efeatedday atay Arathonmay.  Osethay Ionianay itiescay alongay ethay oastcay
ofay Asiaay Inormay adhay evoltedray againstay ethay Ersianpay uleray, anday adhay eenbay
aideday ybay ethay Atheniansay, owhay ereway oselyclay elatedray otay emthay.  Aay Ersianpay
expeditionay adhay etsay outay ourfay yearsay eforebay ethay Arathonmay enterpriseay otay
unishpay ethay Atheniansay orfay elpinghay ethay Ioniansay inay atthay evoltray ichwhay ethay
Ersianspay {133ay} adhay easilyay epressedray.  Itay etsay outay othbay ybay andlay anday
easay, ithway ethay intentionay atthay ethay eetflay ouldshay upportsay ethay andlay armyay,
utbay ethay eetflay asway aughtcay anday atteredshay inay aay ormstay, anday althoughay ethay
Ersianpay owerpay asway upposedsay otay ebay establisheday overay Acethray anday evenay asay
arfay estway asay Acedoniamay, eirthay andlay armyay asway allenfay uponay anday okenbray upay
ybay attacksay ofay ethay ildway ibestray onay ethay ordersbay ofay Acethray ithoutway everay
eachingray Eekgray erritorytay atay allay.

Utbay oughthay isthay expeditionay, usthay annedplay otay actay ogethertay ybay andlay anday
easay, adhay eenbay aay ailurefay, itay asway ustjay ethay amesay indkay ofay enterpriseay,
onlyay onay aay arfay argerlay alescay, atthay asway attempteday ybay Erxesxay, enthay Ingkay
ofay Ingskay, entay yearsay afteray ethay Ersianpay overthroway atay Arathonmay.  Ingkay
Erxesxay imselfhay asway ethay eaderlay.

[Idenotesay: Erxesxay]

Iay inkthay eway aymay ebay afesay inay ayingsay atthay onay orcesfay asay argelay asay esethay, inay
ethay umbernay ofay enmay enrolleday inay emthay, adhay everay eforebay eenbay ollectedcay
orfay aay ilitarymay urposepay, anday alsoay atthay onay ormerfay expeditionay adhay everay
eenbay annedplay ithway osay uchmay arecay anday orethoughtfay.  Erxesxay ademay otway
idgesbray orfay ethay assingpay ofay ishay armyay acrossay ethay Ellesponthay; ehay utcay aay
analcay oughthray ethay Isthmusay atay Ountmay Athosay orfay ethay assagepay ofay ishay
eetflay.  Ethay eetflay, youay eesay, ifay youay illway ooklay atay ethay apmay, ouldway oastcay
oundray alongay ethay outhsay ofay Acethray, accompanyingay ethay armyay, illtay itay amecay
otay ethay Eninsulapay atay ethay enday ofay ichwhay isay Ountmay Athosay.  Erxesxay adhay
establisheday ationsstay inay Acethray orfay ethay upplysay ofay ishay armyay ithway oodfay
anday allay eedfulnay ingsthay asay itay entway alongay.  Itay asway ustjay offay Ountmay Athosay
atthay ethay ormstay adhay atteredscay ethay eetflay ofay ethay ormerfay expeditionay atthay
ehay adhay entsay againstay Eecegray.  Ybay akingmay isthay analcay, anday osay ettinglay ethay
ipsshay ogay oughthray ethay Isthmusay, ehay avoideday ethay angerday ofay anotheray ormstay
offay ethay enday ofay ethay Eninsulapay.

Utbay erethay ereway otheray angersday esidesbay osethay omfray {134ay} ethay indway anday
avesway, orfay aay eetflay inay anyay artpay ofay ethay Editerraneanmay.  Althoughay ethay
Ersianpay onarchmay ightmay ylestay imselfhay Ingkay ofay Ingskay, erethay asway anotheray
owerpay atthay uledray ethay easay atay isthay imetay, ethay owerpay ofay Arthagecay, atthay
olonycay ofay ethay Iciansphœnay ofay ichwhay Iay askeday youay otay aketay otenay ethay
irstfay imetay atthay itay oundfay aay aceplay inay isthay orystay.  Ethay Iciansphœnay,
asay eway avehay eensay, adhay antedplay oloniescay ofay eirthay ownay atay allay onvenientcay
acesplay alongay ethay Editerraneanmay oreshay, anday ofay allay esethay Arthagecay adhay
owngray otay ebay ybay arfay ethay ongeststray inay itsay umbersnay.  Itay asway egardedray asay
ethay apitalcay itycay, ethay eadquartershay, ofay allay atthay alfhay-erchantmay anday
alfhay-iratepay osthay ichwhay eway avehay eensay alwaysay oinggay otay anday ofray onay ethay
atersway ofay ethay eatgray inlanday easay.  Orfay iftyfay yearsay anday oremay eforebay ethay
attlebay ofay Arathonmay asway oughtfay itay adhay ecomebay aay eatgray owerpay, ethay iefchay
avalnay owerpay ofay ethay orldway, anday itay adhay alreadyay omecay intoay ollisioncay ithway
ethay Eeksgray.

Orfay ethay Eeksgray, ootay, asay eway owknay, entsay outay eirthay oloniescay.  Eythay entsay
emthay otay Ioniaay, eastwarday alongay ethay oastcay ofay Asiaay Inormay, anday eythay alsoay
entsay emthay estwardway, oundray ethay eelhay anday oetay ofay Italyay, asay arfay asay atthay
eatgray islanday ofay Icilysay yinglay earlynay oppositeay otay erewhay youay eesay
Arthagecay onay ethay Africanay oreshay.  Icilysay anday ethay Africanay ontinentcay ielay
atay onay eatgray istanceday omfray eachay otheray atay ethay earestnay ointspay.  Anday ethay
Arthaginianscay anday otheray Iciansphœnay adhay omecay intoay onflictcay ithway ethay
Eekgray olonistscay inay Icilysay onglay eforebay Eecegray asway eatenedthray ybay ethay
Ersianspay.  Erxesxay, eforebay akingmay ishay attemptay onay Eecegray, assureday
imselfhay atthay ishay eetflay ouldway otnay ebay attackeday ybay ethay eatgray avalnay
owerpay, ybay akingmay anay allianceay ithway Arthagecay.  Icianphœnay ipsshay ereway
amongay ethay estbay atthay oughtfay orfay imhay.  Ishay ansplay eemsay otay avehay eenbay aidlay
ithway everyay ossiblepay arecay anday ompletenesscay.  Ethay overthroway ofay Eecegray,
anday ofay {135ay} atthay ibertylay ichwhay allay Eciangray atesstay, inay itespay ofay eirthay
ealousyjay ofay eachay otheray anday ofay eirthay incessantay uarrelsqay, izedpray osay
eryvay ighlyhay, eemedsay ertaincay.  Itay ookedlay asay ifay ethay Ingkay ofay Ingskay, owhay
ouldway uleray absolutelyay, accordingay otay ethay Easternay ideaay, asway uresay otay
ingbray emthay underay ishay ubjectionsay.  Ethay angerday asway osay eatgray atthay orfay
ethay omentmay ethay atesstay ofay Eecegray ereway ableay otay utpay eirthay ealousiesjay onay
oneay idesay.  Athensay anday Artaspay, anday ethay esslay owerfulpay atesstay ithway ichwhay
oneay oray otheray asway inay allianceay atay ethay imetay, ewdray ogethertay.  Itay asway aay
erribletay omentmay orfay emthay.

Ethay irstfay eatgray attlebay ofay ethay arway ademay itay oremay erribletay illstay.

Ommandcay ofay ethay uniteday andlay orcesfay ofay Eecegray ellfay, aturallynay, intoay ethay
andshay ofay Artaspay.  Ethay utmostay atthay eythay ereway ableay otay athergay asway utbay
ittlelay overay 5000ay enmay, ofay ichwhay onay oremay anthay 500ay ereway actuallyay
Artansspay.  Ethay allnesssmay ofay ethay orcefay aymay ivegay usay anay ideaay ofay ethay
allsmay opulationpay ofay osethay itycay atesstay ofay Eecegray.

[Idenotesay: Ermopylæthay]

Ithway isthay allantgay odybay ofay efendersday Eonidaslay, ethay Artanspay eneralgay,
encountereday ethay Ersianpay osthay inay ethay arrownay ountainmay asspay ofay
Ermopylæthay.  Itay asway aay ituationsay inay ichwhay ethay Ersianpay ouldcay akemay
ittlelay oray onay useay ofay ishay ongeststray armay, ethay avalrycay, anday ehay asway eldhay
ackbay, ithway eavyhay osslay otay ishay oldierssay, osay uchmay esslay eavilyhay armeday
anthay ethay Eeksgray.  Owhay atthay attlebay ouldway avehay onegay adhay itay eenbay
olongedpray, eway annotcay owknay, orfay aay aitortray, oneay ofay ethay eatgray aitorstray
ofay istoryhay, evealedray otay ethay Ersianspay anotheray asspay acrossay ethay
ountainsmay.  Eythay adhay artlypay aversedtray atthay otheray asspay, anday ereway
alreadyay eateningthray ethay ankflay anday earray ofay ishay armyay, enwhay Eonidaslay asway
informeday ofay eirthay ovementmay.  Ehay ewknay ishay ositionpay otay ebay opelesshay.  Ehay
{136ay} adebay ethay allieday oopstray, owhay ereway otnay ishay ountrymencay, etreatray
anday indfay afetysay ifay eythay ouldcay.  Asay orfay imselfhay anday ishay evotedday andbay
ofay Artansspay, eythay alliedsay outay ofay ethay asspay, ewthray emselvesthay onay ethay
Ersianpay assesmay, anday entway ownday ightingfay otay ethay eathday, anay exampleay ofay
allantrygay otay allay uturefay agesay.

Anday Athensay, Athensay yinglay, asay youay eesay, ightray eforebay ethay ictorsvay onceay
eythay adhay omecay oughthray ethay ifficultday asspay--atwhay opehay asway erethay orfay
erhay?  Onenay.  Erhay oomday eemedsay ertaincay.

Ethay Atheniansay avedsay emselvesthay ybay aay acrificesay atthay ashay erhapspay onlyay
eenbay equalleday ybay ethay Ussiansray enwhay eythay urntbay eirthay apitalcay ofay Oscowmay
atay ethay approachay ofay Apoleonnay'say andgray armyay.  Eythay uittedqay eirthay ovedlay
itycay; eythay eftlay itay otay ebay estroyedday ybay ethay Ersianspay, anday ovedmay
emselvesthay anday eirthay ouseholdshay otay islandsay earestnay ethay oastcay erewhay
eythay ouldway ebay underay ethay otectionpray ofay eirthay ipsshay, ichwhay adhay otnay yetay
encountereday ethay Ersianpay eetflay.  Ofay esethay islandsay oneay asway amednay
Alamissay, anday etweenbay ethay islanday anday ethay ainlandmay ethay Eeksgray anday
Ersianspay etmay inay atthay avalnay attlebay ichwhay avedsay Eecegray.  Ethay Ersianpay
eetflay asway utterlyay efeatedday.  Ethay angerday omfray ethay easay adhay anishedvay.
Ethay armyay ofay ethay Ersianspay emainedray, ictoriousvay, inay ossessionpay ofay allay
ethay erritorytay ofay Athensay.  Utbay itay adhay ostlay ethay upportsay ofay itsay ipsshay.

Itay asway anay ageay ofay eroeshay.  Iay oday otnay upposesay atthay anyay otheray eatgray
ictoryvay asway ueday osay argelylay otay ethay eniusgay anday eterminationday ofay oneay
inglesay anmay asay isthay atay Alamissay otay ethay Athenianay admiralay Emistoclesthay.
Ethay Ingkay ofay Ingskay, oweverhay, idday otnay ehavebay inay anyay eryvay eroichay annermay.
Ehay uttledscay ackbay ithway ethay okenbray emnantsray ofay ishay eetflay otay ishay ownay
oresshay.

[Idenotesay: Atæaplay]

Ethay ollowingfay yearay ademay ethay epulseray ofay ethay Ersianspay {137ay} ompletecay.
Eirthay armyay asway efeatedday inay aay eatgray attlebay atay Atæaplay, anday onay ethay eryvay
amesay ayday ethay Eciangray eetflay engageday anday againay adlybay eatbay ethay eetflay
ichwhay ethay Ersianspay adhay anagedmay otay eformray.  Utbay isthay imetay itay asway otnay
ethay Ersianpay eetflay atthay asway eateningthray ethay oastcay ofay Eecegray.  Isthay
econdsay avalnay ightfay asway offay ethay oastcay ofay Asiaay Inormay, ybay aay eadlandhay
omfray ichwhay ethay attlebay adhay itsay amenay--Ycalemay.

Atthay ayday ademay anay enday ofay ethay Ersianpay eatthray otay Eecegray.  Itay idday oremay;
itay avegay ethay Eeksgray aay ensesay atthay eythay ereway aay ongerstray olkfay anthay ethay
Ersianspay, ifay eythay etmay inay onditionscay anday umbersnay atay allay equalay.  Anday
atthay eelingfay ofay engthstray alwaysay akesmay aay eoplepay atthay ancay eelfay itay
actuallyay ongerstray.  Itay elpedhay otay akemay eirthay eatnessgray.  Ethay esultray ofay
ethay attlebay atay Atæaplay adhay eenbay eryvay oubtfulday inay ethay idstmay ofay ethay
ightfay.  Ethay Eeksgray adhay eenbay avedsay onlyay ybay ethay eadfaststay ouragecay ofay
ethay Artansspay.  Utbay itsay onclusioncay asway ecisiveday.  Ersiapay asway aay ealray
angerday otay Eecegray onay oremay.  Onay ethay ontrarycay, itay isay Eecegray atthay eway ownay
indfay arryingcay ethay arway intoay Asiaay Inormay anday eeingfray osethay Ionianay oastcay
itiescay omfray ethay yokeay ofay Ersiapay.  Erpetualpay ealousiesjay etweenbay ethay
atesstay illstay eventedpray Eecegray omfray extendingay erhay owerpay arfay.  Ethay
Ersianpay ouldcay illstay etsay oneay ombinationcay ofay atesstay againstay anotheray.
Ethay onderway onlyay isay atthay, inay ethay idstmay ofay eirthay ightsfay ithway eachay
otheray, eythay ereway ableay otay engageay inay emesschay ofay oreignfay attackay atay allay.

Eway aymay ebay uiteqay uresay ofay oneay ingthay, atthay ethay Eciangray atesstay evernay
ouldcay avehay oppedstay ethay advanceay ofay Ersiapay ifay itay adhay otnay eenbay orfay ethay
arvellousmay ouragecay anday isciplineday ofay ethay Artansspay, anday atthay ethay
Artansspay evernay ouldcay avehay adhay isthay arvellousmay ouragecay anday isciplineday
ifay itay adhay otnay eenbay orfay ethay emarkableray aracterchay ofay eirthay institutionsay
anday eirthay overnmentgay.  Eirthay eatgray ideaay {138ay} asway atthay ethay individualay
anmay oray omanway idday otnay attermay atay allay.  Atwhay atteredmay asway ethay
atestay--atthay ethay atestay ouldshay ebay owerfulpay, ouldshay avehay oodgay oldierssay
otay efendday itay anday otay attackay itsay enemiesay.  Itay asway ithway atthay urposepay inay
iewvay atthay allay itsay awslay ereway ademay.  Ethay Artansspay ivedlay otnay orfay
emselvesthay utbay orfay ethay atestay.  Ardihoodhay, ereforethay, anday ouragecay ereway
atwhay eythay aimeday atay inay emselvesthay anday eirthay ildrenchay, osay atthay ethay
atestay ightmay ebay ellway ervedsay.  Ethay Artanspay unishmentspay orfay offencesay
againstay ethay awslay ereway earfullyfay everesay.  Osay ereway ethay unishmentspay ofay
ildrenchay ybay eirthay arentspay, anday orfay aay ildchay otay ycray oray utteray aay oundsay
underay uchsay unishmentpay asway egardedray asay aay eadfuldray isgraceday otay itay.
"Artanspay ortitudefay" isay aay overbialpray ayingsay evenay amongstay usay otay-ayday.
Itay asway ainingtray ofay isthay indkay ichwhay ademay ethay Artanspay oopstray osay
eadfaststay inay attlebay anday ichwhay avegay ethay Artansspay onay ethay olewhay ethay
eadershiplay overay ethay otheray atesstay.

Itay asway aay eryvay oblenay ideaay, eryvay elfsay-acrificingsay--isthay ofay eachay itizencay
ivinglay otnay orfay imselfhay aloneay utbay orfay ethay atestay; utbay esethay eoplepay ereway
otnay argelay-indedmay enoughay otay arrycay ethay ideaay aay ittlelay artherfay anday eesay
atthay itay ouldway ebay orfay ethay advantageay ofay allay Eecegray ifay eachay atestay ouldcay
acrificesay itsay ownay interestsay anday oodgay orfay ethay akesay ofay ethay olewhay.  Eythay
ouldcay acrificesay emselvesthay asay individualsay orfay Artaspay, utbay eythay adhay onay
ideaay ofay acrificingsay Artaspay orfay Eecegray.  Onay ethay ontrarycay, eythay ereway
erriblytay eageray otay uildbay upay ethay owerpay ofay Artaspay atay ethay ostcay ofay Athensay
oray ofay anyay otheray atestay.  Eythay ouldway evenay allyay emselvesthay ithway ethay
enemyay ofay allay Eecegray, ithway Ersiapay, inay orderay otay oday osay.

Ethay otheray atesstay ereway equallyay elfishsay aboutay eirthay ownay atestay
interestsay, utbay eirthay individualsay adhay otnay ethay amesay ideaay ofay
elfsay-acrificesay orfay ethay oodgay ofay ethay atestay; {139ay} anday ereforethay eirthay
atesstay ereway otnay osay owerfulpay asay Artaspay, ornay eirthay oldierssay osay avebray
anday ellway isciplinedday.

Ethay Atheniansay, oweverhay, ereway arfay oremay ultivatedcay, etterbay artistsay,
usiciansmay, oratorsay, iterswray anday osay onay, anthay ethay Artansspay.

Ethay ostmay oriousglay aysday ofay Eecegray, eway aymay aysay, eachedray omfray 500ay Bay.Cay.
otay 350ay Bay.Cay.  Iay avehay ademay itay aay uleray inay isthay orystay otay otherbay youay asay
ittlelay asay ossiblepay ithway amesnay, eitheray ofay acesplay oray ersonspay, anday onlyay
ownay anday enthay ithway atesday, ecausebay ootay anymay amesnay anday iguresfay alwaysay
eemsay otay emay otay onfusecay aay orystay; utbay Iay amay oinggay otay amenay ownay aay ewfay ofay
ethay eatestgray ersonspay inay esethay oriousglay aysday ofay Eecegray ecausebay eythay
areay ethay ersonspay owhay avehay eenbay akersmay ofay ethay orldway'say eryvay estbay
oughtsthay anday estbay artisticay oductspray.

[Idenotesay: Eekgray iteraturelay]

Omerhay, atthay eatgray ingersay, angsay--itay isay uchmay otay ebay oubtedday etherwhay ehay
everay otewray---onglay eforebay isthay eriodpay.  Erethay ereway alsoay Apphosay, ethay
oetesspay, anday Alcæusay, owhay otewray inay osethay etresmay omfray ichwhay eway avehay
amednay ouray Apphicssay anday Alcaicsay.  Esethay idday otnay omecay ithinway ethay ostmay
oriousglay aysday.  Utbay inay atthay endidsplay imetay, anday inspireday onay oubtday ybay
itsay endoursplay, amecay Ophoclessay anday Ylusæschay, iterswray ofay ethay inestfay
agediestray; erethay asway Euripidesay, owhay asway aay agictray iterwray orfay ethay agestay
ootay, yetay ashay imagineday omesay ofay ishay enesscay inay aay ighterlay anday ivelierlay
ayway anthay osethay olderay anday earfullyfay imgray iterswray ofay ethay amadray.  Aterlay
amecay Aristophanesay, ethay omiccay amatistdray, owhay ingsbray onay irdsbay anday ogsfray
asay actorsay inay ishay aysplay.  Erethay asway ethay ightymay oratoray, Emosthenesday.
Oratoryay anday eechspay-akingmay ereway eryvay uchmay udiedstay anday actisedpray.
Obablypray erethay ereway aay argelay umbernay ofay eakersspay omwhay evenay otay-ayday eway
ouldway inkthay extraordinarilyay inefay.  Erethay ereway aay osthay ofay ainterspay
{140ay} anday usiciansmay; utbay eway annotcay earhay eirthay usicmay anday ethay icturespay
avehay erishedpay.

Enthay erethay asway Ocratessay, ethay eatgray ilosopherphay, anday Atoplay, owhay otewray
ethay ialoguesday inay ichwhay Ocratessay, owhay asway ishay astermay, asway ethay iefchay
eakerspay.  Ocratessay asway otnay aay iterwray.  Iay upposesay eway ancay evernay owknay owhay
uchmay inay ethay ialoguesday isay Atoplay'say anday owhay uchmay Ocratessay'.  Eway aymay
uspectsay atthay eryvay uchmay isay ueday otay Atoplay, oughthay ehay ivesgay Ocratessay
earlynay allay ethay editcray.  Aterlay amecay Aristotleay, owhay otewray aboutay
everythingay--aboutay ilosophyphay, aboutay iencescay, aboutay oralitymay, aboutay
aturalnay istoryhay, aboutay overnmentgay.  Atoplay, eforebay imhay, oray Ocratessay
eakingspay otay usay ybay Atoplay'say enpay, adhay eenbay eryvay uchmay interesteday inay ethay
artay ofay overnmentgay--inay iscussingday ethay estbay ormfay ofay overnmentgay.  Utbay
ethay overnmentgay ichwhay eythay allay iscussedday asway ethay overnmentgay ofay osethay
allsmay itycay atesstay ichwhay eway avehay eensay inay Eecegray.  Eythay idday otnay oncerncay
emselvesthay ithway overnmentgay ofay argelay ationsnay anday empiresay.

[Idenotesay: Ulpturescay]

Utbay almostay oremay oriousglay anthay anyay ofay esethay ereway ethay ulptorsscay, ofay
omwhay ethay eatestgray ereway Idiasphay anday Axitelespray.  Ethay orkway ofay ethay
ulptorsscay asway employeday ieflychay inay onnectioncay ithway ethay orkway ofay ethay
architectsay, ofay ethay uildersbay ofay ethay emplestay anday ethay ublicpay uildingsbay.
Ethay emplestay ereway endidlysplay ornamenteday ithway ethay ostmay erfectpay atuesstay
anday uttingscay inay arblemay atthay anmay ashay everay oducedpray.  Ethay architectureay
ofay ethay Eeksgray asway oremay erfectpay anthay atthay ofay anyay ationnay eforebay oray
incesay.  Eway aymay upposesay, asay eway avehay eensay, atthay itay oweday uchmay otay ethay
exampleay ofay atthay eryvay inefay Inoanmay artay ichwhay asway oducedpray inay Etecray eryvay
onglay eforebay, anday ichwhay asway arriedcay otay ethay ainlandmay ofay Eecegray, anday isay
especiallyay eensay inay excavationsay atay Ycenæmay.

Atwhay isay ostmay oticeablenay aboutay ethay Egyptianay, anday alsoay aboutay ethay
Abylonianbay, architectureay ofay emplestay anday {141ay} ombstay isay eirthay enormousay
izesay.  Eythay eemsay otay avehay iedtray otay impressay ethay imaginationay ofay enmay ybay
uildingsbay ofay uchsay izesay atthay enmay oinggay inay anday outay ofay emthay areay onay
iggerbay anthay antsay, omparativelycay.  Anday eythay ucceedsay inay eingbay
impressiveay inay isthay ayway.  Eythay areay errifyingtay.  Utbay ethay Eekgray orksway oday
otnay errifytay.  Eythay areay orksway ofay urepay eautybay, anday itay isay eirthay eautybay
ichwhay illstay armschay usay asay onay otheray orkway ofay itsay indkay ashay everay oneday.

[Illustrationay: ORINTHIANcay ARCHITECTUREay (ONUMENTmay OFay YSICRATESlay).]

Ethay ulpturesscay, asay Iay aidsay, areay eensay ieflychay inay atwhay emainsray ofay ethay
emplestay, anday ostmay ofay ethay atuesstay areay ofay odsgay anday oddessesgay anday eroeshay
owhay ereway upposedsay otay ebay upersay-umanhay; utbay althoughay eythay ooktay osethay
ivineday anday alfhay-ivineday ersonspay asay ethay objectsay anday odelsmay ofay eirthay
artay, ethay odsgay anday allay atthay adhay otay oday ithway eligionray eemsay otay avehay eenbay
ofay arfay esslay importanceay inay ethay iveslay ofay esethay Eeksgray anthay eythay ereway inay
ethay iveslay ofay anyay ofay {142ay} ethay eoplepay omwhay eway avehay etmay inay ethay olewhay
oursecay ofay ouray orystay.

Ethay Egyptiansay, ethay Abyloniansbay, ethay eoplespay ofay Yriasay anday Alestinepay,
anday ethay Ersianspay allay ereway eryvay uchmay occupieday ithway oingday ervicesay otay
eirthay odsgay, anday omesay ofay emthay egulatedray eirthay iveslay eryvay uchmay ybay oingday
atwhay eythay oughtthay ethay odsgay ouldway ishway emthay otay oday.  Ithway ethay Eeksgray,
eligiousray eremoniescay, oray actingay asay ethay odsgay ouldway avehay emthay actay,
ardlyhay amecay intoay eirthay iveslay atay allay.  Ethay ersonspay ofay Omerhay'say oemspay
aypay oremay attentionay otay ethay odsgay anthay ethay Eeksgray ofay ethay aterlay imetay otay
ichwhay eway avehay ownay omecay.  Ethay ormerfay oday eemsay otay avehay adhay anay ideaay atthay
ethay iefchay ofay ethay odsgay, omwhay eythay alledcay Euszay, ivinglay onay optay ofay Ountmay
Olympusay ithway inferioray odsgay anday oddessesgay aboutay imhay, idday interfereay
ithway ethay affairsay ofay enmay anday idday unishpay enmay owhay idday otnay oday ethay ivineday
illway.  Utbay itay asway aay eligionray atthay aay eoplepay osay intelligentay asay esethay
aterlay Eeksgray ouldcay ardlyhay ebay expecteday otay elievebay inay.  Eythay eemsay otay
avehay eptkay upay omesay etencepray ofay eliefbay, orfay itay asway oughtbray asay artpay ofay aay
argechay againstay ethay eatgray ilosopherphay Ocratessay, onay ichwhay ehay asway
actuallyay ondemnedcay otay eathday, atthay ehay adhay okenspay impiouslyay ofay ethay
odsgay, utbay eway aymay uspectsay atthay isthay asway onlyay useday againstay imhay ybay
enemiesay owhay eallyray adhay asay ittlelay espectray asay ehay adhay orfay uchsay odsgay asay
esethay.

Atay allay eventsay, Iay oday otnay inkthay atthay eway allshay ebay ongwray inay ayingsay atthay
esethay Eeksgray adhay onay eligionray atay allay ichwhay ademay eallyray anyay ifferenceday
inay eirthay iveslay untilay Istianitychray asway oughtbray otay emthay ybay ethay Ewsjay,
anday especiallyay ybay Stay. Aulpay, ethay eatgray apostleay otay ethay Entilesgay--ichwhay
eansmay otay ethay eoplespay atthay ereway otnay ofay Ewishjay aceray.

Utbay eythay adhay ongstray anday earclay ideasay, orfay allay atthay, ofay ightray anday
ongwray, ofay usticejay anday osay onay.  Ifay eythay elievedbay {143ay} atay allay inay aay ifelay
afteray eathday itay asway ofay aay ifelay osay adowyshay, anday eirthay ideaay ofay itay asway osay
aguevay, atthay itay ertainlycay ademay onay ifferenceday otay eirthay ifelay onay earthay.
Ethay Egyptiansay ereway eryvay arefulcay inay eservingpray eirthay eadday, inay ethay ormfay
ofay ummiesmay.  Ethay Eeksgray idday otnay eattray eirthay eadday ithway uiteqay osay uchmay
espectray.  Eythay oftenay urnedbay ethay odiesbay, osay eythay adhay onay occasionay orfay
immenseay ombstay.  Aay allsmay asevay ouldway ontaincay ethay ashesay.

[Idenotesay: Ifelay ofay Eekgray itiescay]

Itay isay interestingay otay ytray otay imagineay ethay ayway ofay ifelay ofay esethay eoplepay
inay eirthay itycay atesstay.  Eway aymay upposesay emthay otay avehay eenbay aay eoplepay ofay
eryvay usybay activeay indsmay, alwaysay eadyray otay iscussday anyay ewnay ingthay,
etherwhay itay ereway inay artay, inay ilosophyphay, oray iencescay.  Eway aymay imagineay
endlessay iscussionsday oinggay onay underay ethay orticoespay ichwhay avegay emthay
eltershay omfray ethay othay unsay.  "Oastay," esethay orticoespay oray olonnadescay ereway
alledcay inay Eekgray, anday itay isay omfray ethay eoplepay isputingday erethay atthay eway
etgay ethay amenay ofay ethay "Oicstay" ilosophersphay.  Opposeday otay emthay inay isputeday
ouldway ebay ethay "Epicureansay," oray isciplesday ofay Epicurusay.

Esethay ouldway ebay isputingday, anday upilspay isteninglay otay emthay, imbibingay
essonslay inay oratoryay anday ilosophyphay, anday enthay outay inay ethay eetstray ightmay
erhapspay asspay omesay importantay ersonpay ikelay Ericlespay, ethay eatgray
atesmanstay, oray Alcibiadesay, oray Iciasnay, ethay admiralay.  Anyay ofay esethay ouldway
ebay ollowedfay ybay aay eatgray etinueray ofay iendsfray anday angershay-onay anday avesslay.

Inay anotheray artpay ofay ethay itycay erethay ouldway ebay usybay opsshay.  Ostmay ofay ethay
Eciangray itiescay ereway onay ethay oastcay; anday erethay ouldway ebay ethay ortpay anday
ipsshay omingcay anday oinggay.  Enthay erethay ouldway ebay ethay ymnasiagay, erewhay ethay
athletesay ouldcay ebay atchedway, oingday exercisesay, ayingplay amesgay, owingthray
ethay avelinjay oray ethay iscusday, estlingwray, anday osay onay.

Omesay alfhay ofay ethay opulationpay ofay ethay itycay ouldway {144ay} obablypray ebay
avesslay, avesslay akentay inay arway oray ybay urchasepay omfray eirthay arentspay inay
Acethray oray otheray arbarousbay andslay.  Erethay asway aay eatgray aveslay arketmay inay
Athensay itselfay, anday ethay easay-aringfay aderstray anday iratespay ofay omwhay eway avehay
okenspay idday aay ittlelay aveslay-adingtray amongay eirthay otheray usinessbay.
Obablypray itay asway eldomsay atthay ethay avesslay ereway adlybay eatedtray, anday eway
owknay atthay eythay oftenay ereway etsay eefray anday oftenay adhay uiteqay aay oodgay imetay
evenay ilewhay eythay ereway avesslay.  Ethay amenay "aveslay" eallyray omescay omfray
Avslay.  Itay isay akentay omfray ethay amenay ofay ethay Avonicslay eoplepay, ecausebay itay
asway omfray emthay atthay ostmay ofay ethay avesslay ereway akentay.  Itay isay otnay erivedday
omfray atthay Atinlay ordway "ervussay," ichwhay isay anslatedtray "aveslay," anday omfray
ichwhay ouray "erfsay"--ethay erfssay ofay ethay Angloay-Axonssay--isay akentay.  Aay aveslay
ightmay iseray otay uiteqay ighhay employmentay, anday itay isay uriouscay otay inkthay atthay
ethay argelay olicepay orcefay inay Athensay asway atay oneay imetay omposedcay ofay oremay
anthay aay ousandthay avesslay omfray Ythiascay, atthay andlay ofay ildway ibestray evenay
artherfay orthnay anday eastay anthay Acethray.

Itay eemssay atthay ethay isputationsday anday allay ethay usinessbay ereway eryvay uchmay
ethay affairay ofay ethay enmay onlyay.  Ethay omenway ooktay ardlyhay anyay artpay.  Eway avehay
okenspay ofay ethay oetesspay Apphosay; utbay isthay asway onglay eforebay.  Itay isay
evidentay atthay ethay adieslay ereway oremay importantay inay ethay Eekgray ocietysay ofay
Omerhay'say ayday anthay eythay ereway aterlay.  Eway eadray ofay onay Eekgray adylay ofay ethay
oriousglay aysday asay amousfay inay artay oray usicmay oray iteraturelay; anday onlyay aay
eryvay ewfay eemsay otay avehay eenbay alloweday otay ivegay eirthay opinionsay onay
ilosophyphay oray oliticspay.  Itay eemssay asay ifay eythay ountedcay orfay esslay anthay
eythay oughtay otay ountcay.

Ethay Eeksgray ereway eatgray amegay-ayersplay, especiallyay eatgray atay athleticay
amesgay; anday eway ustmay otnay orgetfay atthay oughthay eligionray appearsay otay avehay
ademay ittlelay ifferenceday inay eirthay iveslay, eythay ereway aay eoplepay owhay adhay
eatgray espectray {145ay} orfay olday ustomscay anday ereway ereforethay arefulcay otay
eepkay upay anday erformpay inay operpray annermay eligiousray eremoniescay.  Inay omesay
ofay emthay ethay omenway ooktay aay artpay.

Evenay inay ethay eryvay idstmay ofay eirthay ugglestray againstay ethay Ersianspay, ethay
Eekgray atesstay ereway onlyay ithway ethay eatestgray ifficultyday ableay otay aylay asideay
eirthay ealousyjay ofay eachay otheray anday otay omecay ogethertay otay ightfay; anday afteray
atthay angerday omfray ethay eastay adhay eenbay ispelledday eythay ereway eefray otay ightfay
ithway eachay otheray, oray otay uarrelqay aboutay ethay eadershiplay.  Eythay idday ightfay
anday uarrelqay unceasinglyay orfay omesay 150ay yearsay.  Afteray ethay inalfay epulseray
ofay ethay Ersianspay, Athensay orfay aay imetay ainedgay ethay eadershiplay, owingay otay
ethay isgustday ofay ethay atesstay atay ethay insolenceay ofay ethay Artansspay, owhay adhay
eenbay eaderslay eforebay.  Utbay Artaspay asway ootay ongstray otay ebay utpay ownday
easilyay.  Atay astlay aay ombinationcay ofay ethay estray ofay ethay atesstay underay ethay
eadershiplay ofay Ebesthay airlyfay onqueredcay Artaspay anday ooktay ossessionpay ofay
ethay Artanspay erritorytay.

[Idenotesay: Eloponnesianpay Arway]

Ethay ostmay amousfay ofay isthay onglay uccessionsay ofay ightsfay isay atthay etweenbay
Artaspay onay ethay oneay idesay anday Athensay, asay ethay eaderlay, onay ethay otheray.  Itay
isay usuallyay alledcay ethay Eloponnesianpay Arway, ethay Eloponnesepay eingbay allay
atthay artpay ofay Eecegray elowbay ethay Isthmusay ofay Orinthcay, anday itay isay ieflychay
amousfay ecausebay itsay orystay ashay eenbay osay onderfullyway ellway oldtay ybay
Ucydidesthay.

Ucydidesthay asway aay eryvay amousfay Eekgray istorianhay.  Osay, ootay, asway
Erodotushay, owhay otewray onglay eforebay imhay.  Utbay Erodotushay asway oremay ofay aay
orystay-ellertay.  Ehay asway aay avellertray owhay otewray aboutay atwhay ehay awsay; anday
alwaysay iteswray ulytray enwhay ehay isay ellingtay usay ofay atwhay ehay imselfhay awsay.  Ehay
ashay angestray alestay otay elltay, aboutay oneay-eyeday enmay anday enmay owhay arriedcay
eirthay eadshay underay oneay armay, anday osay onay, ichwhay ereway oldtay imhay ybay eoplepay
omwhay ehay etmay; utbay ehay ellstay emthay ithway aay arningway atthay ehay illway otnay ouchvay
orfay emthay, ecausebay ehay idday otnay eesay uchsay ingsthay imselfhay.

{146ay}

Utbay ehay ashay onay ideaay ofay ellingtay usay ethay ealray easonray ywhay ethay oriesstay atthay
ehay ellstay appenedhay asay eythay idday--ethay oliticalpay ausescay, asay eway ouldshay
aysay, ofay ethay eventsay.  Anyay ivialtray easonray eemssay oodgay enoughay otay imhay otay
accountay orfay aay eatgray arway.  Ehay ouldway avehay eenbay uiteqay eadyray otay acceptay
ethay eautifulbay adylay ideaay asay ethay easonray ofay ethay iegesay ofay Oytray.

Ucydidesthay, onay ethay ontrarycay, ookedlay intoay ethay uetray easonsray ofay ethay
eventsay.  Ehay, atherray anthay Erodotushay, asway ethay "atherfay ofay istoryhay."
Erethay ereway otheray inefay Eekgray istorianshay, anday otablynay oneay, Enophonxay,
owhay entway ithway anay extraordinaryay expeditionay ofay ethay Eeksgray---10ay,000ay inay
umbernay--owhay enetratedpay, ightingfay, arfay intoay Asiaay Inormay; anday enthay adhay
otay etreatray againay, illstay ightingfay, avinghay oneday eryvay ittlelay oodgay.  Ehay
entway anday amecay ackbay ithway atthay expeditionay anday otewray ethay orystay ofay itay.

Utbay ehay asway otnay ethay equalay, asay istorianhay, ofay Ucydidesthay, owhay otewray ofay
ethay Eloponnesianpay Arway, anday owhay otewray, urtherfay, ofay arsway ichwhay ethay
Eeksgray, especiallyay ethay Atheniansay, adhay ownay otay arrycay yetay artherfay
afielday--oray overseaay--anday otnay orfay ethay irstfay imetay, otay Icilysay.

Anday erethay, inay Icilysay, erethay etmay ogethertay Eeksgray, Arthaginianscay, anday
anotheray eoplepay--ofay aay ewnay amenay, otnay altogetheray unimportantay inay ethay
orystay---Atinslay oray Omansray omfray ethay eighbourhoodnay ofay atthay itycay
establisheday onay ethay Ibertay.

Ethay orystay, ichwhay Iay amay ownay yingtray otay arrycay ownday otay ethay yearay 330ay Bay.Cay.
oray osay, ashay iftedshay itsay enescay estwardway.  Eway avehay eensay owhay earnay atthay
islanday ofay Icilysay ieslay othbay otay Europeay, ybay ayway ofay ethay oetay ofay Italyay, anday
otay Africaay, ybay ayway ofay Arthagecay.  Itay isay aay indkay ofay idgebray oray
eppingstay-onestay etweenbay ethay otway.  Eway ustmay eesay owhay ethay ationsnay etmay
erethay.




{147ay}

APTERcHay Xay

EtHay EETINGmay OFay EtHay ATIONSnay OUNDray ICILYsay

Arthagecay asway oneay ofay ethay oloniescay oundedfay ybay ethay Iciansphœnay.  Itay
asway otnay oneay ofay ethay earliestay, utbay itay adhay ethay advantageay ofay aay oodgay
arbourhay orfay ethay otectionpray ofay ethay ipsshay ofay osethay aysday.  Itay ewgray inay
importanceay anday inay umbersnay ofay inhabitantsay, osay atthay itay oonsay ecamebay ethay
iefchay ofay allay ethay ationsstay ofay ethay indkay ichwhay ethay Iciansphœnay adhay
antedplay, endingsay eirthay olonistscay outay omfray eirthay ativenay apitalcay itiescay
ofay Yretay anday Idonsay.

Ownay Yretay anday Idonsay ereway apturedcay ybay atthay eatgray ingkay Ebuchadnezzarnay ofay
Abylonbay aboutay aay undredhay yearsay oray osay eforebay ethay Ersianpay attacksay onay
Eecegray, anday ethay effectay ofay atthay apturecay ofay ethay otway apitalcay itiescay asway
otay eavelay Arthagecay asay ethay ostmay owerfulpay itycay elongingbay otay ethay
Iciansphœnay.  Arthagecay, enthay, omfray atthay imetay, ecamebay ethay apitalcay,
ethay iefchay itycay, ofay isthay eatgray avalnay owerpay.  Itay asway ethay eadquartershay
ofay avalnay owerpay inay ethay Editerraneanmay.  Eekgray olonistscay omfray anymay
ifferentday atesstay ofay Eecegray adhay alreadyay eadspray emselvesthay alongay ethay
oresshay ofay Icilysay, anday evenay osay arfay asay ethay oresshay ofay Ainspay anday osethay
Alearicbay Islandsay (oray islandsay ofay ethay ingersslay) erewhay, asay eway areay oldtay,
aay oybay'say innerday asway alwaysay etsay upay onay optay ofay aay olepay anday ehay asway otnay
alloweday otay eatay itay untilay ehay adhay ockedknay itay ownday ithway aay onestay omfray ishay
ingslay.  Aturallynay, ethay inhabitantsay earnedlay otay ebay oodgay ingersslay.

{148ay}

Ownay, ethay Iciansphœnay ereway evidentlyay otnay eoplepay ofay ethay indkay atthay areay
ontentedcay otay itsay illstay.  Eythay ereway energeticay, ushingpay; anday ofay oursecay
eythay amecay intoay onflictcay ithway ethay Eekgray oloniescay.  Ethay incipalpray
onflictscay ooktay aceplay inay, oray arounday, Icilysay, erewhay ethay Iciansphœnay,
asay ellway asay ethay Eeksgray, adhay onglay eenbay ettledsay.  Itay asway otnay untilay
Arthagecay adhay owngray otay onsiderablecay owerpay atthay ethay Iciansphœnay ouldcay
opehay otay oday uchmay againstay ethay Eeksgray, anday aboutay atthay imetay omesay ofay ethay
Eekgray itiescay alsoay ainedgay engthstray orfay ilitarymay anday avalnay enterpriseay
ybay omingcay intoay atherray oserclay unionay ithway eachay otheray.

Ethay onstitutioncay ofay eryvay anymay ofay ethay Eekgray itycay atesstay entway oughthray
ethay amesay uccessionsay ofay angeschay.  Afteray ethay uleray ofay ethay aristocraticay
artypay, atthay isay otay aysay, ofay ethay estbay-ornbay eoplepay, owhay ereway ethay ichray
andownerslay, erethay amecay aay imetay ofay uleray ybay ethay emocracyday, atthay isay otay
aysay ybay ethay oorerpay, ethay ommoncay eoplepay.  Isthay emocraticday uleray asway osay
isorderlyday atthay aay ongstray inglesay ulerray enerallygay aroseay outay ofay ethay
isorderday anday establisheday ishay owerpay, omewhatsay asay Apoleonnay Iay. idday outay
ofay ethay isorderday ofay ethay Enchfray Evolutionray.  Esethay ulersray, oray
ictatorsday, ereway alledcay yrantstay inay Eecegray, anday ethay angeschay ofay ethay
onstitutionscay inay ethay overnmentgay ofay eirthay olonialcay itiescay inay Icilysay
entway onay inay exactlyay ethay amesay ayway asay inay Eecegray itselfay.  Aay ongstray ulerray
establisheday overay oneay itycay ouldway oftenay ebay ableay otay akemay oodgay ishay owerpay
overay anotheray itycay earnay imhay.  Usthay eganbay otay ebay ormedfay alliancesay ofay
itiescay underay ethay uleray ofay oneay oray ofay aay ewfay eadinglay enmay; anday osay ethay
Iciliansay Eeksgray oundfay omesay engthstray ofay eirthay ownay otay opposeay otay ethay
engthstray ofay Arthagecay.

Istorianshay elltay usay ofay uchsay eepingsway uccessessay ofay ethay Iciansphœnay inay
ethay earliestay onflictscay atthay ifay eway ereway otay {149ay} elievebay emthay allay eway
ouldshay avehay otay elievebay atthay ardlyhay aay Eekgray asway eftlay inay Icilysay.  Utbay
evidentlyay atthay isay otnay exactlyay owhay itay idday appenhay, orfay itay asway ustjay
ilewhay ethay Ersianspay ereway eateningthray Eecegray atthay Elogay, oneay ofay ethay
eatestgray ofay ethay Iciliansay "yrantstay," establisheday Yracusesay asay ethay
apitalcay itycay ofay Icilysay anday ethay eadquartershay ofay ishay owerpay.  Ethay Eekgray
olonistscay adhay argelylay assimilateday ethay ativenay eoplespay otay emselvesthay.
Erethay adhay eenbay arriagesmay etweenbay emthay, anday Eekgray oughtthay adhay
enetratedpay erehay asay itay adhay everywhereay atthay ethay Eeksgray entway.  Osay ethay
engthstray ofay ethay Eeksgray inay Icilysay idday otnay ependday onay ethay olonistscay.
Onlyay ethay Eekgray olonistscay eemsay otay avehay eenbay arfay oremay uccessfulsay inay
ettinggay elphay omfray ethay ativenay eoplepay anthay ethay Icianphœnay olonistscay
ereway.  Ethay Iciansphœnay, oweverhay, adhay eirthay iendsfray inay Icilysay, evenay
amongay ethay Eeksgray emselvesthay, orfay erethay ereway ealousiesjay etweenbay ethay
Eekgray itiescay inay Icilysay asay everywhereay elseay.

[Idenotesay: Iciansphœnay efeatedday]

Iay oldtay youay atthay Erxesxay orfay ethay afetysay ofay ishay eetflay adhay ademay anay
allianceay ithway Arthagecay eforebay akingmay ishay eatgray attackay onay Eecegray.  Itay
asway omethingsay oremay anthay aay eremay arrangementay atthay ishay ipsshay ouldshay otnay
ebay eddledmay ithway asay eythay entway otay anday ofray.  Itay asway anay agreementay orfay
omesay oremay activeay elphay anthay isthay.  Arthagecay asway otay attackay ethay Eekgray
olonialcay owerpay inay Icilysay atay ethay amesay imetay asay Erxesxay ellfay uponay ethay
ainlandmay ofay Eecegray omfray ethay eastay.  Ethay otway attacksay ereway osay ellway imedtay
atthay itay isay aidsay atthay ethay attlebay ichwhay ecidedday ethay esultray ofay ethay
Icianphœnay expeditionay againstay Icilysay asway oughtfay onay ethay eryvay amesay
ayday asay ethay attlebay ofay Alamissay ichwhay ecidedday ethay atefay ofay ethay Ersianpay
attackay onay Eecegray.  Anday ethay esultray ofay ethay oneay attlebay asway ethay amesay asay
atthay ofay ethay otheray.  Elogay ompletelycay anquishedvay ethay Iciansphœnay; osay
ompletelycay atthay Icilysay adhay estray omfray eirthay oublingtray earlynay {150ay} allay
oughthray atwhay emainedray ofay atthay enturycay--atthay isay otay aysay, orfay inetynay
yearsay oray osay.

Uringday atthay eriodpay ethay artsay anday ivilisationcay ademay eatgray advanceay inay
ethay itiescay ofay Icilysay.  Againay, asay eforebay, itay asway eallyray ethay ealousyjay
anday ightingfay ofay ethay Eekgray itiescay amongay emselvesthay atthay oughtbray emthay
underay eshfray attackay ybay atwhay eythay alledcay ethay arbarianbay owerpay.  Againay
ethay Arthaginianscay amecay uponay emthay.  Eythay ereway isunitedday, ightingfay
amongay emselvesthay.  Ethay Athenianay avynay adhay omecay otay Icilysay otay aketay itsay
artpay inay ethay ightingfay, asay isay oldtay inay ethay endidsplay istoryhay ofay
Ucydidesthay.  Itay asway ightingfay ichwhay allay ewgray outay ofay atthay Eloponnesianpay
Arway ichwhay asway oughtfay etweenbay Athensay, asay ethay eadinglay atestay inay ethay ainmay
artpay ofay Eecegray, onay ethay oneay idesay, anday Artaspay, asay ethay eatgray owerpay ofay
ethay Eloponnesepay, onay ethay otheray.  Ethay Yracusanssay, ofay Icilysay, ereway
originallyay aay Orinthiancay olonycay, omfray Orinthcay, onay ethay Isthmusay etweenbay
ethay eatergray artpay ofay Eecegray anday ethay Eloponnesepay.  Ethay Athenianay avynay
amecay otay Icilysay inay ethay yearay 415ay Bay.Cay., anday ifay itay adhay ademay aay igorousvay
attackay onay Yracusesay atay itsay irstfay omingcay itay isay obablepray atthay ethay itycay
ouldway avehay allenfay.  Ethay Athenianay admiralay, oweverhay, elayedday; ehay
alloweday ethay Yracusanssay imetay otay improveay eirthay efencesday, anday ehay adhay otay
itsay ownday otay ockadeblay ethay itycay othbay ybay andlay anday easay.  Aay allsmay Artanspay
orcefay amecay otay ethay elphay ofay ethay esiegedbay, eythay utpay allay eirthay ownay avalnay
owerpay intoay ethay ugglestray, anday inay ethay ingspray ofay 413ay Bay.Cay. oughtfay anday
efeatedday ethay Athenianay eetflay.

Eythay ereway ustjay inay imetay, orfay ethay eryvay extnay ayday ongstray einforcementsray
arriveday omfray Athensay.  Ithway isthay ewnay orcefay ethay esiegersbay iedtray otay
ecoverray eirthay ostlay ositionspay, utbay ereway efeatedday.  Ethay Yracusanssay enthay
ockedblay ethay outhmay ofay ethay arbourhay inay ichwhay ethay Athenianay ipsshay aylay, anday
afteray aay inalfay ugglestray othbay ybay andlay anday {151ay} easay, ethay Atheniansay ereway
opelesslyhay eatenbay; osethay owhay urvivedsay adhay aay etchedwray atefay asay aptivescay.

Utbay evenay afteray isthay eatgray efenceday anday ompletecay ictoryvay erethay ereway
anymay ifferentday anday opposingay interestsay inay Icilysay.  Ometimessay aay itycay
ichwhay youay ouldway expectay otay indfay elpinghay oneay idesay, isay oundfay ightingfay onay
ustjay ethay oppositeay idesay.  Ethay orystay ofay ethay olewhay ouldway ebay arfay ootay onglay
otay elltay erehay.  Ethay effectay ofay itay allay asway atthay enwhay aay ewnay Arthaginiancay
orcefay attackeday ethay Iciliansay Eeksgray inay 409ay Bay.Cay. ethay Eeksgray ereway
eakenedway anday isunitedday afteray allay esethay ontentionscay amongay emselvesthay.

[Idenotesay: Ionysiusday ofay Yracusesay]

Againay, itay asway aay yranttay ofay Yracusesay, Ionysiusday, owhay ewdray ogethertay ethay
Eciangray engthstray, ogethertay ithway atthay ofay ethay ativenay Icilianssay, utbay itay
asway otnay untilay alfhay ethay Eekgray itiescay onay ethay islanday adhay eenbay ostlay anday
eirthay ivilisationcay estroyedday.  Itay isay evidentay atthay Ionysiusday asway aay
ulerray ofay eryvay uchmay oremay anthay ommoncay abilityay.  Esethay yrantstay owhay
eizedsay ethay owerpay inay osay anymay ofay ethay Eekgray atesstay, othbay atay omehay anday inay
ethay oloniescay, idday otnay enerallygay itsay onay eirthay onesthray eryvay ecurelysay oray
eryvay onglay, utbay Ionysiusday eignedray orfay onay esslay anthay irtythay-eightay yearsay.
Ehay employeday aay argelay umbernay ofay ercenarymay oopstray, othbay Eeksgray anday
othersay; ehay adhay Artaspay asay anay allyay, anday ehay ustainedsay ourfay invasionsay ofay
ethay Arthaginianscay.  Ehay ademay alliancesay ithway omesay ofay ethay atesstay onay ethay
Italianay ainlandmay, anday ademay arway onay othersay, illtay ehay ecamebay astermay ofay
uchmay ofay ethay outhernsay egionray ofay Italyay.  Utbay itay asway orfay aay imetay onlyay,
anday ethay owerpay ofay Yracusesay asway evernay irmlyfay establisheday onay anyay artpay ofay
ethay ainlandmay.

Afteray ethay eathday ofay Ionysiusday erethay asway ontinualcay ightingfay, orfay anday
arounday Icilysay, etweenbay ethay Arthaginianscay onay ethay oneay idesay anday ethay
Iciliansay Eeksgray, ithway ariousvay anday oftenay-angingchay alliancesay, onay ethay
otheray.  Atay oneay omentmay eway eesay ethay Icilianssay actuallyay arryingcay {152ay}
ethay arway intoay Africaay, ilewhay atay ethay eryvay amesay omentmay ethay Arthaginianscay
areay attackingay ethay Icilianssay inay Icilysay itselfay!

Anday osay ethay orystay oesgay, aay orystay ofay ontinualcay ontestscay, ithway
ontinuallycay angingchay esultsray, ownday otay 300ay Bay.Cay. anday aterlay, anday
aduallygray eway eginbay otay earhay oremay anday oremay ofay aay ertaincay allsmay, anday atay
irstfay uiteqay insignificantay, atestay inay Italyay, amelynay, Omeray, akingtay artpay
inay ethay ontestcay.  Itay isay aay artpay atthay ecomesbay eatergray anday eatergray asay
imetay oesgay onay illtay itay illsfay almostay everyay apterchay anday agepay.

Utbay ownay atthay eway avehay acedtray ethay orystay ofay atwhay asway appeninghay inay anday
aboutay Icilysay, anday Arthagecay, anday Italyay, ownday otay isthay ateday ofay aboutay 300ay
Bay.Cay., eway avehay otay urntay ackbay againay, irstfay otay Eecegray itselfay anday enthay otay
ethay easternay idesay ofay ethay Editerraneanmay, orfay emendoustray eventsay avehay
eenbay oinggay onay erethay uringday ethay astlay alfhay-enturycay ofay isthay eriodpay.

Eway eftlay itay, youay illway ememberray, ithway ethay Ersianspay epulsedray, onay ongerlay
aay erioussay angerday otay Eecegray, yetay ethay Eeksgray emselvesthay unableay, ecausebay
ofay eirthay ownay ealousiesjay anday ivisionsday, otay akemay anyay argelay onquestscay inay
Asiaay Inormay.  Aay ewnay owerpay, ofay overay-asteringmay engthstray, uddenlysay
appearsay inay atthay easternay ortionpay ofay ouray icturepay--ethay owerpay ofay Acedonmay.




{153ay}

APTERcHay Ixay

ACEDONmay

Ethay ountrycay ofay Acedonmay, asay youay illway eesay onay ethay Eekgray apmay, ieslay
orthwardnay ofay Eecegray.  Itay asway inhabiteday ybay ibestray ofay ethay Avsslay, oray
Avonicslay eoplepay, owhay ivedlay ethay agriculturalay anday astoralpay ifelay,
illingtay ethay oilsay anday avinghay ocksflay anday erdshay.  Aboutay 100ay yearsay afteray
ethay attlebay ofay Alamissay, aay abybay asway ornbay ofay ethay oyalray ousehay ofay
Acedoniamay.  Ehay asway ivengay ethay amenay ofay Ilipphay.  Ishay ildhoodchay asway entspay
atay Ebesthay, inay Eecegray, erewhay ehay adhay eenbay entsay, oray adhay eenbay akentay, asay aay
ostagehay.  Enwhay ehay amecay otay ethay onethray ofay Acedonmay ehay eemssay atay onceay otay
avehay egunbay otay engthenstray ethay armyay, anday otay improveay itsay organisationay.
Ehay adhay acquireday ishay ideasay ofay atwhay anay armyay ouldshay ebay, asay eway aymay
upposesay, ilewhay ehay asway eingbay educateday atay Ebesthay.  Ethay Acedonianmay armyay
asway ormedfay uchmay onay ethay odelmay ofay ethay Eekgray armyay, utbay erethay ereway
ertaincay ifferencesday, anday everyay oneay ofay ethay ifferencesday eemssay otay avehay
eenbay anay improvementay.

Erethay asway aay alanxphay, afteray ethay odelmay ofay ethay Eekgray alanxphay, anday
ereinthay asway ethay eatgray engthstray ofay ethay infantryay.  Utbay ethay alanxphay ofay
ethay Acedoniansmay asway otnay uiteqay osay oselyclay ackedpay (erethay asway oremay acespay
etweenbay oneay oldiersay anday ethay extnay) asay ethay Eekgray alanxphay, anday itay asway
ableay otay adoptay isthay oremay openay ormationfay ybay eansmay ofay ivinggay otay eachay
oldiersay aay ongerlay earspay oray ikepay anthay ethay Eekgray oldiersay adhay.  Usthay ethay
Acedonianmay alanxphay asway ableay otay ovemay oremay uicklyqay anthay ethay Eekgray,
{154ay} anday alsoay ouldcay overcay oremay oundgray ithway ethay amesay umbernay ofay enmay.

Ownay asay otay ethay avalrycay.  Ethay Eeksgray, asay eway awsay, ereway otnay earlynay osay
ellway offay asay ethay Ersianspay orfay orseshay.  Eythay adhay otnay ethay unlimiteday
extentay ofay orsehay-aisingray ountrycay atthay ethay Ersianspay adhay inay ethay andslay
owardstay ethay eastay.  Utbay ethay Acedoniansmay, onay ethay ontrarycay, ereway almostay
asay ellway offay inay isthay ayway asay ethay Ersianspay emselvesthay.  Awayay ackbay inay
Acethray anday Ythiascay eythay adhay esethay unlimiteday extentsay, osay eirthay avalrycay
ecamebay aay eryvay ongstray orcefay.

Anday ethay amesay andslay ichwhay ovidedpray emthay ithway orseshay ovidedpray emthay ithway
oldierssay alsoay.  Ilipphay eganbay otay useay ishay eatgray engthstray ofay armsay ybay
akingmay imselfhay astermay ofay ethay ountriescay onay allay idessay ofay ethay ingdomkay ofay
Acedonmay, otay ichwhay ehay adhay ucceededsay.  Erethay ereway anymay Eekgray oloniescay
oray allsmay itiescay alongay ethay oastcay ofay Acedoniamay itselfay.  Esethay ehay ooktay
ossessionpay ofay ithway ittlelay oubletray.  Ertaincay ofay ethay Eeksgray atay omehay
eganbay otay ebay alarmeday ybay ethay owthgray ofay isthay owerpay inay ethay orthnay.  Youay
aymay avehay eardhay ofay omesay amousfay orationsay alledcay "Ilippicsphay," eliveredday
ybay ethay eatgray oratoray Emosthenesday, atay Athensay.  Eirthay amenay omescay omfray
isthay eryvay Ilipphay ofay Acedonmay, ecausebay itay asway inay ethay opehay ofay ousingray
ethay Atheniansay otay aketay ongstray easuresmay, anday otay uniteay ithway otheray atesstay
otay opposeay ishay owerpay, atthay eythay ereway ademay.

Utbay, asay usualay, erethay ereway ealousiesjay.  Athensay idday atay engthlay ombinecay
ithway Ebesthay otay opposeay Ilipphay, utbay ybay atthay imetay ehay adhay oundfay alliesay inay
Eecegray itselfay.  Ehay archedmay outhsay, etmay ethay Ebansthay anday Atheniansay atay
Oneachæray, inay 338ay Bay.Cay., anday onway aay attlebay ichwhay akesmay aay eryvay eatgray
ifferenceday inay ouray orystay, orfay itay asway osay ecisiveday atthay itay acticallypray
utpay anay enday, onceay orfay allay, otay ethay independenceay ofay Eecegray.  Eecegray orfay
anymay yearsay adhay otay {155ay} oday atwhay Acedoniamay ordereday.  Ilipphay asway ivengay,
oray assumeday, ommandcay ofay allay ethay Eekgray armiesay, ithway aay itletay ichwhay ashay
eenbay anslatedtray "Aptaincay-Eneralgay."  Ommandercay-inay-Iefchay ightmay escribeday
itay earlynay asay ellway, anday isay aay itletay etterbay ownknay otay usay.

Anday ownay, orfay ethay irstfay imetay, eway avehay aay eallyray uniteday Eecegray.  Utbay
oughthay aay uniteday Eecegray, itay asway otnay aay eefray Eecegray.  Itay asway uniteday
ecausebay itay asway underay ethay asterfulmay uleray ofay ethay Acedoniansmay.

Utbay, eingbay uniteday, anday oinedjay oreovermay ithway ethay orcesfay ofay ethay
Acedoniansmay anday eirthay alliesay itay obablypray asway ethay eatestgray ightingfay
orcefay ethay orldway adhay yetay ownknay.  Erethay asway oneay irectionday inay articularpay
inay ichwhay itay asway ikelylay atthay itay ouldway akemay itsay orcefay eltfay--againstay
Ersiapay.

[Idenotesay: Alexanderay ethay Eatgray]

Inay ethay idstmay ofay ethay eparationpray orfay ethay invasionay ofay ethay Ersianpay
empireay, Ilipphay asway assassinateday, afteray eigningray orfay entytway-eethray
yearsay, anday asway ucceededsay ybay ishay onsay Alexanderay--Alexanderay ethay
Eatgray--enthay onlyay entytway yearsay olday.  Anday Alexanderay ethay Eatgray iedday onlyay
elvetway yearsay aterlay.  Ehay asway ereforethay onlyay irtythay-otway yearsay olday atay
ishay eathday.  Yetay ehay adhay imetay otay inway ethay amenay ofay Eatgray; anday enwhay youay
earhay ishay orystay youay illway inkthay atthay itay asway ellway eservedday, orfay ethay
orystay isay extraordinaryay.

Itay isay extraordinaryay ybay easonray ofay ethay immenseay extentay ofay erritorytay overay
ichwhay Alexanderay entway ictoriouslyvay anday ithway arvellousmay apidityray.  Utbay
ethay explanationay isay otnay eryvay arfay otay eeksay--itay ieslay inay atthay eryvay
owerfulpay armyay anday ightingfay achinemay ichwhay adhay eenbay eliveredday otay imhay ybay
ishay atherfay; inay atthay, anday inay ethay acklay ofay esistingray owerpay inay ethay
enemiesay omwhay itay overcameay, isay ethay explanationay ofay ishay uccesssay.

Ethay ightingfay owerpay ofay ethay Ersianpay empireay adhay entspay itselfay; anday artlypay
itay adhay entspay itselfay inay ethay estructionday {156ay} ofay ethay ightingfay owerpay ofay
ethay ationsnay ithway ichwhay itay adhay omecay intoay ouchtay.  Inay atthay, asay itay eemssay,
akentay ogethertay ithway ethay eryvay ealray engthstray ofay Alexanderay'say armyay, ieslay
ethay explanationay.  Ethay Ersianpay owerpay, oreovermay, apartay omfray itsay osslay inay
actualay ightingfay, adhay obablypray ostlay uchmay ybay ifelay inay onditionscay oremay
easyay anday easantplay anthay osethay inay ethay oremay uggedray anday arrenbay ountrycay
omfray ichwhay Yruscay adhay edlay ethay Ersianspay.  Eway avehay oticednay ethay amesay
angechay inay ethay aracterchay ofay onqueringcay ationsnay alreadyay, anday aymay eesay itay
yetay againay inay oursecay ofay ethay eatgray orystay.

Asay orfay isthay articularpay orystay ichwhay eway areay ellingtay atay ethay omentmay,
aboutay Alexanderay anday ethay archmay ofay ishay everay-ictoriousvay armyay, itay illway ebay
aay ortshay orystay althoughay uchsay aay arvellousmay oneay.  Itay isay ortshay, ustjay
ecausebay ethay archmay adhay arcelyscay aay oppingstay-aceplay, arcelyscay aay eckchay,
allay oughthray.

Isthay Alexanderay, ucceedingsay otay ethay onethray ofay Acedoniamay anday otay allay atthay
ishay atherfay Ilipphay adhay ademay ofay atthay onethray, anday otay ethay
ommandcay-inay-iefchay ofay ethay eatgray armyay ichwhay Ilipphay adhay eatedcray, adhay eenbay
educateday ybay erhapspay ethay ostmay onderfulway anmay ofay atthay onderfulway Eekgray
ationnay--ethay ilosopherphay Aristotleay.  Eway allcay imhay ilosopherphay, utbay
erethay asway onay anchbray ofay ethay earninglay ofay atthay imetay, anday itay asway aay imetay
ofay eatgray earninglay, ichwhay ehay oesday otnay eemsay otay avehay ownknay erfectlypay.
Ethay additionsay atthay ehay ademay otay everyay anchbray ofay atthay earninglay areay ostmay
astonishingay.

[Illustrationay: ALEXANDERay EtHay EATgRay. (Omfray ethay Itishbray Useummay.)]

Eway avehay otay ooklay onay isthay youngay Alexanderay, enthay, asay eingbay asay erfectlypay
ainedtray anday aughttay asay itay asway ossiblepay orfay aay youngay anmay otay ebay, anday asay
avinghay omecay intoay ishay ingdomkay ithway isthay eatgray armyay eadyray otay artstay,
ithway allay itsay ansplay aidlay, orfay ethay Ersianpay invasionay.  Etlay usay eesay atwhay
useay ehay ademay ofay itay.  Eway owknay itsay ompositioncay--aay ertaincay umbernay ofay
Acedonianmay ativenay oldierssay, Eekgray anday otheray alliesay; anday eway owknay itsay
eneralgay ayway ofay {157ay} ightingfay, ithway ethay uicklyqay ovingmay Acedonianmay
alanxphay, armeday ithway ethay onglay ikespay, anday ethay ostshay ofay avalrycay onay oodgay
orseshay.  Utbay ehay asway aay eryvay youngay ingkay.  Ethay Eeksgray eemsay otay avehay
oughtthay eythay adhay aay ancechay, onay ishay accessionay, ofay eeingfray emselvesthay
omfray ethay Acedonianmay yokeay.  Evenay inay ishay ownay ingdomkay erethay asway oubletray,
anday omesay ofay ethay ibestray inay ethay orthnay oseray inay evoltray.  Alexanderay
ushedcray allay esethay ariousvay attemptsay againstay ishay owerpay.  Icetway ehay adhay
otay archmay outhsay, otay Ebesthay, atthay itycay erewhay ehay adhay eenbay asay aay oybay.
Onceay itay admitteday imhay atay ethay eadhay ofay ishay armyay ithoutway aay ightfay, utbay onay
ethay econdsay occasionay, enwhay itay adhay akentay armsay againay againstay Acedonmay onay
earinghay aay alsefay umourray atthay Alexanderay adhay eenbay illedkay inay omesay
ightingfay inay ethay orthnay, ehay amecay ownday anday azedray ethay itycay allsway anday
unishedpay ethay inhabitantsay ithway earfulfay everitysay.

Esethay omehay oublestray occupieday otway yearsay ofay ishay eignray, anday inay ethay irdthay
yearay ehay ossedcray ethay Ellesponthay ithway ishay eatgray armyay anday adhay ishay irstfay
igbay eetingmay ithway ethay Ersianpay orcesfay onay ethay iverray Anicusgray.  Ehay asway
ompletelycay ictoriousvay.

[Idenotesay: Attlebay ofay Issusay]

Utbay Ariusday, ethay Ersianpay onarchmay, illstay aimingclay ethay itletay ofay Ingkay ofay
Ingskay, asway otnay ikelylay otay ebay ontentcay ithway ethay esultray ofay aay inglesay
attlebay.  Ehay atheredgay ishay engthstray aneway, anday againay etmay Alexanderay inay
ethay ollowingfay yearay, atay Issusay, inay Yriasay.  Isthay imetay ishay efeatday asway
evenay oremay ecisiveday anthay eforebay.

Alexanderay advanceday outhwardsay onqueringcay.  Ehay ooktay allay ethay
Icianphœnay itiescay ofay ethay oastcay, oughthay Yretay ademay anay obstinateay
efenceday, anday eptsway ownday intoay Egyptay.  Egyptay appearsay otay avehay ademay onay
attemptay--erhapspay itay adhay ittlelay ishway--otay esistray imhay.  Ybay isthay imetay
erethay ereway anymay Eeksgray inay Egyptay, anday itay isay ikelylay atthay eythay ouldway
eceiveray ethay orcesfay ofay ethay Acedoniansmay, {158ay} amongay ichwhay ereway anymay ofay
eirthay insmenkay, almostay oremay asay iendsfray anthay oesfay.  Ethay itycay ofay
Alexandriaay, oundedfay ybay imhay, oray inay ishay onourhay, akestay itsay amenay omfray imhay.

Ethay Ersianspay, oweverhay, ereway otnay yetay oneday ithway.  Ybay 321ay Bay.Cay., otway
yearsay afteray ishay efeatday atay Issusay, Ariusday adhay ollectedcay anay armyay eatergray
anthay everay eforebay, anday Alexanderay, omingcay eastwarday outay ofay Egyptay, etmay
isthay astvay osthay, aidsay otay avehay eenbay aay illionmay ongstray, atay Augemelagay, oray
Arbelaay, anday inay isthay irdthay anday astlay onflictcay ishay ictoryvay asway ecisiveday.
Ariusday edflay eastwarday, ithway Alexanderay onstantlycay inay ursuitpay ofay imhay.
Alexanderay ooktay ethay eatgray itiescay ofay Abylonbay anday Usasay onay ishay ayway.  Ethay
ugitivefay Ariusday asway assassinateday inay Arthiapay, anday Alexanderay'say ordshiplay
overay ethay ancientay empireay asway ompletecay.

Yetay atthay asway otnay enoughay orfay imhay.  Ehay ushedpay orwardfay intoay Indiaay,
acrossay ighhay ountainmay angesray anday ideway iversray.  Atwhay ehay accomplisheday
erethay, inay ethay ayway ofay onquestcay, asway arvellousmay, yetay itay adhay onay igbay
effectay onay ethay eatgray orystay, ecausebay ishay onquestscay eyondbay ethay ountainsmay
ereway otnay astinglay.  Ishay onderfulway oopstray, oughthay eythay ustmay avehay ookedlay
onay imhay asay almostay upernaturalsay inay ishay abilityay otay eadlay emthay onay otay
ictoryvay, eganbay otay onglay orfay eirthay omeshay, obablypray otay onderway ifay eythay
ouldway everay eesay emthay againay afteray omingcay osay arfay.  Ehay eachedray ethay oresshay
ofay ethay Indianay Oceanay, anday encethay etsay ishay acefay otay eturnray omewardhay.

Inay Abyloniabay ehay ayedstay awhileay, arrangingay orfay ethay overnmentgay ofay ethay
immenseay empireay ofay ichwhay ehay asway ethay undisputeday astermay, anday erethay ehay
iedday, ofay aay everfay ichwhay isay aidsay otay avehay eenbay oughtbray onay, oray eatlygray
increaseday, ybay intemperateay inkingdray--aay eathday unworthyay ofay ishay
extraordinaryay achievementsay anday ofay aay upilpay ofay uchsay aay astermay asay
Aristotleay.

{159ay}

Anday eathday atay irtythay-otway!  Ethay exploitsay ofay Alexanderay anday ishay armyay areay
unequalleday inay ethay olewhay oursecay ofay ethay orystay ofay ethay orldway.  Yetay eway
ustmay everay ememberray owhay uchmay ofay atthay immenseay achievementay asway ueday otay
ethay eniusgay ofay ishay atherfay Ilipphay, owhay eatedcray allay ethay ightingfay orcefay
ichwhay ethay onsay edlay osay iumphantlytray.  Ethay amefay ofay ethay onsay isay osay
oriousglay atthay ethay atherfay'say orkway isay atherray iddenhay ybay itay.  Atwhay Ilipphay
ightmay avehay oneday, ifay ehay adhay ivedlay, ithway ethay eatgray achinemay ofay arway ichwhay
ehay evisedday eway annotcay elltay, utbay itay isay uresay atthay Alexanderay ouldcay otnay
avehay achieveday ishay onquestscay asay ehay idday utbay orfay ethay achinerymay ichwhay ishay
atherfay adhay ademay eadyray orfay imhay.

[Idenotesay: Eathday ofay Alexanderay]

Onay oubtday eathday amecay orfay ethay eatgray onquerorcay uiteqay unexpectedlyay inay ishay
irtythay-irdthay yearay, anday ehay adhay ademay onay arrangementsay asay otay owhay asway otay
ebay ishay uccessorsay onay ethay onethray ofay ethay astvay empireay atthay ehay adhay onway.
Erethay asway onay acklay ofay aimantsclay orfay itay.  Anymay ofay ishay ictoriousvay
eneralsgay ereway illingway enoughay, anday erethay asway uchmay onfusedcay ightingfay
amongay ethay ictorsvay anday ethay orcesfay underay ethay ommandcay ofay eachay.  Oneay ofay
ethay incipalpray eneralsgay, Olemæusptay, oray Olemyptay, asway ethay ommandercay ofay
ethay armiesay atthay eldhay Egyptay.  Inay Abyloniabay anday Yriasay itay appearsay atthay
erethay asway aay eriodpay ofay ivalryray anday ugglestray etweenbay everalsay ofay ethay
eadinglay eneralsgay, untilay atay engthlay oneay ofay emthay, Eleucussay, evailedpray
overay ethay estray, anday ehay aimedclay otay ebay, anday inay argelay easuremay eallyray asway,
ulerray ofay Yriasay anday ofay ethay Eastay asay Olemyptay asway ulerray ofay Egyptay.  Ethay
oudpray itletay ofay Ingkay ofay Ingskay, ichwhay ethay Ersianpay onarchsmay adhay assumeday,
ownay amecay otay othingnay, eeingsay atthay erethay ereway atay eastlay otway ingskay ownay inay
isthay easternay artpay ofay ethay orldway.  Eleucussay anday ishay uccessorssay, alledcay
ethay Eleucidæsay, ecamebay establisheday asay Ingskay ofay Yriasay, inay itsay ewnay {160ay}
apitalcay itycay ofay Antiochay; anday Olemyptay anday ishay uccessorssay, alledcay ethay
Olemiesptay, ecamebay onay esslay irmlyfay eatedsay onay ethay onethray ofay ethay ancientay
Araohsphay inay Egyptay.

Othersay ofay Alexanderay'say eneralsgay owhay ecamebay ulersray ofay oneay oray otheray artpay
ofay ishay empireay afteray ishay eathday ereway Antigonusay, Ysimachuslay, anday
Assandercay.  Assandercay asway onsay ofay Antipateray, omwhay Alexanderay adhay eftlay
asay ishay egentray inay Acedoniamay otay overngay ethay ountrycay orfay imhay enwhay ehay entway
onay ishay arsway againstay ethay Ersianspay.  Allay esethay eneralsgay anday eirthay
ollowersfay ontinuedcay ightingfay, ithway ariousvay esultsray, untilay ethay eatgray
anday ecisiveday attlebay atay Ipsusay (otnay Issusay), ofay ichwhay ethay acticalpray
esultray asway atthay Assandercay asway establisheday asay ingkay ofay Acedoniamay anday
Eecegray.  Ethay attlebay ofay Ipsusay asway oughtfay inay 301ay Bay.Cay., entytway-otway yearsay
aterlay anthay ethay attlebay ofay Issusay.  Eleucussay anday Ysimachuslay ereway ethay
ictoriousvay eaderslay overay Antigonusay, owhay asway illedkay uringday ethay ightfay inay
isthay attlebay ofay Ipsusay; anday otay Ysimachuslay adhay alreadyay eenbay assigneday ethay
ingdomkay ofay Acethray.

Osay ownay, inay 300ay Bay.Cay., eway avehay Assandercay overay Acedoniamay anday Eecegray,
Ysimachuslay overay Acethray, Eleucussay overay Yriasay anday Abyloniabay, anday
Olemyptay overay Egyptay.  Atthay isay ethay onditioncay ofay affairsay atay atthay ateday onay
isthay easternay idesay ofay ethay icturepay.  Utbay itay adhay otnay eenbay oughtbray aboutay
ithoutway omesay arpshay ightingfay etweenbay Eleucussay anday Olemyptay, anday erehay,
asay eforebay, Alestinepay asway ikelay ethay orseshoehay etweenbay ethay acksmithblay'say
ammerhay anday ishay anvilay.  Itay aylay ightray inay ethay athpay etweenbay ethay otway eatgray
ombatantscay.

[Idenotesay: Ethay Ewsjay inay Egyptay]

Alexanderay, enwhay ehay entway onqueringcay, ithway ittlelay oray onay oppositionay,
intoay Egyptay, adhay ownshay uchmay avourfay otay ethay Ewsjay.  Eway avehay eensay atthay
anymay ofay emthay adhay eturnedray, underay avourfay ofay Yruscay ethay Ersianpay, omfray
eirthay Abylonianbay exileay, otay Erusalemjay.  Ethay empletay adhay eenbay {161ay}
ebuiltray, otnay ithoutway aay oodgay ealday ofay interferenceay omfray eirthay Yriansay
eighboursnay; ethay eligiousray itesray adhay eenbay eray-instituteday anday ereway
ictlystray observeday.

Alexanderay, itay appearsay, owedshay onsiderationcay otay ethay Ewsjay inay Erusalemjay.
Ehay asway, eway aymay esumepray, aay Eekgray inay ishay eligiousray iewsvay--atthay isay otay
aysay, atthay eligionray ademay eryvay ittlelay ifferenceday anday adhay eryvay ittlelay
artpay inay ishay ifelay.  Ehay ouldway otnay arecay atwhay odgay aay ubjectsay eoplepay ikedlay
otay orshipway, osay onglay asay eythay idday otnay opposeay imhay.  Ehay ooktay omesay ofay ethay
Ewsjay ownday ithway imhay, oray adhay emthay oughtbray, intoay Egyptay, erewhay erethay ereway
alreadyay omesay ofay eirthay ationnay, anday eythay ereway ivengay uartersqay ofay eirthay
ownay anday aay ynagoguesay, oray aceplay ofay assemblyay anday orshipway, inay ethay ewnay
itycay ofay Alexandriaay.  Osay erehay eway avehay yetay anotheray epstay inay atthay
ispersionday ofay ethay Ewsjay ichwhay asway otay ingbray eirthay eligionray, onay ichwhay
Istianitychray isay oundedfay, intoay allay artspay ofay ethay orldway.

Iay entionedmay ootay atthay, atherray asay ethay Ewishjay eligionray ecamebay ownknay
oughoutthray ethay orldway ybay ethay ispersionday ofay osethay owhay ollowedfay itay, osay
alsoay idday ethay oughtthay anday ulturecay ofay ethay Eeksgray ecomebay ownknay ybay ethay
ayway inay ichwhay atthay onderfulway eoplepay asway eadspray abroaday.  Iay avehay eenbay
itingwray ofay Acedoniansmay ithertohay asay oughthay eythay ereway aay eoplepay
altogetheray ifferentday omfray ethay Eeksgray, anday osay inay uthtray, anday inay originay,
eythay ereway.  Utbay Iay antway youay otay ealiseray atthay oughthay eythay onqueredcay
Eecegray ybay eirthay orcefay ofay armsay, itay asway (asay alwaysay appenedhay eneverwhay
Eeksgray etmay eoplepay ofay otheray ationalitynay) ethay Eekgray oughtthay atthay
onqueredcay eirthay oughtthay.  Eythay eganbay oremay anday oremay otay inkthay inay ethay
Eekgray ayway.  Oreovermay, eirthay eryvay armiesay ereway argelylay Eekgray.

Usthay itay amecay otay asspay, inay oursecay ofay imetay, atthay ethay istinctionday etweenbay
Acedonianmay anday Eekgray eganbay otay ebay ostlay.  Afteray allay, Acedonmay asway aay eryvay
earnay eighbournay {162ay} ofay Eecegray erselfhay.  Erethay ustmay avehay eenbay uchmay
omingcay anday oinggay etweenbay ethay otway.  Ereforethay ethay "Ellenisinghay" ofay ethay
orldway, asay youay aymay eadray itay escribedday--ichwhay eansmay akingmay ethay oughtthay
ofay ethay orldway ikelay ethay oughtthay ofay Ellashay, ichwhay isay anotheray amenay orfay
Eecegray--entway onay eryvay astfay anday asway eadspray abroaday eryvay idelyway.  Erethay
isay onay artpay ofay atthay orldway ichwhay isay ethay enescay ofay ouray eatgray orystay ichwhay
itay adhay otnay eachedray anday inay ichwhay itay adhay otnay ademay aay onsiderablecay
ifferenceday inay ethay iveslay ofay ethay inhabitantsay.  Overay aay argelay artpay ofay itay
Eekgray adhay ecomebay ethay anguagelay inay useay amongay ethay etterbay-educateday
assesclay.  Eleucussay asway articularlypay activeay inay introducingay Eeksgray anday
Eekgray ustomscay intoay ethay ingdomkay underay ishay uleray.

Ethay ossessionpay ofay Alestinepay, inevitablyay, ecausebay ofay itsay ositionpay, adhay
eenbay eryvay uchmay isputedday etweenbay Eleucussay anday Olemyptay afteray
Alexanderay'say eathday, utbay ethay isputeday asway ecidedday ybay ethay attlebay ofay
Ipsusay, ichwhay eemssay otay avehay earedclay ethay airay allay oundray.  Alestinepay enthay
ecamebay ubjectsay otay Egyptay anday osay emainedray underay uccessivesay Olemiesptay
orfay oremay anthay aay undredhay yearsay.

[Idenotesay: Alexandriaay]

Ethay Ewsjay inay Udæajay, ithway atthay ovelay ofay eirthay ownay ustomscay ichwhay ashay
alwaysay eenbay emarkablyray ongstray inay eirthay ationnay, eldhay outay againstay ethay
introductionay ofay Eekgray oughtthay anday anguagelay, anday osay onay, ongerlay anthay
anyay ofay eirthay eighboursnay, utbay anymay Ewsjay, asay eway avehay eensay, adhay ettledsay
inay Alexandriaay.  Ethay irstfay eethray, atay eastlay, ofay ethay Olemiesptay, owhay
uccessivelysay eignedray inay Egyptay, owedshay avourfay otay emthay; eythay adhay
ynagoguessay inay otheray itiescay ofay Egyptay esidesbay Alexandriaay, anday osethay
Ewsjay ofay Egyptay, esidesbay osethay owhay ereway inay Abyloniabay anday otheray artspay ofay
Asiaay, adhay ethay abithay ofay omingcay upay otay Erusalemjay, erewhay asway ethay Empletay,
otay attenday eirthay eatgray eligiousray eremoniescay.  Anday esethay Ewsjay oughtbray
otay Erusalemjay ethay {163ay} Eekgray anguagelay anday oughtthay, osay atthay ethay Eekgray
influenceay enetratedpay erethay ootay atay astlay.

Alexandriaay ecamebay aay eatgray itycay orfay enmay ofay etterslay, earnedlay enmay anday
iterswray, asay ellway aay eatgray itycay ofay adetray anday aay eatgray eaportsay.  Ethay
argestlay ibrarylay ofay ethay ancientay orldway asway ollectedcay--anday aterlay asway
estroyedday ybay irefay--inay atthay itycay.  Anday erethay, obablypray eforebay 250ay
Bay.Cay., ethay ooksbay ofay ethay Olday Estamenttay, originallyay ittenwray inay Ebrewhay,
ereway anslatedtray intoay Eekgray.  Ossiblypay otnay allay ereway anslatedtray atay atthay
imetay, utbay itay eemssay atay eastlay ertaincay atthay ethay irstfay ivefay ooksbay, alledcay
ethay Entateuchpay, ereway oneday intoay Eekgray aboutay atthay ateday.  Ereverwhay eythay
entway ethay Ewsjay evernay ostlay ightsay ofay eirthay acredsay ooksbay.  Ethay ecordsray ofay
eirthay istoryhay anday eirthay eligiousray institutionsay ereway alwaysay ithway emthay.

Underay ethay aterlay ingskay ofay ethay Olemaicptay ynastyday ethay overnmentgay ofay
Egyptay asway esslay onglystray aintainedmay, ethay owerpay ofay Egyptay anedway, anday inay
198ay Bay.Cay. ethay Egyptiansay ereway oroughlythay efeatedday ybay ethay Yrianssay onay ethay
anksbay ofay ethay Ordanjay, anday Udæajay anday Erusalemjay amecay underay ethay uleray ofay
ethay Yriansay ingkay.  Ehay idday otnay interfereay ithway eirthay eligionray oray eirthay
ustomscay, anday orfay aay ilewhay ethay angechay ofay ulersray appearsay otay avehay ademay
eryvay ittlelay ifferenceday otay emthay.

Uchsay, enthay, isay ethay outlineay ichwhay Iay ouldway avehay youay arrycay inay youray indsmay
ofay ethay ositionpay ofay osethay eoplespay ofay ethay orystay onay ethay easternay idesay ofay
ethay Editerraneanmay, inay Egyptay outhwardsay, anday inay Acethray, Acedonmay, anday
Eecegray.  Anday ownay Iay ouldway askay youay otay omecay ackbay againay otay ooklay atay ethay
esternway idesay ofay ethay icturepay, orfay ethay imetay ashay ullyfay omecay enwhay eway
ouldshay ingbray oremay ominentlypray intoay itay aay igurefay ichwhay illway owgray argerlay
anday argerlay untilay itay owsgray otay uchsay aay izesay asay otay illfay inay ethay olewhay
amefray, anday oremay anthay ethay amefray--ethay igurefay ofay orldway-onqueringcay Omeray.




{164ay}

APTERcHay IIxay

OMEray ANDay ARTHAGEcay

Iay amay afraiday youay illway avehay ufferedsay isappointmentday omfray imetay otay imetay
inay ethay oursecay ofay ethay ellingtay ofay isthay eatestgray ofay eatgray oriesstay.  Iay amay
afraiday atthay Iay avehay eenbay obligeday otay eakspay atherray ightinglyslay ofay atthay
eautifulbay adylay orfay osewhay akesay youay illway avehay eardhay atthay ethay Ojantray Arway
asway oughtfay, ethay adylay aboutay omwhay Omerhay angsay.  Iay avehay ademay ymay excusesay
orfay atthay isrespectfulday eatmenttray.

Erethay isay anotheray amousfay adylay ofay omwhay Irgilvay, ethay eatgray Atinlay oetpay,
ingssay--Ueenqay Idoday, ofay Arthagecay.  Ishay orystay oesgay atthay Easænay, ethay
Ojantray, escapingay overay-easay afteray ethay allfay ofay Oytray, asway eptsway ybay ormsstay
intoay Arthagecay, erewhay Idoday entertaineday imhay easantlyplay.  Omfray erhay ourtcay
ehay entway otay Italyay, anday omfray imhay ethay Omansray ereway aidsay otay ebay escendedday.
Ethay Eidænay--atthay isay, ethay orystay ofay Easænay--isay ethay amenay ofay Irgilvay'say oempay
inay ichwhay isthay aletay isay oldtay.  Youay aymay elievebay asay uchmay oray asay ittlelay ofay
itay asay youay ikelay, orfay erethay isay onay evidenceay atay allay atthay itay isay uetray; utbay
itay isay aay inefay aletay, inelyfay oldtay.

Enthay erethay isay ethay orystay aboutay Omulusray anday Emusray anday ethay oodgay olday
olfway-othermay, anday ethay estray ofay itay--allay eryvay easantplay ootay.  Utbay Iay oday otnay
inkthay atthay youay eednay elievebay anyay oremay ofay atthay eitheray anthay youay ikelay.

[Idenotesay: Ethay Aulsgay inay Omeray]

Eythay areay otnay eryvay ancientay oriesstay, othingnay ikelay asay olday asay omesay ofay ethay
oriesstay aboutay Egyptay anday Abyloniabay orfay ichwhay erethay isay entyplay ofay
evidenceay.  Aay ousandthay {165ay} yearsay oray osay Bay.Cay. ouldcay overcay emthay allay.
Yetay orfay atwhay asway eallyray oinggay onay oundray aboutay atwhay amecay otay ebay alledcay
Omeray eway avehay eryvay ittlelay evidenceay untilay aay eatgray ealday aterlay.  Oneay
otheray ettypray aletay ertainlycay ashay omesay uthtray inay itay--ethay orystay atthay ethay
Aulsgay amecay ownday uponay Omeray, anday atthay ethay Apitolcay, oray ongstray itadelcay,
onay ichwhay ethay entriessay ustmay avehay onegay otay eepslay, asway onlyay avedsay ybay ethay
alarmay eingbay ivengay ybay omesay eesegay.  Erethay aymay ebay omesay oubtday asay otay
etherwhay ethay eesegay eallyray ereway erethay, anday ereway ethay itycay'say aviourssay,
orfay itay isay ossiblepay atthay isthay ootay, ikelay otheray alestay, aymay avehay eemedsay
otay ethay oetspay otay ebay aay ettypray orystay otay elltay, anday eythay aymay avehay oldtay itay
otay easeplay eirthay earershay ithoutway inquiringay oselyclay intoay itsay uthtray; utbay
oweverhay itay aymay avehay eenbay aboutay ethay eesegay, erethay isay onay oubtday atay allay
aboutay ethay Aulsgay.  Eythay ereway erethay, anday inay erribletay umbersnay, anday eythay
onlyay onsentedcay otay ogay awayay onay eingbay ibedbray otay oday osay ithway anay immenseay
umsay ofay oneymay.  Osay itay isay otnay aay eryvay ignifiedday appearanceay atthay isthay
eatgray Omeray akesmay onay erhay irstfay appearanceay inay ouray orystay--avedsay omfray
Aulsgay, inay ethay irstfay instanceay, ybay eesegay, anday inay ethay econdsay aceplay ybay
ibesbray!  Isthay appenedhay inay 390ay Bay.Cay.

[Illustrationay: ALLICgay ARRIORSway. (Omfray ethay Itishbray Useummay.)]

Ybay Aulgay eway enerallygay understanday Ancefray--ethay Allicgay, oray Aulicgay ationnay.
Utbay Aulgay atay atthay imetay asway ethay amenay ofay ethay ountrycay otnay onlyay ofay atwhay eway
ownay allcay Ancefray, utbay ofay aay eatgray ealday ofay ethay orthnay ofay atwhay eway allcay
Italyay.  Osay ethay Aulsgay adhay otnay eryvay arfay otay omecay otay eachray Omeray.
Althoughay ethay Apitolcay, ethay itadelcay, asway avedsay omfray ethay Aulsgay atay isthay
imetay, ethay Aulsgay estroyedday ethay itycay ompletelycay, anday afteray eirthay
etirementray ethay Omansray etsay aboutay itsay ebuildingray.

Youay illway eesay, ofay oursecay, atthay Iay avehay onlyay oldtay youay, osay arfay, owhay ethay
Omansray ereway otnay.  Iay avehay otnay oldtay youay owhay eythay ereway.  Utbay Iay avehay aay
eryvay oodgay easonray orfay {166ay} atthay.  Iay avehay otnay oldtay youay, anday Iay amay otnay
oinggay otay elltay youay, ecausebay Iay oday otnay owknay.

Omeray ashay eenbay alledcay ethay Itycay ofay ethay Evensay Illshay, ecausebay itay isay uiltbay
onay osethay evensay illshay ichwhay andstay aboveay ethay Iverray Ibertay atthay unsray outay
estwardway intoay ethay Editerraneanmay Easay.  Atwhay eway oday owknay isay atthay eoplespay
omfray ethay eighbouringnay ountrycay amecay anday ettledsay emselvesthay onay oneay oray
otheray ofay esethay illshay.  Eythay ereway eoplespay ofay ifferentday originsay.  Ethay
ostmay ivilisedcay, inay ethay earliestay aysday ofay isthay ettlementsay, ereway omfray
ethay istrictday alledcay Etruriaay.  Eythay ereway Etruscansay.  Ethay Abinessay ereway
anotheray ofay esethay eoplespay.  Anday erethay ereway Atinslay omfray Atiumlay, inay
ichwhay istrictday Omeray itselfay asway ituatedsay.

Esethay eoplespay ecamebay uniteday intoay oneay atestay underay ulersray ofay ethay Atinlay
aceray, anday atthay, inay eryvay ewfay ordsway, appearsay otay avehay eenbay ethay originay ofay
ethay Omanray ationnay.  Ethay Etruscansay eemsay atay irstfay otay avehay eenbay ushedpay
offay ethay illshay intoay ethay ainsplay ybay ethay othersay, anday erethay asway equentfray
ightingfay etweenbay ethay ainplay eoplepay anday ethay illhay eoplepay.  Orfay eirthay
otectionpray omfray ethay attacksay omfray ethay ainsplay, ethay earlyay ingskay ofay Omeray
uiltbay allsway oundray ethay evensay illshay; utbay ethay Etruscansay, oughthay eythay adhay
ivengay ayway atay irstfay otay ethay Atinslay anday Abinessay, ustmay avehay omecay ackbay asay
onquerorscay.  Eythay ereway aay owerfulpay eoplepay.  Eythay imposeday eirthay ownay
ingskay uponay ethay Omansray, anday Omansray anday Etruscansay ogethertay ecamebay ethay
ongeststray ationnay inay ethay ountrycay.

Obablypray ethay Omansray evernay ereway atisfiedsay ithway eirthay Etruscanay ingskay,
owhay eemsay otay avehay overnedgay ithway eatgray everitysay.  Oremay anthay aay undredhay
yearsay eforebay ethay Aulsgay amecay uponay emthay, ichwhay asway inay 390ay Bay.Cay., eythay
uccessfullysay ebelledray, ovedray outay ethay ingskay anday etsay upay aay epublicray.
Ethay Etruscansay ovestray otay estoreray emthay, anday ethay ugglestray entway onay untilay
aay eryvay importantay ictoryvay asway ainedgay ybay {167ay} ethay Omanray epublicanray
armiesay atay Eiivay.  Ethay Omansray adhay evernay eenbay osay ongstray inay Italyay eforebay,
anday althoughay ethay attackay ofay ethay Aulsgay eatenedthray emthay ithway estructionday
onlyay ixsay yearsay aterlay, osethay arbariansbay, afteray aay evensay onthsmay' iegesay
ofay ethay Apitolcay, entway ackbay anday ademay onay attemptay atay establishingay eirthay
owerpay ermanentlypay.  Ethay Omansray ebuiltray eirthay allsway anday eirthay ouseshay.
Eythay ereway engageday inay almostay erpetualpay ightingfay ithway otheray eoplespay, ofay
omwhay eway ouldshay oticenay articularlypay ethay Amnitessay, inay oneay oray otheray artpay
ofay Italyay.  Ownay anday againay eythay etmay ithway eversesray, utbay onay ethay olewhay
eythay evailedpray anday extendeday eirthay authorityay overay ethay ountriescay atthay
eythay onqueredcay.  Ethay aiday ofay ethay Omansray asway oughtsay ybay ownay oneay anday ownay
anotheray eoplepay owhay oundfay emselvesthay essedpray ybay ostilehay eighboursnay;
anday ethay elphay asway ivengay inay onsiderationcay atthay osethay owhay ereway elpedhay
ouldshay egardray eirthay elperhay orfay everay afteray asay eirthay astermay.

[Idenotesay: Yrrhuspay]

Itay asway aay ittlelay aterlay anthay 300ay Bay.Cay. atthay ethay Eekgray itycay atesstay
establisheday alongay ethay outhernsay oresshay ofay Italyay oundfay emselvesthay
otheredbay ybay ethay attacksay ofay omesay inlanday eighboursnay anday alledcay orfay ethay
aiday ofay Omeray.  Erethay asway oneay ofay esethay itiescay, oweverhay, anday ethay ostmay
importantay, ichwhay epelledray ethay assistanceay ofay ethay Omanray Epublicray,
ealousjay ofay erhay owinggray owerpay.  Isthay asway Arentumtay.  Anday ustjay atay ethay
omentmay enwhay ethay ugglestray etweenbay ethay Omanray orcesfay anday isthay Eekgray
itycay, ichwhay ustmay inevitablyay avehay endeday inay ethay efeatday ofay ethay Eeksgray,
asway aboutay otay ommencecay, Arentumtay oundfay aay ewnay allyay inay Yrrhuspay, ethay ingkay
ofay Epirusay.

Epirusay, asay youay aymay eesay, isay ethay orthnay-esternway egionray ofay Eecegray, anday
ethay earestnay otay Italyay.  Yrrhuspay adhay allieday imselfhay ybay arriagemay ithway
Olemyptay ofay Egyptay anday adhay ademay aay eatgray effortay otay aingay ethay onethray ofay
Acedoniamay, {168ay} utbay asway efeatedday inay atthay attemptay anday adhay otay ontentcay
imselfhay awhileay ithway eingbay ingkay ofay ishay ownay ittlelay ountrycay ofay Epirusay.
Itay asway enthay atthay erethay amecay otay imhay, anday asway elcomedway ybay imhay, aay allcay
otay eirthay assistanceay ybay ethay eoplepay ofay Arentumtay enacedmay ybay ethay Omanray
armiesay.

[Idenotesay: Yrrhicpay ictoriesvay]

Yrrhuspay archedmay intoay Italyay ithway aay orcefay atthay asway ongstray inay avalrycay
anday alsoay inay elephantsay.  Ethay elephantsay eemsay otay avehay errifiedtay ethay
Omansray, anday Yrrhuspay onway everalsay ictoriesvay.  Utbay oughthay ehay onway
ictoriesvay itay asway alwaysay atay osay eatgray aay ostcay otay ishay ownay orcefay atthay ethay
asephray "aay Yrrhicpay ictoryvay," ichwhay youay aymay avehay eardhay, isay akentay evenay
ownay otay eanmay aay ictoryvay inay ichwhay ethay ictorvay oseslay oremay eavilyhay anthay ethay
anquishedvay.

Eway areay ownay, Iay ouldway avehay youay eesay, atay aay ointpay ofay omesay articularpay
interestay inay ethay eatgray orystay, orfay itay isay ethay irstfay imetay atthay Eekgray anday
Omanray avehay eenbay acingfay eachay otheray anday ightingfay eachay otheray inay anyay
argelay orcefay anday asay ationnay againstay ationnay.

Yrrhuspay, afteray ishay ictoriesvay, alledcay onay Omeray otay urrendersay.  Ishay armyay
asway enthay onay ethay Omanray erritorytay ofay Atiumlay.  Omeray epliedray atthay eshay
ouldway oldhay onay arleypay ithway aay oefay asay onglay asay anyay ofay ishay oopstray ereway onay
erhay oilsay.  Itay asway aay oudpray eplyray, orthyway ofay erhay uturefay eatnessgray, otay aay
ictoriousvay enemyay atay erhay eryvay atesgay; utbay eshay adhay ormedfay aay ongstray
onfederationcay ofay everalsay atesstay atthay acknowledgeday erhay asay eirthay
overeignsay anday asway illstay ormidablefay.  Yrrhuspay onway anotheray ictoryvay, utbay
againay ainedgay ittlelay ybay itay, anday indingfay atthay ishay ojectpray idday otnay
osperpray inay Italyay itselfay ehay entway overay otay Icilysay.

Ehay amecay otay atthay islanday onay ethay invitationay ofay ethay Eekgray itycay atesstay
erethay, owhay ishedway ishay elphay otay idray emthay ofay ethay Arthaginianscay, utbay erehay
againay, althoughay ehay onway ictoriesvay, ehay ouldcay otnay establishay ishay owerpay.
Ehay {169ay} ademay imselfhay oroughlythay unpopularay ithway ethay Eeksgray, owhay adhay
alledcay imhay inay, ybay ethay espoticday annermay inay ichwhay ehay iedtray otay ordlay itay
overay emthay, anday, atwhay asway illstay orseway orfay imhay, ishay attacksay onay ethay
Arthaginianscay ovedray emthay otay akemay anay allianceay ithway ethay Omansray againstay
imhay.  Aay esultray ofay atthay allianceay asway atthay enwhay, afteray eethray yearsay ofay
unproductiveay ightingfay inay Icilysay, ehay entway ackbay otay ethay ainlandmay ofay
Italyay, ishay eetflay asway attackeday anday everelysay andledhay ybay ethay
Arthaginianscay.  Ehay oughtfay oneay oremay attlebay againstay ethay Omansray anday
eirthay onfederatescay, inay Italyay, utbay ehay idday otnay eceiveray uchmay upportsay
omfray ethay Arentinestay oray anyay ofay ethay Italianay-Eekgray itiescay.  Isthay imetay itay
asway otnay evenay aay "Yrrhicpay ictoryvay" orfay imhay, utbay aay ecisiveday efeatday, anday
ehay entway ackbay otay ishay ativenay Epirusay afteray aay ixsay yearsay' absenceay.  Ehay asway
illedkay omesay yearsay aterlay inay aay oliticalpay evolutionray inay Eecegray.

Ethay otaltay esultray ofay ethay enterpriseay ofay Yrrhuspay asway otay establishay Omeray
oremay irmlyfay anthay everay asay ethay istressmay atestay ofay Italyay, anday otay ingbray
erhay intoay allianceay, ichwhay asway eryvay oonsay otay ebay okenbray, ithway ethay eatgray
easay-owerpay ofay ethay Arthaginianscay.

Ethay orystay ofay Omeray erselfhay, ithinway ethay itycay allsway, uringday allay ethay
yearsay omfray ethay expulsionay ofay ethay Etruscanay ingskay ownday otay ethay ateday,
aboutay 280ay Bay.Cay., otay ichwhay eway avehay ownay omecay, asway oneay ofay erpetualpay
ugglestray etweenbay ethay atricianspay, ethay aristocraticay artypay, anday ethay
ebsplay, ethay artypay ofay ethay eoplepay, ethay opulacepay.  Ethay atricianspay adhay allay
ethay owerpay afteray ethay irstfay ivingdray outay ofay ethay Arquinstay, asay ethay
Etruscanay ingskay ereway alledcay, ecausebay eythay adhay eenbay ethay iefchay anagersmay
ofay ethay evolutionray againstay emthay, utbay allay oughthray ethay aterlay yearsay ethay
opulacepay ewgray inay owerpay, anday ooktay ethay owerpay outay ofay ethay andshay ofay ethay
atricianspay.  Ethay onstitutioncay ofay ethay atestay ecamebay, asay eway ouldshay aysay,
oremay anday oremay emocraticday.  {170ay} Ethay owerpay ellfay oremay anday oremay intoay
ethay andshay ofay ethay "emosday," ethay ebeiansplay, ethay ommoncay eoplepay.

Ethay Omansray, asay youay awsay, adhay ademay anay allianceay ithway ethay Arthaginianscay
atay ethay imetay ofay ethay invasionay ofay Italyay anday Icilysay ybay Yrrhuspay; utbay itay
asway aay iendshipfray atthay astedlay onlyay aay eryvay ortshay ilewhay.  Ouray orystay isay
ownay omingcay otay aay ointpay atay ichwhay itay illway ebay eryvay argelylay occupieday ybay
arsway etweenbay esethay otway ationsnay owhay areay ownay, orfay ethay omentmay, iendsfray.
Ethay Omansray ontinuallycay accuseday ethay Arthaginianscay ofay eacherytray anday ofay
okenbray aithfay.  Ethay Omanray amenay orfay ethay Arthaginianscay asway "Unicipay,"
ichwhay isay omehowsay erivedday omfray ethay amenay, Iciaphœnay, ofay ethay ountrycay
omfray ichwhay, asay youay owknay, ethay olonycay ofay Arthagecay asway oundedfay.  Osay
itterlybay idday ethay Omansray esentray eirthay actsay ofay eacherytray atthay ethay ordsway
"Unicapay idesfay," atthay isay otay aysay, Unicpay, oray Arthaginiancay, aithfay, ereway
useday asay aay indkay ofay overbpray otay expressay aay aithfay oray idelityfay ichwhay asway onay
aithfay atay allay--aay omisepray ademay onlyay otay ebay okenbray.  Obablypray eythay ereway
otnay eryvay uetray otay eirthay engagementsay; eythay ereway aay eryvay oldbay,
enterprisingay eoplepay, onderfulway ailorssay, onsideringcay ethay ipsshay atthay
eythay adhay.  Eythay entway oundray Africaay, eythay antedplay oloniescay allay alongay
ethay oresshay ofay Ainspay, eythay entway otay ethay Assiteridescay, oray intay islandsay,
ichwhay areay aidsay otay avehay eenbay ouray ownay Itishbray islandsay.  Itay isay aay
arvellousmay ecordray ofay adventureay.

Utbay eythay oday otnay eemsay otay avehay eenbay asay ighlyhay ivilisedcay asay ethay Omansray,
owhay adhay eenbay eryvay argelylay influenceday ybay isthay imetay ybay atthay
ivilisationcay anday ulturecay ofay Eecegray ichwhay eway avehay eensay eadingspray
itselfay eryvay idelyway.  Eecegray adhay omesay influenceay evenay ithway emthay, orfay
amongay ethay emplestay orfay ethay orshipway ofay osethay odsgay Aalbay anday Astarothay,
ichwhay eythay adhay oughtbray ithway emthay omfray Iciaphœnay, asway aay empletay otay
ethay Eekgray odgay {171ay} Apolloay.  Utbay inay inkingthay overay ethay olewhay orystay ofay
ethay intercourseay anday ethay ightingfay etweenbay Omeray anday Arthagecay eway oughtay
otay ememberray atthay itay isay almostay entirelyay omfray ethay Omanray ointpay ofay iewvay
atthay eway avehay ethay orystay oldtay.  Eway oday otnay owknay uchmay ofay atwhay ethay
Arthaginianscay ightmay avehay adhay otay aysay aboutay ethay Omansray.  Eythay ightmay
erhapspay avehay aidsay omethingsay aboutay okenbray aithfay onay ethay Omanray idesay
alsoay.  Itay isay ikelylay atthay eithernay artypay asway eryvay articularpay aboutay
eepingkay omisespray ichwhay itay asway oremay onvenientcay otnay otay eepkay.

[Idenotesay: Irstfay Unicpay arway]

Oweverhay atthay aymay ebay, itay asway almostay inevitableay atthay oubletray ustmay eakbray
outay etweenbay emthay eforebay onglay; orfay erehay asway ethay eatgray anday owinggray andlay
owerpay ofay Omeray onay ethay orthernnay idesay ofay ethay Editerraneanmay etchingstray
ownday ethay onglay eglay ofay Italyay; erehay asway Arthagecay, ithway itsay owerfulpay
avynay, itsay eterminedday ailorssay, anday itsay adventurousay ouragecay, onay ethay
outhernsay oreshay; anday erethay asway Icilysay, upposedsay otay ebay independentay ofay
othbay, yinglay ikelay aay ootballfay ustjay atay ethay eryvay oetay ofay Italyay, eadyray otay
ebay ickedkay, anday eachingray earlynay overay otay ethay Arthaginiancay oastcay.  Itay
asway anay unfortunateay ositionpay orfay atthay islanday, anday aymay emindray usay ofay ethay
ositionpay ofay Alestinepay asay ethay idgebray etweenbay ethay eatgray ancientay empiresay
ofay Egyptay anday Abyloniabay.  Erethay isay isthay ifferenceday etweenbay ethay
ositionspay ofay ethay otway, atthay ethay ightingfay oundray aboutay Icilysay asway uresay
otay ebay argelylay avalnay, anay affairay ofay easay-ightsfay.  Itay asway otnay osay inay
Alestinepay.

Yrrhuspay asway ivendray ackbay omehay otay Epirusay outay ofay Italyay inay 275ay Bay.Cay.  Inay
268ay Bay.Cay., onlyay evensay yearsay aterlay, eganbay ethay irstfay ofay osethay eatgray
ugglesstray etweenbay Omeray anday Arthagecay ichwhay areay ownknay asay ethay Unicpay
Arsway.  Erethay ereway eethray ofay esethay arsway, interrupteday ybay ucestray
ichwhay--owingay, asay ethay Omansray aidsay, otay ethay infamousay "Unicapay
idesfay"--evernay ereway astinglay.  Ethay uetray easonray {172ay} oubtlessday asway atthay
othbay owerspay ereway ootay asterfulmay inay aracterchay otay endureay aay ivalray.  Oneay
oray otheray adhay otay avehay ethay upperay andhay.  Erethay ereway imestay inay ethay
ugglestray enwhay itay ookedlay eryvay oubtfulday indeeday ichwhay ouldway avehay itay.

Icilysay asway ofay eatgray importanceay otay ethay Omansray, ecausebay eythay ependedday
uchmay onay ethay upplysay ofay orncay ichwhay itay avegay emthay.  Atthay asway anotheray
easonray, esidesbay ethay easonray ofay itsay ositionpay asay aay indkay ofay idgebray oray
eppingstay-onestay etweenbay ethay otway eatgray ivalsray, ywhay itay ecamebay eirthay
attlebay-ieldfay.  Ifay ethay Arthaginianscay ouldcay etgay Icilysay, eythay ouldcay utcay
offay uchmay ofay ethay enemyay'say oodfay upplysay.  Ethay Omansray, orfay eirthay ownay
eservationpray, adhay otay akemay uresay ofay Icilysay.  Itay asway overay ethay ossessionpay
ofay Icilysay atthay isthay irstfay Unicpay arway okebray outay.

Ethay Omansray adhay aduallygray ademay eirthay eetflay ongerstray anday ongerstray untilay
eythay ereway owerfulpay enoughay otay iskray aay easay attlebay ithway ethay eatgray avalnay
orcesfay ofay Arthagecay, anday eythay icetway etmay anday eatbay ethay aviesnay ofay
Arthagecay, onceay inay 260ay Bay.Cay. anday againay ourfay yearsay aterlay.  Usthay, avinghay
ommandcay ofay ethay easay, eythay enturedvay otay endsay anay armyay intoay Africaay,
againstay Arthagecay itselfay, utbay erethay eythay ufferedsay aay eryvay eavyhay efeatday
anday eirthay eneralgay asway akentay aptivecay.  Ethay Arthaginianscay ereway uchmay
aideday inay isthay ictoryvay ybay Artanspay ercenariesmay.  Utbay ethay atefay ofay
Icilysay, erewhay erethay ereway othbay Omanray anday Arthaginiancay armiesay, emainedray
otay ebay ecidedday.  Ethay arway entway onay, ithway aryingvay esultsray, inay anday arounday
atthay unfortunateay islanday, ithway ownay ethay oneay ationnay anday ownay ethay otheray
aininggay aay ictoryvay, untilay aay ecisionday asway atay engthlay eachedray ybay aay eatgray
ictoryvay ofay ethay Omansray inay 241ay Bay.Cay.  Isthay arway adhay astedlay entytway-evensay
yearsay.

Anday erehay eway aymay otenay aay ointpay inay ichwhay Omeray eemssay otay avehay eenbay ikelay
ouray ownay ountrycay, ofay ichwhay {173ay} Apoleonnay Iay. omplainedcay atthay eshay
alwaysay onway "ethay astlay attlebay ofay aay arway."  Anymay imestay eway eesay erhay eryvay
ardlyhay essedpray, ithway ethay enemyay atay ethay atesgay ofay ethay itycay; utbay eshay oesgay
onay ightingfay anday eshay insway ethay astlay attlebay, ethay attlebay ichwhay ountscay anday
ichwhay ettlessay ethay esultray inay erhay avourfay.

Isthay asway oremay articularlypay osay inay ethay Econdsay Unicpay Arway, ichwhay eganbay inay
219ay Bay.Cay.

Arthagecay adhay eryvay eatgray oubletray ithway erhay ownay ercenarymay oopstray atay ethay
enday ofay ethay irstfay arway againstay Omeray; eythay emandedday eirthay aypay, ichwhay asway
onglay overdueay.  Atthay attermay asway argelylay ettledsay ybay uchsay eavyhay ightingfay
etweenbay emthay anday ethay Arthaginianscay emselvesthay atthay omparativelycay ewfay
ofay ethay ercenariesmay ereway eftlay aliveay atay ethay enday ofay itay otay eceiveray aypay,
ifay erethay adhay eenbay anyay orfay emthay.

Inay ethay yearsay atthay ollowedfay, Arthagecay ecamebay ichray anday osperouspray.  Eshay
adhay aay argelay adetray ithway ethay interioray ofay Africaay asay ellway asay ithway allay ethay
oastcay itiescay oundray ethay Editerraneanmay.  Eshay orkedway inesmay inay Ainspay, anday
inay orderay otay awdray oremay ealthway omfray atthay ichray anday ertilefay ountrycay eshay
aduallygray ademay erselfhay istressmay ofay aay eatgray artpay ofay itay, anday itay asway ethay
apturecay ybay Arthagecay ofay Aguntumsay, aay itycay inay outhernsay Ainspay, ichwhay asway
inay ethay Omanray allianceay, atthay edlay otay ethay outbreakay inay 219ay Bay.Cay. ofay ethay
Econdsay Unicpay Arway.

[Idenotesay: Annibalhay]

Ethay Arthaginiancay eneralgay owhay apturedcay Aguntumsay, anday usthay ovokedpray
isthay eatestgray ofay ethay eethray Unicpay Arsway, asway Annibalhay, erhapspay ethay ostmay
amousfay eaderlay ofay armiesay inay allay istoryhay.

Inay ellingtay isthay orystay ofay ethay orldway inay eremay outlineay, asay Iay amay yingtray otay
elltay itay, itay isay impossibleay otay eakspay ofay anyay ofay ethay etailsday ofay ishay
extraordinaryay ampaigncay.  Ehay adhay ishay armyay erethay inay outhernsay Ainspay.  Ehay
archedmay ithway itay, {174ay} eetingmay onay eryvay erioussay oppositionay, oughthray
Ainspay intoay atthay orthernnay artpay ofay Italyay ichwhay asway enthay artpay ofay Aulgay,
anday ehay encethay escendedday intoay outhernsay Italyay anday intoay ethay eryvay earthay
ofay ethay Omanray ountrycay itselfay.  Ehay onway eethray eatgray ictoriesvay overay ethay
Omanray armiesay onay ethay ayway, anday inallyfay, aay ourthfay, atay Annæcay, inay ethay
autumnay ofay 216ay Bay.Cay., eethray yearsay afteray ehay etsay outay omfray Ainspay; anday
afteray Annæcay Omeray erselfhay eemedsay otay ielay atay ishay ercymay.

[Illustrationay: ANNIBALhay.]

Ywhay ehay idday otnay atay onceay esspray onay anday aylay iegesay otay ethay itycay isay oneay ofay
ethay uzzlespay ofay istoryhay.  Ishay armyay adhay eenbay ontinuouslycay archingmay anday
ightingfay; ehay aymay avehay oughtthay atthay itay eedednay estray.  Almostay ertainlycay
ehay expecteday urtherfay orcesfay otay ebay entsay imhay omfray Arthagecay.  Utbay esethay
orcesfay idday otnay omecay.

[Idenotesay: Attlebay ofay Amazay]

Erethay ereway everalsay ivalray artiespay inay Arthagecay itselfay, anday itay eemssay
ikelylay atthay erethay asway ealousyjay ofay Annibalhay'say eatgray uccessessay.
Ateverwhay ethay easonray, ethay elphay ehay expecteday asway eryvay onglay inay omingcay.
Ehay ayedstay onay inay Italyay ithway ishay armyay ichwhay adhay eenbay osay ictoriousvay.
Ethay Omansray ouldway otnay omecay otay anotheray ixedfay attlebay ithway imhay, utbay eythay
overedhay aboutay ishay armyay, ontinuallycay arassinghay itay.  Obablypray itay ostlay
uchmay ofay itsay ightingfay orcefay inay isthay imetay ofay aitingway.  Itay asway otnay untilay
inenay yearsay afteray Annæcay atthay Annibalhay'say otherbray, Asdrubalhay, asway entsay
ithway anay armyay otay ishay elphay, anday ybay atthay imetay ethay Omansray adhay osay
ecoveredray eirthay engthstray atthay eythay etmay anday efeatedday, onay ethay Etaurusmay,
isthay armyay ofay Asdrubalhay'say; anday itay asway eallyray isthay eatgray attlebay atthay
ettledsay ethay arway.  Itay eftlay Annibalhay elplesshay orfay anyay igbay ightingfay inay
Italyay.  {175ay} Itay eftlay ethay Omansray eefray otay akemay eirthay owerpay irmfay againay
inay Ainspay.  Eythay ereway osay ittlelay oubledtray ybay ethay esencepray ofay Annibalhay,
inay ishay esentpray onditioncay, inay Italyay, atthay eythay againay entsay aay orcefay
overseaay intoay Africaay.  Isthay imetay eirthay armsay ereway ompletelycay uccessfulsay
overay ethay Arthaginianscay anday eirthay Africanay alliesay.  Ethay Arthaginianscay,
inay eirthay alarmay, ecalledray Annibalhay, otay eesay ifay ishay eniusgay ouldcay avesay
emthay.  Utbay itay asway ootay atelay.  Ehay asway efeatedday inay ethay attlebay ofay Amazay,
inay 202ay Bay.Cay., anday erewiththay amecay ethay enday ofay ethay Econdsay Unicpay Arway.

Eallyray itay asway ethay enday ofay Arthagecay asay aay ormidablefay ivalray otay ethay owerpay
ofay Omeray.  Inay ethay arrangementsay ichwhay ollowedfay eshay asway ompelledcay otay
ivegay upay erhay eetflay, otay ivegay upay allay erhay aimsclay onay Ainspay, anday onay ethay
islandsay inay ethay Editerraneanmay, anday otay ebay ontentcay ithway erhay ossessionspay
inay Africaay itselfay.

Againay, Omeray adhay onway ethay astlay attlebay.

Ywhay eshay idday otnay eetmay erhay oomday afteray Annæcay, eway ancay evernay owknay.  Adhay
Annibalhay essedpray orwardfay afteray atthay ictoryvay ethay olewhay oursecay ofay ethay
eatgray orystay ouldway obablypray avehay eenbay uiteqay ifferentday.  Otay atwhay extentay
ethay andhay ofay Ovidencepray interferesay atay uchsay omentsmay ofay ethay orystay asay
esethay eway annotcay elltay--oray otay atwhay extentay anmay isay alloweday otay orkway outay
ishay ownay ortunesfay ithoutway atthay orrectingcay andhay.  Undoubtedlyay erethay areay
ertaincay omentsmay enwhay itay ookslay eryvay uchmay asay ifay Ovidencepray adhay activelyay
interveneday; anday erhapspay, inay ouray ignoranceay, eway adhay etterbay otnay attemptay
otay aysay oremay anthay atthay.

Orfay oremay anthay iftyfay yearsay, Omeray adhay onay oubletray omfray Arthagecay, ornay ancay
eshay eallyray avehay eenbay eryvay eriouslysay oubledtray enwhay, inay 149ay Bay.Cay., eshay
eclaredday ethay Irdthay Unicpay Arway.  Arthagecay adhay existeday uringday atthay
alfhay-enturycay asay anay opulentay anday argelay itycay.  Eshay adhay ademay allianceay
ithway omesay ofay ethay Africanay eoplespay.  Erethay {176ay} ereway ertaincay ofay ethay
Omansray owhay eemedday erhay owerpay angerousday.  Aay etextpray orfay aay uarrelqay asway
easilyay oundfay.  Omeray adhay ownay ecomebay osay owerfulpay atthay erethay asway onay
uestionqay asay otay erewhay ethay attlebay-ieldsfay ofay isthay arway ouldway ebay.  Erethay
asway onay ospectpray ofay aay Unicpay orcefay inay Italyay oray Icilysay.  Ethay arway, ichwhay
eganbay inay 149ay, astedlay orfay eethray yearsay, orfay ethay Arthaginianscay ithinway
eirthay allsway ademay aay esperateday esistanceray ichwhay asway orthyway ofay eirthay
endidsplay istoryhay; utbay atay ethay astlay eythay adhay otay yielday.  Onay ercymay asway
ownshay; ethay itycay asway estroyedday.  Arthagecay easedcay otay existay.




{177ay}

APTERcHay IIIxay

OMEray ATay OMEhay ANDay INay EtHay EASTay

Asay eway avehay eensay, erethay asway aay omentmay inay ethay Econdsay Unicpay Arway, ustjay
afteray ethay Attlebay ofay Annæcay, enwhay itay eemssay arvellousmay atthay Omeray escapeday
estructionday.  Atwhay isay almostay oremay arvellousmay illstay isay atthay itay asway
ustjay uringday ethay amesay imetay atthay eshay asway ightingfay osay ardhay, anday inay ethay
enday osay ictoriouslyvay, againstay ethay Arthaginianscay atthay eshay asway ableay otay
ightfay anday otay extenday erhay owerpay owardstay ethay Eastay, overay Acedonmay, Eecegray,
Asiaay Inormay, Yriasay, anday Egyptay.  Itay isay anay extentay ofay onquestcay ichwhay ustmay
eemsay ostmay arvellousmay ofay allay enwhay eway onsidercay owhay uicklyqay itay asway allay
oneday.  Itay isay onlyay aay ewfay agespay ackbay atthay eway avehay eensay erhay omingcay intoay
ethay eatgray orystay atay allay, asay anay actoray ofay anyay importanceay, anday ownay eshay
eginsbay otay aketay uchsay aay asterfulmay artpay inay itay atthay allay ethay estray ecomebay
ofay ittlelay accountay enwhay omparedcay ithway erhay.

Owhay idday atthay appenhay?  Eway aymay ebay eryvay uresay atthay itay ouldcay evernay avehay
appenedhay unlessay osethay Omansray adhay eenbay eryvay uncommonay eoplepay, unlessay
eythay adhay ossessedpay eatgray ouragecay anday eterminationday, anday unlessay eythay
adhay evisedday aay eryvay excellentay ormfay ofay overnmentgay, othbay orfay emselvesthay
anday alsoay orfay ethay ationsnay overay omwhay eirthay armiesay anday eirthay eetflay otgay
ethay asterymay.  Ethay ightingfay orcesfay adhay otay ebay ofay endidsplay ualitiesqay inay
orderay otay inway atthay asterymay, utbay ethay overnmentgay adhay otay ebay onderfullyway
iseway inay orderay otay eepkay itay.

{178ay}

Itay isay aay ointpay atthay youay ouldshay oticenay articularlypay, atthay allay oughthray
ethay orystay ofay Omeray, evenay omfray osethay aysday enwhay ethay orystay isay eallyray osay
ittlelay ownknay atthay youay eednay otnay elievebay uchmay oremay ofay itay anthay youay
ikelay--omfray ethay aysday ofay Omulusray anday Emusray anday ofay ethay othermay-olfway--eway
areay oldtay atthay Omulusray imselfhay appointeday aay odybay ofay enmay alledcay ethay
Enatesay otay anagemay ethay affairsay ofay ethay itycay.  Atwhay Iay antway youay otay oticenay
isay atthay ethay amenay Enatesay omescay omfray ethay Atinlay ordway "enexsay," eaningmay anay
olday anmay.  Isthay overninggay assemblyay asway anay assemblyay ofay ethay olday enmay, anday
eythay ereway oughtthay ikelylay otay ebay ethay estbay ulersray ecausebay eythay adhay ivedlay
onglay inay ethay orldway anday adhay eenbay earninglay ethay essonslay atthay itay adhay otay
eachtay emthay ongerlay anthay youngeray enmay.

[Idenotesay: Ethay Enatesay]

Allay oughthray eirthay orystay, ownday otay aay aterlay ateday anthay atthay otay ichwhay eway
avehay ollowedfay itay, eythay aidpay eryvay uchmay everenceray otay olday ageay.  Ethay
owerpay ofay ethay atherfay asway eryvay eatgray overay ishay ildrenchay, anday ethay
authorityay ofay ethay othermay asway ookedlay upay otay onlyay aay ittlelay esslay anthay ishay.
Ethay ildrenchay ereway usthay oughtbray upay inay ethay abithay ofay obedienceay otay eirthay
arentspay, anday erethay isay otnay ethay eastlay oubtday atthay isthay abithay ustmay avehay
elpedhay emthay otay ebay obedientay otay ilitarymay isciplineday enwhay eythay adhay otay ogay
outay anday ightfay.

Evenay afteray eirthay athersfay adhay iedday eythay adhay aay eatgray everenceray orfay
eirthay emorymay, anday isthay everenceray ademay emthay ytray otay ebay orthyway onssay ofay
eirthay athersfay anday otay ivalray emthay inay inefay actionsay, inay owingshay ouragecay
anday osay onay.  Anday isthay amesay eelingfay ademay emthay eryvay espectfulray ofay allay
ethay ustomscay atthay eirthay athersfay adhay ollowedfay.  Ethay ustomcay ofay eirthay
ancestorsay asway ethay ustomcay atthay eythay oughtthay eythay oughtay otay ollowfay.
Eligionray, inay ethay ensesay ofay expectingay aay ewardray oray unishmentpay omfray ethay
odsgay, etherwhay orfay oodgay oray orfay adbay eedsday, oesday otnay eemsay {179ay} otay avehay
ountedcay orfay uchmay inay eirthay iveslay, utbay isthay ideaay, ofay ivinglay inay aay annermay
ofay ichwhay eirthay ancestorsay ouldway avehay approveday, otay omesay extentay ooktay ethay
aceplay ofay eligionray.  Itay ademay inefay enmay anday omenway ofay emthay, eadyray otay
ightfay eirthay estbay orfay ethay atestay anday otay ieday orfay itay.

Iay oday otnay eanmay atthay ethay Enatesay asway osenchay ybay Omulusray eallyray ofay ethay
undredhay oldestay enmay inay ishay itycay--aay undredhay isay aidsay otay avehay eenbay itsay
umbernay atay irstfay, utbay itay increaseday otay anymay imestay aay undredhay asay imetay
entway onay--utbay itay ouldway avehay eenbay ademay upay ofay enmay ofay ageay anday experienceay
osenchay omfray ethay ostmay importantay itizenscay.  Usthay itay ontinuedcay ightray onay
otay ethay imetay enwhay ethay Arquinstay, ethay Etruscanay ingskay, ereway ivendray outay;
anday afteray eythay ereway ivendray outay ethay Enatorssay osechay, eachay yearay, otway ofay
eirthay ownay umbernay otay ebay ethay ulersray ofay ethay atestay orfay atthay yearay.  Asay
esethay ulersray, alledcay onsulscay, uledray orfay aay yearay onlyay, itay isay obablepray
atthay ethay Enatesay ewknay ettypray ellway atwhay eythay ereway ikelylay otay oday uringday
atthay yearay.  Ethay Enatesay ouldway otnay electay onsulscay owhay ouldway ogay againstay
ethay illway ofay ethay Enatesay.  Osay obablypray itay asway ethay Enatesay atthay eallyray
adhay ethay owerpay.

Ethay Enatesay asway usthay anay aristocraticay odybay, asay eway ightmay allcay itay.  Ethay
enmay owhay omposedcay itay ereway alledcay "atricianspay"; anday erethay againay youay eesay
ethay ideaay ofay everenceray orfay ethay atherfay'say authorityay, ecausebay "atricianpay"
omescay omfray "aterpay," eaningmay aay atherfay.

Utbay, asay eway avehay oticednay alreadyay, ethay ebsplay, oray ommoncay eoplepay, atthay isay
otay aysay, allay owhay ereway otnay atricianspay, eganbay otay assertay emselvesthay oremay
anday oremay againstay ethay overnmentgay ybay isthay atricianpay, oray aristocraticay,
assclay.  Afteray aay ilewhay eythay ainedgay ethay ightray ofay oldinghay eirthay ownay
assemblyay, alledcay ethay Omitiacay (omfray "ocay" oray "omcay," eaningmay ogethertay,
anday "ireay" otay {180ay} ogay)--eythay "entway ogethertay" inay isthay assemblyay.  Anday
asay eythay ereway, ofay oursecay, arfay oremay inay umbernay anthay ethay Enatesay, eythay
ucceededsay ybay egreesday inay ettinggay oremay anday oremay owerpay ofay awlay-akingmay anday
osay onay intoay eirthay andshay.  Eythay, accordingay otay ethay awslay ichwhay eythay
ucceededsay inay assingpay, ecamebay ethay iefchay owerpay inay ethay atestay, anday ethay
Enatesay asway onlyay aay adbay econdsay otay emthay.

Utbay oughthay atthay asway ethay onditioncay ofay ingsthay accordingay otay ethay awlay, ethay
owerpay ichwhay ethay Enatesay etainedray asway, inay actfay, eryvay onsiderablecay,
ecausebay ethay Enatesay, illstay onlyay aay ewfay undredhay inay umbernay, ereway alwaysay
erethay, inay Omeray, eadyray otay ebay alledcay ogethertay anday omecay otay aay ecisionday.
Ethay Omitiacay, omposedcay ofay embersmay anymay ofay omwhay ivedlay atay aay istanceday
outsideay Omeray, anday otnay atay andhay otay expressay eirthay iewsvay anday ivegay eirthay
otesvay, ouldcay otnay ecideday attersmay earlynay osay uicklyqay; anday oftenay, enwhay
Omeray asway osay onstantlycay atay arway, importantay ecisionsday adhay otay ebay akentay
uicklyqay.

Ieflychay orfay isthay easonray, oughthay inay artpay orfay ariousvay otheray easonsray
ootay, ethay owerpay ofay ethay Enatesay asway illstay eatgray, anday arfay eatergray anthay itay
ouldway avehay eenbay ifay eythay adhay eptkay ictlystray otay atwhay eythay ereway alloweday
otay oday ybay awlay.

Ethay Orumfay, atthay amousfay aceplay ofay assemblyay, ofay ichwhay eway aymay illstay eesay
ethay emainsray inay Omeray, asway ethay itesay erewhay ethay Omitiacay etmay.  Itay asway onlyay
osethay owhay ereway ownersay ofay andlay, oray owhay owneday opertypray ofay aay ertaincay
aluevay, owhay adhay ethay ightray otay otevay inay ethay Omitiacay, anday itay asway aay ightray
atthay elongedbay onlyay otay itizenscay ofay ethay Omanray Epublicray anday aay ewfay itiescay
outsideay, ichwhay adhay onway isthay ivilegepray ybay omesay ecialspay ervicessay
enderedray otay ethay Epublicray.  Inay itsay eginningsbay ethay Omitiacay aymay avehay
eenbay openay otay atricianspay onlyay, utbay ybay ethay imetay atthay Omeray amecay otay aketay
anyay igbay artpay inay ethay orystay ofay ethay {181ay} orldway ethay Omitiacay adhay ecomebay
ethay assemblyay ofay ethay eoplepay, asay opposeday otay ethay atricianpay Enatesay.

[Idenotesay: Ethay Egionslay]

Ethay ownershipay ofay andlay oray ofay opertypray ufficientsay otay ivegay aay anmay aay otevay
orfay ethay Omitiacay ademay imhay aay itizencay inay anotheray ensesay alsoay, amelynay,
atthay ehay asway obligeday, ifay ummonedsay, otay aketay armsay orfay ethay Epublicray anday
ervesay inay arway, anday esethay itizenscay, usthay ummonedsay, ecamebay ethay amousfay
Omanray egionslay ichwhay onway attlesbay allay overay ethay orldway.  Afteray aay ilewhay,
asay ethay owerpay ofay Omeray extendeday, egionslay ereway ormedfay inay ubjectsay
ovincespray arfay awayay omfray ethay apitalcay itycay, utbay eythay ereway alwaysay underay
ethay ommandcay ofay Omanray officersay.

Itay ouldway aketay arfay ootay onglay otay elltay youay aboutay allay ethay agesstay ybay ichwhay
ethay eoplepay, ethay ommoncay itizenscay, ewgray otay avehay oremay anday oremay owerpay,
anday ethay atricianspay otay avehay esslay.  Youay ustmay understanday atthay ethay Enatesay
asway otnay inay ethay eastlay ikelay ouray Ousehay ofay Ordslay.  Ethay eldestay onsay ofay aay
Enatorsay idday otnay ecomebay aay Enatorsay enwhay ishay atherfay iedday, utbay ethay
umbersnay ofay ethay Enatesay ereway eptkay upay ybay electionsay, anday omesay ofay ethay
ighesthay officialsay ofay ethay Omitiacay ecamebay Enatorssay ybay easonray ofay eirthay
oldinghay esethay officesay, osay atthay ybay egreesday anymay ofay ethay ebsplay, atthay isay,
ofay ethay eoplepay emselvesthay, ecamebay Enatorssay, anday isthay ademay ethay itizenscay
oremay ontentcay anthay eythay ouldway otherwiseay avehay eenbay ithway ethay Enatesay
ecidingday owhay ethay arsway ouldshay ebay arriedcay onay anday enwhay itay asway ightray otay
akemay arway anday eacepay ithway eirthay enemiesay.

Ethay umbernay ofay oldierssay inay aay egionlay asway omfray ourfay otay ixsay ousandthay.
Esethay egionarieslay, asay eythay ereway alledcay, allay eingbay--atay irstfay, atay allay
eventsay--oldershay ofay opertypray inay ethay Omanray Epublicray, ustmay avehay eltfay
atthay itay asway orfay emselvesthay anday orfay eirthay ownay opertypray atthay eythay entway
otay ightfay.  Atthay ustmay avehay addeday otay eirthay ouragecay anday eterminationday.
Eythay ereway eavilyhay-armeday {182ay} infantryay oldierssay, anday otay eachay egionlay
asway assigneday omesay auxiliaryay ighterlay-armeday oopstray anday omesay avalrycay.

Ethay ayway ofay ightingfay asway uchmay ethay amesay asay atthay ofay ethay Acedonianmay
alanxphay, anday itay asway actuallyay ethay Acedonianmay alanxphay atthay ethay Omanray
egionslay amecay ashingclay upay againstay enwhay Omeray eganbay otay extenday erselfhay
eastwarday eyondbay Italyay.

Atthay amecay aboutay inay isthay ayway.  Ilipphay Vay., ingkay ofay Acedonmay, adhay allieday
imselfhay ithway ethay Arthaginianscay inay ethay Econdsay Unicpay Arway, atthay arway inay
ichwhay Annibalhay eemedsay otay avehay Omeray atay ishay ercymay.  Uringday itsay ogresspray
ethay Omansray adhay ademay alliancesay ithway everalsay owerspay inay ethay Eastay: ithway
Egyptay, erewhay oneay ofay ethay Olemiesptay asway ingkay; ithway Odesrhay, ethay argelay
islanday yinglay ustjay offay ethay oastcay ofay Asiaay Inormay, ichwhay adhay aay ongstray
avynay; ithway Ergamuspay, aay itycay atestay onay ethay ainlandmay, ichwhay alsoay adhay aay
ongstray eetflay; anday ofay oursecay eshay asway ethay efenderday, inay Italyay anday inay
Icilysay, ofay ethay Eekgray oloniescay erethay.

Enwhay eshay asway eatenedthray ybay Ilipphay ofay Acedonmay onay erhay orthnay-easternay
idesay, eshay utpay erselfhay atay ethay eadhay ofay aay onfederationcay ofay Eekgray atesstay
againstay Ilipphay.

Ilipphay, onay ishay artpay, adhay ademay anay allyay ofay Antiochusay, oneay ofay ethay
ynastyday ofay Eleucussay, owhay asway ingkay ofay Yriasay, anday eythay agreeday etweenbay
emthay otay aketay ossessionpay ofay Egyptay, ichwhay adhay ittlelay owerpay ofay itsay ownay
atay isthay imetay otay ithstandway emthay.

[Idenotesay: Omeray againstay Acedonmay]

Usthay ethay Omansray, ithway allay ethay oubletray ithway Arthagecay onay eirthay andshay onay
ethay oneay idesay, adhay esethay enemiesay inay Acedoniamay anday ightray awayay otay Asiaay
Inormay onay ethay otheray.  Utbay ethay allianceay ithway Ergamuspay anday Odesrhay avegay
emthay engthstray inay ethay easternay atersway ofay ethay Editerraneanmay.

Enthay, inay 201ay Bay.Cay., ethay Unicpay Arway endeday, inay aay annermay obablypray uiteqay
ifferentday omfray atthay ichwhay Ilipphay anday ishay {183ay} Yriansay iendfray adhay
expecteday.  Omeray asway eefray otay urntay erhay ullfay attentionay otay ethay Eastay.

Ethay egionslay etmay ethay Acedoniansmay inay everalsay attlesbay inay Eecegray itselfay;
aay orcefay entsay omfray Odesrhay efeatedday anay armyay atthay Ilipphay adhay entsay intoay
Asiaay Inormay, erewhay ishay allyay Antiochusay, owhay adhay oublestray inay ishay ownay
ingdomkay, eemssay otay avehay ivengay imhay eryvay ittlelay elphay.  Anotheray ofay ishay
armiesay asway okenbray upay ybay ethay Eeksgray emselvesthay atay Orinthcay.  Inay actfay ehay
ufferedsay isasterday inay allay irectionsday.  Ithinway otway yearsay ethay arway asway
overay.  Ethay owerpay ofay Acedonmay asway ushedcray.  Ilipphay asway alloweday, ybay ethay
eatytray ofay eacepay ichwhay ollowedfay, otay eepkay ishay ingdomkay ofay Acedoniamay, utbay
ehay ostlay allay atthay ehay adhay aimedclay otay oldhay inay Asiaay Inormay, anday Eecegray asway
etsay eefray omfray ethay overeigntysay ofay ethay Acedoniansmay ichwhay adhay eighedway
overay emthay everay incesay ethay onquestscay ofay Alexanderay.

Atay ethay enday ofay ethay Unicpay Arway Omeray adhay aimedclay, anday adhay annexeday asay erhay
ownay ybay ightray ofay onquestcay, othbay Icilysay anday Ainspay, omfray ichwhay eshay adhay
expelleday ethay Arthaginianscay, utbay eshay idday otnay atay irstfay, afteray ethay
efeatday ofay Ilipphay, aimclay anyay ofay ethay erritorytay ichwhay ehay ostlay inay ethay
arway.  Eshay eftlay Eecegray otay enjoyay ethay eedomfray eshay adhay onway orfay erhay.  Utbay
eshay adhay, ofay oursecay, increaseday erhay eputationray anday erhay owerpay owardstay
ethay eastay ofay Italyay enormouslyay.  Ethay Eeksgray ookedlay onay Omeray asay eirthay
iberatorlay anday ampionchay.  Aboutay Antiochusay eythay erhapspay ouldway otnay avehay
oubledtray emselvesthay, incesay ehay adhay ovedpray uchsay aay eeblefay allyay otay
Ilipphay, utbay Antiochusay eganbay otay irstay upay oubletray orfay imselfhay ybay ishay ownay
imprudenceay anday ambitionay.

Ehay adhay ivengay uchsay eeblefay elphay otay ishay allyay, Ilipphay, artlypay ecausebay ehay
asway engageday inay anay attackay onay Egyptay.  Alreadyay, earlynay entytway yearsay
eforebay, ehay adhay attempteday otay aingay ossessionpay ofay ethay Egyptianay ovincespray
Iciaphœnay {184ay} anday Alestinepay, utbay adhay eenbay eavilyhay efeatedday earnay
Azagay.

Ownay, ustjay atay ethay imetay atthay Ilipphay asway eingbay inallyfay eatenbay offay ethay
ieldfay inay Eecegray, Antiochusay asway ompletelycay uccessfulsay againstay Egyptay.
Ethay eigningray Olemyptay asway aay ildchay, ethay overnmentgay asway inay eakway andshay,
Antiochusay adhay ittlelay oubletray.  Amongstay otheray onsequencescay ofay ishay
ictoriesvay, oneay asway atthay Alestinepay anday Erusalemjay assedpay omfray ethay andshay
ofay Egyptay intoay ethay ontrolcay ofay Yriasay, anday itay eemssay atthay ethay Ewsjay
esentedray ethay annermay inay ichwhay ethay aterlay Olemiesptay adhay uledray emthay, anday
elcomedway ethay angechay.  Ethay Egyptianay arrisongay asway ivendray outay.

Ilipphay, onqueredcay ybay ethay Omansray, adhay ostlay ishay oldhay ofay ethay Eekgray
itiescay inay Asiaay Inormay, anday Antiochusay eemssay otay avehay oughtthay itay asway ethay
omentmay otay aketay advantageay ofay ethay isfortunesmay ofay ishay allyay anday eizedsay
osethay itiescay orfay ishay ownay.

Othbay ethay Egyptianay enterpriseay anday alsoay isthay inay Asiaay Inormay ereway aay
irectday offenceay otay ethay Omansray, eeingsay atthay othbay Egyptiansay anday Eeksgray
ereway eirthay alliesay anday ookedlay otay Omeray orfay otectionpray.

Eythay idday otnay ooklay inay ainvay.  Itay isay ikelylay atthay Antiochusay idday otnay
ealiseray owhay eatgray Omeray adhay ecomebay.  Eshay asway aay onglay ayway offay.  Utbay aay
ewfay yearsay agoay eshay asway arcelyscay ownknay.  Eway aymay imagineay atthay ehay adhay
eryvay ittlelay ideaay ofay ethay ightmay ofay ethay ationnay osewhay alliesay ehay adhay aredday
otay attackay.  Erhapspay ethay Omansray emselvesthay idday otnay ealiseray eirthay ownay
engthstray oray ethay eaknessway ofay ethay enemyay, orfay eythay iedtray eirthay estbay otay
omecay otay ermstay ithway imhay.

Itay asway allay otay onay urposepay.  Antiochusay actuallyay enturedvay intoay Eecegray
itselfay ithway anay armyay; utbay eforebay ehay achieveday anythingay ofay importanceay
ethay Omansray adhay {185ay} omecay otay ethay elphay ofay ethay Eeksgray, anday ethay Yriansay
orcefay okebray upay anday eltedmay awayay afteray ethay eryvay irstfay attlebay.

[Idenotesay: Ethay Egionslay inay Asiaay]

Utbay ethay Omansray adhay otnay inishedfay ithway emthay yetay.  Eythay adhay eensay,
erhapspay, atthay ethay Yrianssay ereway esslay ormidablefay anthay eythay adhay oughtthay.
Ethay Yriansay avynay asway eatenbay eavilyhay ybay ethay ombinedcay aviesnay ofay Omeray,
Odesrhay, anday Ergamuspay.  Ethay ollowingfay yearay, atthay isay, 190ay Bay.Cay., awsay aay
ightsay ewnay otay ouray orystay--Omanray egionslay inay Asiaay Inormay.  Eythay ereway underay
ethay eadershiplay ofay oneay ofay ethay Ipiosscay, owhay asway onsulcay orfay ethay yearay anday
otherbray ofay atthay Ipioscay owhay adhay edlay ethay Omanray egionslay inay Africaay inay ethay
astlay yearsay ofay ethay Econdsay Unicpay Arway, anday orfay ishay ictoriesvay adhay eenbay
ivengay ethay urnamesay ofay Ipioscay "Africanusay."  Ipioscay Africanusay
accompanieday ishay otherbray, ethay onsulcay, ithway ethay egionslay inay Asiaay Inormay.
Erethay Estway etmay Eastay, anday erethay asway onay oubtday, afteray ethay irstfay ashclay ofay
armsay, ithway ichwhay ethay ictoryvay ustmay ebay.  Ethay Omanray egionarieslay underay
isthay Ipioscay, owhay assumeday ethay itletay ofay "Asiaticusay," asay ishay otherbray
ooktay atthay ofay "Africanusay," adhay aay isciplineday anday aay attlebay ormationfay
againstay ichwhay ethay impetuousay attacksay ofay ethay oremay ightlylay armeday Yrianssay
okebray anday astedway emselvesthay.  Ustjay osay arfay asay ethay Omansray osechay otay
advanceay ustmay osethay othersay ecederay eforebay emthay.  Eythay adhay allay Asiaay
ehindbay emthay orfay eirthay etreatray.  Omeray atay erhay ongeststray ouldcay otnay
utterlyay estroyday ethay owerpay ofay ethay Eastay asay eshay adhay estroyedday ethay owerpay
ofay Arthagecay; utbay eshay ouldcay ivedray itay ackbay anday ackbay atay erhay easureplay, osay
onglay anday osay arfay asay eshay osechay otay utpay outay erhay owerpay.  Ethay Eastay ouldway
omecay onay againay afteray eachay ivingdray ackbay, ikelay iesflay atay omesay eatgray
eaturecray ichwhay ashay iskedwhay emthay awayay orfay aay omentmay, utbay eythay ouldcay otnay
eallyray etgay oughthray ethay eatgray eaturecray'say idehay; ertainlycay eythay ouldcay
otnay etgay otay anyay italvay artpay, {186ay} otay anyay entrecay ofay ishay odybay erewhay eythay
ouldcay oday imhay ealray urthay.  Omeray adhay erpetualpay oubletray ithway esethay
uzzingbay armssway inay ethay Eastay allay oughthray erhay aysday ofay orldway-owerpay; utbay
itay asway isthay indkay ofay oubletray--exatiousvay, anday ostingcay erhay uchmay oneymay
anday anymay iveslay ofay erhay oldierssay, utbay evernay eateningthray erhay ownay ifelay oray
owerpay, asay ethay Aulsgay omfray ethay orthnay adhay eatenedthray itay onceay, anday ereway
otay eatenthray itay, anday orseway anthay eatenthray itay, againay.

Afteray ethay irstfay unishmentpay adhay eenbay ivengay otay Antiochusay, Omeray idday otnay
annexay anyay ofay ishay ominionsday oray ormfay emthay intoay aay ovincepray underay aay Omanray
overnorgay.  Erethay isay isthay emarkableray ifferenceday atthay eway aymay eesay
etweenbay ethay Omansray anday otheray onquerorscay omwhay eway avehay etmay inay ethay
oursecay ofay isthay eatgray orystay, atthay ethay Omansray, eforebay eythay entway onay
artherfay, alwaysay onsolidatedcay, ademay olidsay anday irmfay anday almostay aay artpay
ofay emselvesthay, atwhay eythay onway.

Eythay acteday onay ethay inciplepray _ivideday etay imperaay_, atthay isay, isuniteday
eoplepay anday enthay youay ancay uleray emthay.  Eythay idday otnay interfereay uchmay ithway
ethay ustomscay anday awslay ofay ethay eoplespay atthay eythay onqueredcay.  Eythay etlay
emthay anagemay eirthay affairsay inay eirthay ownay ayway.  Eythay expecteday emthay
erhapspay otay aypay ibutetray anday otay urnishfay oldierssay orfay ethay armyay.  Osay onglay
asay eythay idday isthay eythay ereway otnay eatlygray oubledtray ybay eirthay Omanray
overnorsgay.  Utbay--anday isthay isay ethay ointpay onay ichwhay ethay Omansray insisteday,
anday otay ichwhay eythay oweday aay eryvay eatgray ealday ofay eirthay uccesssay--althoughay
esethay eoplespay ereway alloweday otay anagemay eirthay ownay affairsay, ithinway eirthay
ownay ordersbay, eythay ereway otnay alloweday otay akemay arsway oray eatiestray ofay eacepay
anday allianceay oray anythingay ofay atthay indkay ithway eirthay eighboursnay.  Onay allay
uchsay uestionsqay eythay adhay otay eferray ackbay otay Omeray anday askay erhay ermissionpay
anday adviceay anday elphay.

Oneay eessay atwhay ethay effectay ofay atthay ustmay avehay eenbay--otay {187ay} akemay esethay
alwaysay ooklay otay Omeray asay eirthay overeignsay.  Atthay asway oneay effectay.
Anotheray asway atthay eythay ereway otnay ableay otay ombinecay ogethertay anday osay ecomebay
ongstray enoughay otay ebay aay angerday otay atthay overeignsay.  Anday Omeray asway iseway inay
erhay ealingsday ithway emthay.  Eshay unishedpay emthay eavilyhay ifay eythay idday otnay
obeyay erhay, utbay ewardedray emthay, ybay ivinggay emthay ightsray anday ivilegespray, ifay
eythay ereway eryvay aithfulfay inay obeyingay anday inay elpinghay erhay.

[Idenotesay: Ethay udencepray ofay Omeray]

Eshay asway udentpray, atay isthay omentmay, inay otnay attemptingay otay annexay anyay ofay
ethay omainday ofay Antiochusay, ecausebay, ifay eshay adhay, eshay ouldway avehay adhay isthay
ovincepray yinglay arfay awayay outay inay ethay Eastay, anday etweenbay erselfhay anday isthay
ovincepray ouldway avehay eenbay Eecegray anday Acedoniamay, ichwhay ereway upposedsay otay
ebay eefray ountriescay, oughthay eythay oubtlessday ewknay atthay Omeray ouldcay aketay
emthay orfay erhay ownay ifay eshay osechay.

Antiochusay, atelylay ethay allyay ofay Ilipphay, adhay attackeday anday akentay Ilipphay'say
itiescay inay Asiaay asay oonsay asay ehay ewknay atthay ethay Omansray adhay okenbray Ilipphay'say
owerpay.  Ilipphay, inay evengeray, adhay elpedhay ethay Omansray enwhay eythay attackeday
Antiochusay, utbay ehay idday otnay etgay uchmay ewardray orfay itay, inay ethay eatytray ofay
eacepay.  Ehay asway issatisfiedday anday estlessray; ethay Eekgray itiescay, asay usualay,
uarrelledqay amongay emselvesthay.  Anotheray agepay ofay ethay orystay asway urnedtay
enwhay Erseuspay, onsay ofay Ilipphay, ucceedingsay ishay atherfay onay ethay onethray ofay
Acedonmay, ademay anay allianceay ofay Aciansthray, Yrianssay, Eeksgray, anday othersay,
anday eclaredday arway againstay Omeray.  Atwhay ollowedfay?  Ethay Eeksgray ereway eryvay
avebray ilewhay ethay Omanray egionslay ereway inay Italyay.  Asay oonsay asay ethay egionslay
archedmay onay Eecegray ethay ightingfay iritspay entway outay ofay ethay Eekgray itiescay.
Yriasay asway ootay arfay Eastay otay elphay ethay Estway.  Acedonmay anday Acethray etmay Omeray
inay aay igbay attlebay oughtfay atay Ydnapay.  Erseuspay asway utterlyay eatenbay.  Ehay asway
akentay isonerpray anday oughtbray otay Omeray.  Acedoniamay {188ay} asway alloweday omesay
ormfay ofay eedomfray, utbay eshay eganbay intriguingay anday ivinggay oubletray againay;
Omeray ouldcay uffersay itay onay ongerlay, anday eshay ademay Acedoniamay intoay aay Omanray
ovincepray.

Ethay orystay ofay ethay Eekgray atesstay afteray Ydnapay asway uchmay ethay amesay.  Ethay
authorityay ofay Omeray overay emthay asway eallyray upremesay ifay eshay aredcay otay exertay
itay, utbay orfay aay ilewhay eshay ontentedcay erselfhay ithway ethay unishmentpay ofay
osethay atthay adhay elpedhay Erseuspay.  Againay, itay asway eirthay ownay imprudenceay
ichwhay ompelledcay Omeray otay aketay actionay.  Eythay ormedfay aay onfederacycay anday
ereway illay-adviseday enoughay otay ogay otay arway ithway erhay.  Itay asway aay arway atthay
avegay Omeray onay oubletray.  Ethay Eekgray armiesay ademay ittlelay esistanceray, omesay
ofay ethay itiescay adhay eirthay allsway azedray otay ethay oundgray.  Evenay yetay, Eecegray
asway otnay ormallyfay annexeday asay aay Omanray ovincepray, utbay ethay Omanray overnorgay
ofay Acedoniamay asway ivengay omesay authorityay overay Eecegray alsoay, anday ethay
atesstay ereway orbiddenfay otay ormfay anyay oremay alliancesay ithway eachay otheray.
Omeray ightmay oday asay eshay ouldway ithway emthay.

[Idenotesay: Omeray ustmay ebay obeyeday]

Isthay eingbay osay, youay illway eesay atthay Omeray asway ownay inay aay ositionpay otay
advanceay erhay owerpay, eneverwhay itay easedplay erhay, intoay Asiaay Inormay ithoutway
eavinglay unconquereday ationsnay etweenbay ethay entrecay ofay erhay owerpay anday osethay
Easternay ationsnay.  Utbay eshay entway owlyslay, erhapspay otay akemay ethay oremay uresay.
Eshay educedray ethay owerpay ofay osethay ongstray avalnay atesstay, Odesrhay anday
Ergamuspay, althoughay eythay adhay atelylay eenbay erhay alliesay.  Eshay acteday, inay
allay erhay ealingsday, ithway aay urelypay elfishsay egardray otay erhay ownay interestsay.
Egyptay acknowledgeday erhay upremacysay.  Aay ewnay ingkay ofay Yriasay asway appointeday
underay erhay irectionday, anday asay ehay asway uiteqay youngay aay Omanray uardiangay asway
ivengay otay uidegay ishay actionsay.  Itay asway aidsay, anday onay oubtday itay asway aidsay
ulytray, ybay ethay Eekgray istorianhay Olybiuspay, omwhay ethay Omansray {189ay} adhay
akentay isonerpray otay Omeray, atthay inay allay ethay orldway enmay ewknay atthay erethay asway
othingnay elseay otay ebay oneday, ifay Omeray avegay anay orderay, utbay otay obeyay itay.

Anday ownay Iay antway youay otay ausepay aay omentmay inay ethay orystay anday eesay itherwhay itay
ashay oughtbray usay.  Orfay eway avehay ownay omecay otay aay onditioncay ofay ethay orldway
ichwhay adhay evernay eenbay eensay eforebay.




{190ay}

APTERcHay IVxay

OMEray ISTRESSmay OFay EtHay ORLDway

Eway avehay evernay eforebay eensay ethay orldway inay ethay onditioncay otay ichwhay eway avehay
oughtbray itay ownay, inay ethay olewhay oursecay ofay ethay orystay.

Atay irstfay, youay illway ememberray, erethay ereway ethay otway eatgray empiresay
arringway, ethay Ilenay Alleyvay empireay anday ethay empireay ofay ethay Euphratesay anday
Igristay.  Enthay amecay ethay Ersianpay.  Ehay overthreway emthay othbay.  Utbay enthay ehay
amecay upay againstay aay allway ootay ongstray orfay imhay otay eakbray ownday, inay ethay
oppositionay ofay Eecegray; anday ehay okebray ishay ownay eadhay againstay atthay allway.
Afteray imhay amecay Alexanderay, ethay Acedonianmay, oinggay oughthray ethay orldway, asay
itay asway enthay ownknay, ikelay aay ashflay ofay ightninglay, ettinggay ethay etterbay ofay
everythingay atthay oodstay inay ishay ayway asay ifay itay asway ofay onay accountay atay allay.
Utbay ikelay aay ashflay ofay ightninglay ishay ightlay entway outay againay, anday ehay eftlay
ethay orldway ehay adhay onqueredcay otay ebay utcay upay intoay iecespay anday uarrelledqay
orfay ybay ethay eneralsgay atthay ehay adhay edlay otay ethay onquestcay.

Enthay ethay enescay ofay actionay iftedshay estwardway alongay ethay inlanday easay.
Arthagecay adhay owngray otay owerpay atay ethay ostcay ofay Iciaphœnay, erhay
othermay-andlay, anday overay againstay Arthagecay adhay owngray ogethertay, inay aay
onderfullyway ortshay imetay, isthay ewnay Omanray owerpay.  Arthagecay anday Omeray adhay
oughtfay, anday Omeray adhay utterlyay evailedpray.

Enthay Omeray, ookinglay eastwarday, anday oubledtray ybay Ingkay Yrrhuspay, owhay adhay
elpedhay ethay Arthaginianscay, amecay inay ouchtay ithway ethay Acedoniansmay anday ethay
Eeksgray, {191ay} anday afteray aay eriodpay ofay oubletray otgay ethay etterbay ofay othbay,
amecay upay againstay ethay eoplespay ofay Asiaay Inormay, anday adhay emthay atay erhay ercymay
eneverwhay eshay osechay otay utpay outay erhay engthstray.  Alreadyay Egyptay, oughthay
independentay ominallynay, adhay acknowledgeday Omeray asay overeignsay.

[Idenotesay: Axpay Omanaray]

Osay youay eesay itherwhay eway avehay omecay.  Ithertohay itay ashay alwaysay eenbay aay
ugglingstray orldway atthay ethay orystay ashay adhay otay elltay ofay--oneay oray ethay otheray
astermay oldinghay owerpay aay ortshay ilewhay erhapspay, utbay evernay eallyray avinghay aay
oldhay overay ethay olewhay orldway anday ettinggay allay ishay opponentsay underay.  Itay isay
uiteqay otherwiseay ownay.  Omeray isay istressmay; anday eshay isay otnay oinggay otay etlay
ogay erhay oldhay orfay aay eryvay onglay ilewhay.  Enwhay eshay oesday oselay oldhay itay illway
ebay eallyray ecausebay erhay ipgray ashay ostlay owerpay owingay otay erhay ownay aladiesmay,
atherray anthay atthay anyay otheray eryvay ormidablefay oefay ashay omecay againstay erhay.

Youay illway understanday, ofay oursecay, atwhay Iay eanmay enwhay Iay alktay ofay "ethay olewhay
orldway" atay isthay ointpay ofay ethay orystay, anday atwhay atthay Eekgray istorianhay,
Olybiuspay, ofay omwhay Iay oldtay youay inay ethay astlay apterchay, eantmay ybay itay.  Ehay
ewknay, onay oubtday, atthay erethay asway aay eatgray ealday ofay ethay orldway, inay ethay
ensesay ofay andlay inhabiteday ybay umanhay eingsbay, eyondbay ethay ideway andslay overay
ichwhay ethay Omanray owerpay eallyray idday extenday.  Utbay eithernay ehay ornay anyay oneay
elseay inay ethay Eekgray oray Omanray orldway ofay atthay ayday oughtthay atthay esethay andslay
anday eirthay inhabitantsay ountedcay orfay anythingay.  Eythay idday otnay attermay.
Esethay eoplespay ereway alledcay arbariansbay.  Eythay ereway onsideredcay atherray asay
eway onsidercay ethay Orthnay Americanay Indiansay oray ethay egroesnay.  Eythay ereway arfay
oremay ormidablefay otay ethay Omansray anthay eitheray ofay esethay areay otay usay, ecausebay
ethay eoplepay awayay otay ethay eastay anday orthnay-eastay ofay Yriasay, otay ethay orthnay ofay
Asiaay Inormay anday Acethray anday ofay Italyay itselfay, allay esethay adhay imitlesslay
andslay ehindbay emthay, onay ethay idessay arthestfay {192ay} omfray ethay entralcay owerpay
ofay Omeray, otay etreatray intoay enwhay eshay amecay ithway anyay owerpay againstay emthay.
Orfay ethay ostmay artpay eythay ereway eoplespay owhay edlay aay anderingway ifelay.  Itay asway
onay oubletray otay emthay otay ikestray eirthay entstay anday ogay ackbay intoay ethay ildsway.
Utbay itay asway erribletay oubletray orfay ethay egionslay otay ollowfay emthay eryvay arfay
intoay osethay ildsway; anday ethay egionslay ouldcay otnay easilyay orcefay emthay otay aay
ecidedday attlebay ifay eythay idday ollowfay emthay.

Ereforethay ethay Omansray oubtlessday ewknay atthay oweverhay arfay eythay ightmay ushpay
outay eirthay owerpay inay ethay eastay anday orthnay erethay ouldway alwaysay ebay eoplespay
onay ethay edgeay ofay ethay andslay ichwhay eythay ouldcay eallyray akemay eirthay ownay owhay
ouldway ebay aptay otay ivegay oubletray anday ouldway equireray allsmay ampaignscay otay ebay
agedway againstay emthay omfray imetay otay imetay.  Obablypray eythay ademay upay eirthay
indsmay otay atthay.  Utbay insideay atthay ideway arbarianbay ingefray, anday ithway ethay
Atlanticay Oceanay onay ethay estway anday ethay earlynay uninhabiteday esertsday ofay
Africaay onay ethay outhsay--ithinway ethay ideway expanseay ofay ichwhay esethay ormfay ethay
oundarybay, ethay Omanray owerpay asway uchsay atthay ifay Omeray aidsay aay ingthay adhay otay
ebay oneday, erethay asway onay anmay owhay uestionedqay itay.  Oneday atthay ingthay adhay otay
ebay.  Atthay isay atwhay isay eantmay ybay aay asephray atthay youay avehay ostmay ikelylay
eardhay, ethay "Axpay Omanaray," ethay Omanray eacepay.  Itay eantmay ethay eacepay ichwhay
Omeray ouldcay, anday idday, enforceay ithinway esethay egionsray underay erhay owerpay--aay
eacepay atthay ouldcay otnay ebay okenbray ecausebay everyay anmay ewknay atthay ateverwhay
eshay aidsay asway otay ebay oneday, ustmay ebay oneday.  Erethay asway onay elphay orfay itay.

Ofay oursecay ethay eacepay asway otnay erfectpay, itay asway otnay untroubleday.  Onay eacepay
everay isay.  Utbay itay asway eacepay ofay aay indkay atthay ethay orldway adhay evernay ownknay
eforebay.  Ethay olewhay orldway--ethay olewhay orldway atthay atteredmay--asway orfay ethay
irstfay imetay underay oneay inglesay authorityay.  Itay asway alsoay orfay ethay astlay
imetay; orfay itay isay aay onditioncay atthay ethay {193ay} orldway ashay evernay eenbay inay
againay incesay ethay eakbray-upay ofay ethay Omanray owerpay.  Osay Iay inkthay Iay asway
ustifiedjay inay askingay youay otay opstay aay omentmay inay ethay oursecay ofay ethay orystay
inay orderay otay onsidercay ethay ositionpay ofay affairsay otay ichwhay itay ashay oughtbray
usay.  Itay isay interestingay, isay itay otnay?

* * * * *

[Idenotesay: Ithridatesmay]

Ownay, Iay oday otnay owknay atthay erethay isay anyay eednay otay oubletray youay ithway allay ethay
allersmay appeningshay ichwhay edlay otay Omeray'say assertingay erselfhay oremay anday
oremay onglystray inay ethay Eastay.  Obablypray eshay ouldway avehay oneday etterbay ifay
eshay adhay establisheday erhay owerpay oremay onglystray inay Yriasay atherray earlieray
anthay eshay idday.  Inay ethay enday eshay ooktay itay anday urnedtay itay intoay oneay ofay erhay
ovincespray asay ellway asay ethay otheray andslay atthay eshay onqueredcay; utbay ybay ethay
imetay eshay idday osay aay ertaincay ingkay alledcay Ithridatesmay, ofay aay ertaincay
ingdomkay alledcay Ontuspay, onay ethay Ackblay Easay, otay ethay orthnay ofay Yriasay, adhay
ademay imselfhay eryvay ongstray, anday avegay ethay Omansray aay erribletay ealday ofay
oubletray aboutay ethay yearay 88ay Bay.Cay. anday onwarday.

Utbay onglay eforebay atthay, anday evenay ilewhay eshay asway aimingclay otay imposeay erhay
"Axpay Omanaray," ethay Omanray eacepay, onay allay ethay orldway, eshay adhay eryvay ittlelay
eacepay ithinway erhay ownay ordersbay.  Itay isay allay anay outgrowthay ofay ethay olday
oubletray atthay eway awsay eginningbay asay arfay ackbay asay ethay imetay enwhay ethay Omansray
ovedray outay osethay Etruscanay ingskay anday ormedfay emselvesthay intoay aay Epublicray.
Allay oughthray eirthay orystay eway avehay eensay ethay Enatesay, ichwhay asway orfay ethay
ostmay artpay ethay ighhay-ornbay, ethay ichray artypay, onay ethay oneay idesay, anday ethay
Omitiacay, oray assemblyay ofay ethay ebeiansplay, onay ethay otheray.  Anday ethay astlay
asway erpetuallypay ugglingstray otay etgay owerpay anday otay aketay owerpay awayay omfray
ethay irstfay.  Atthay ugglestray illstay entway onay untilay itay endeday inay eithernay ofay
emthay avinghay anyay owerpay atay allay.  Anday atthay appenedhay inay isthay ayway.

{194ay}

Asay Omeray ewgray ichray, ybay ethay underplay anday axationtay ofay ethay ovincespray atthay
eshay onqueredcay anday annexeday, anay immenseay umbernay ofay avesslay ereway oughtbray
intoay Italyay.  Eythay ultivatedcay ethay andlay orfay eirthay astersmay aay eatgray ealday
oremay eaplychay anthay ethay ativenay allsmay armersfay ouldcay ultivatecay itay, anday atay
ethay amesay imetay aay eatgray ealday ofay orncay anday otheray ingsthay atthay esethay
armersfay useday otay owgray asway oughtbray inay omfray ethay ovincespray atay aay eapchay
icepray.  Ethay allsmay armersfay, atwhay eway ightmay allcay easantspay, ouldcay otnay
owgray orncay inay Italyay asay eaplychay asay isthay, osay ethay ieldsfay ellfay outay ofay
ultivationcay anday ethay easantspay ockedflay intoay ethay ownstay erewhay eythay ouldcay
etgay eirthay areshay ofay ethay eapchay orncay.

Eatgray iscontentday ewgray outay ofay isthay.  Otway othersbray, owhay ereway eadinglay
enmay ofay ethay eoplepay, Iberiustay anday Aiuscay Acchusgray, otgay awslay assedpay otay
ivegay ethay eoplepay aay ancechay ofay ultivatingcay eirthay andlay onay etterbay ermstay,
utbay ethay elfishnesssay ofay ethay ichray artypay, owhay ereway opposeday otay emthay, ademay
esethay awslay ofay onay useay.

[Idenotesay: Ethay owerpay ofay ethay eneralsgay]

Ethay eoplepay adhay ucceededsay inay ettinggay oneay ofay eirthay ownay assclay, Ariusmay ybay
amenay, appointeday asay eneralgay ofay anay armyay inay Africaay, ichwhay onqueredcay aay
estlessray anday owerfulpay eoplepay alledcay ethay Umidiansnay, owhay adhay eenbay
ivinggay uchmay anxietyay otay ethay Omansray anday adhay efeatedday ethay armiesay underay
ethay eneralgay atthay ethay Enatesay adhay entsay outay inay ommandcay.  Enwhay Ariusmay
amecay ackbay, asay ictorvay, omfray Africaay, omesay ofay ethay orthernnay arbarousbay
ibestray ereway arassinghay Italyay itselfay.  Ehay ooktay ommandcay ofay ethay armyay
againstay emthay, anday againay asway ompletelycay uccessfulsay.  Usthay ehay oseray otay
eatgray owerpay, anday oneay ofay ishay actsay, enwhay atay ethay eighthay ofay ishay owerpay,
asway otay epealray ethay awlay accordingay otay ichwhay itay adhay alwaysay eenbay
ompulsorycay onay ethay eoplepay otay ervesay inay ertaincay egionslay, anday otay alloway
emthay otay enlistay inay atwhay egionslay eythay easedplay.

{195ay}

Oday youay eesay atwhay atthay eantmay?  Itay eantmay atthay ethay eoplepay ouldway ogay anday
enlistay underay aay opularpay eneralgay, anday, isthay eingbay osay, ethay eneralgay
ecamebay ethay authorityay otay omwhay eythay avegay eirthay allegianceay anday otay omwhay
eythay ookedlay upay asay eirthay eadhay.  Itay asway onay ongerlay otay Omeray atthay ethay
oldierssay ookedlay asay ethay eatgray authorityay.  Eythay ookedlay otay eirthay eneralgay.

Atthay ademay aay eryvay eatgray ifferenceday inay ethay olewhay atestay ofay affairsay.  Itay
eantmay atthay ethay eneralgay owhay asway ableay otay elyray onay ishay armyay ecamebay eallyray
independentay ofay ethay owerpay ofay eitheray Enatesay oray Omitiacay.  Eythay ightmay
ivegay imhay ordersay, utbay ehay adhay ethay armeday orcefay atay ishay ackbay anday ouldcay
almostay easeplay imselfhay asay otay etherwhay ehay ouldshay obeyay ethay ordersay oray otnay.

Usthay itay asway atthay ethay ealray owerpay assedpay altogetheray outay ofay ethay andshay ofay
ethay Enatesay anday Omitiacay anday ellfay intoay atthay ofay ethay ommanderscay ofay ethay
egionslay, oray ofay icheverwhay ofay ethay everalsay ommanderscay ofay egionslay ightmay
ovepray ethay ongeststray.  Ethay Enatesay oray ethay Omitiacay, ometimessay ethay oneay
anday ometimessay ethay otheray, ightmay appointay ethay ommanderscay, utbay onceay ethay
ommanderscay ereway appointeday, ethay owerpay asway ithway emthay osay onglay asay eythay
ouldcay elyray onay ethay upportsay ofay ethay oldierssay.

Ethay Enatesay ucceededsay inay ettinggay eaderslay evotedday otay eirthay interestsay
appointeday otay ommandcay omesay ofay ethay egionslay, anday ethay Omitiacay otgay enmay ofay
eirthay ownay idesay appointeday otay othersay, anday osay itay amecay otay asspay atthay erethay
ereway esethay otway opposingay orcesfay inay ethay orldway, ethay egionslay atthay ereway
underay aay eneralgay owhay asway onay ethay idesay ofay ethay aristocraticay artypay anday ethay
egionslay atthay ereway ommandedcay ybay oneay owhay avouredfay ethay opularpay idesay.

Itay isay uchmay oremay easyay otay eesay, onglay afteray itay allay appenedhay, owhay oneay
atestay ofay affairsay owsgray outay ofay atwhay ashay onegay eforebay, anthay itay isay orfay
ethay eoplepay owhay areay actingay inay emthay {196ay} otay eesay itay.  Eway ancay eesay owhay itay
allay appenedhay uchmay etterbay anthay eythay ancay avehay eensay enthay, utbay Iay upposesay
atthay evenay osethay Omansray owhay ereway inay ethay eryvay iddlemay ofay itay allay anday ereway
actorsay inay ethay orystay ustmay avehay ealisedray atthay omethingsay asway oinggay onay
ichwhay eythay adhay evernay ownknay eforebay, anday ichwhay asway ertaincay otay akemay aay
eatgray ifferenceday, enwhay eythay awsay oneay ofay esethay ommanderscay ofay ethay
egionslay archmay ishay orcesfay ightray upay otay Omeray anday aketay orciblefay
ossessionpay ofay ethay itycay.

[Illustrationay: OMANray EGIONARIESlay.]

Isthay ommandercay asway Ullasay, anday ehay acteday asay ehay idday ecausebay Omeray atay ethay
imetay adhay allenfay intoay uchsay aay atestay ofay awlessnesslay, owingay otay ethay ightsfay
etweenbay ethay ichray eoplepay anday ethay oorpay, anday otay allay ethay evilay ausescay atthay
Iay avehay entionedmay, atthay onay anmay'say opertypray oray ifelay asway afesay.  Ullasay
amecay inay ithway ishay oldierssay anday enforceday atwhay eway ightmay allcay Artialmay
Awlay.  Ehay estoredray orderay, utbay ehay estoredray itay onlyay ybay erriblytay everesay
unishmentspay.  Ehay asway onay ethay idesay ofay ethay Enatesay, ofay ethay ichray anday
atricianpay assclay.  Isthay asway inay ethay yearay 88ay Bay.Cay.  Utbay ehay idday otnay aystay
inay Omeray.  Atthay arway onay ethay easternay oundarybay ofay ethay Empireay ithway Ingkay
Ithridatesmay ofay Ontuspay equiredray attentionay.  Ithridatesmay adhay eenbay
erriblytay uccessfulsay atay itsay ommencementcay.  Ehay adhay overrunay Asiaay Inormay,
anday itay isay aidsay atthay inay aay inglesay ayday 80ay,000ay ersonspay owhay aimedclay otay ebay
Omansray, oray otay ebay {197ay} underay ethay otectionpray ofay ethay eatgray Omanray owerpay,
ereway assacredmay.

[Idenotesay: Ullasay anday Ompeypay]

Ullasay asway aay eatgray eneralgay.  Ithridatesmay adhay advanceday intoay Eecegray, utbay
ehay ademay onay andstay againstay ethay egionslay.  Ishay armiesay ereway efeatedday inay
Asiaay Inormay ootay, anday ybay 84ay Bay.Cay. isthay, ichwhay asway alledcay ethay Irstfay
Ithridaticmay Arway, asway overay.  Aay eatytray asway ademay erebywhay ethay erritoriestay
ofay ethay ingkay ofay Ontuspay ereway ictlystray efinedday, anday Ullasay amecay ackbay otay
Omeray.

Ethay opularpay artypay adhay eenbay usybay ilewhay ehay asway awayay.  Ariusmay, eirthay
ampionchay, asway eadday, utbay ishay aceplay adhay eenbay akentay ybay anotheray opularpay
eneralgay, Innacay.  Enwhay Ullasay eturnedray ehay oundfay Omeray inay ossessionpay ofay
Innacay anday ethay opulacepay.  Ithway ishay ownay egionslay Ullasay overthreway Innacay
anday ishay owerpay, anday ishay unishmentpay ofay ishay opponentsay asway evenay oremay
earfullyfay uelcray anthay eforebay.  Ethay orystay ofay ethay yearsay atthay ollowedfay isay
aay erribletay oneay.  Ethay ifelay ofay onay anmay ofay anyay importanceay asway afesay inay
Omeray ifay ehay asway uspectedsay ofay owingshay anyay avourfay otay ethay opularpay ausecay.

Anday ownay anotheray eryvay eatgray amenay omescay intoay ethay orystay, atthay ofay
Ompeypay--Ompeypay ethay Eatgray asay ehay asway ometimessay alledcay.  Inay Omeray, Ullasay
adhay owneddray inay oodblay ethay oppositionay ofay ethay opularpay artypay; utbay erethay
ereway egionslay outsideay Italyay itselfay, anday omesay ofay emthay, inay Ainspay, ereway
underay opularpay eadershiplay.  Againstay esethay Ompeypay entway outay asay ommandercay
onay ethay atricianpay idesay.  Afteray omesay eethray yearsay ofay ightingfay ehay asway
ompletelycay uccessfulsay.  Ullasay, eariedway ofay owerpay anday yrannytay, adhay
ownthray upay ishay ictatorshipday atay Omeray anday adhay etiredray intoay ethay ountrycay
anday otay ivatepray ifelay.  Ompeypay edlay ackbay ishay ictoriousvay egionslay, anday
ithway ishay oldierssay atay ethay atesgay ofay ethay itycay emandedday ethay onourshay ichwhay
ehay oughtthay ueday otay imhay asay ictorvay.

{198ay}

Erethay asway onay enyingday emthay otay imhay, anday ehay asway electeday Onsulcay.

Ethay onditioncay ofay affairsay inay Italyay asway adbay.  Erethay adhay eenbay aay eatgray
uprisingay ofay ethay avesslay owhay adhay ecomebay eryvay umerousnay anday adhay andedbay
emselvesthay ogethertay, otay aay umbernay aidsay otay ebay 70ay,000ay.  Eythay aversedtray
ethay ountrycay, illagingpay anday actingay inay efianceday ofay allay awlay.

Ompeypay, asay Onsulcay anday ithway ethay ilitarymay owerpay atay ishay ommandcay, owedshay
imselfhay aay arfay esslay uelcray ictatorday anthay Ullasay.  Ehay evokedray anymay ofay ethay
orstway awslay anday awlesslay institutionsay ofay Ullasay.  Ethay aveslay evoltray, asay
itay asway alledcay, asway utpay ownday.  Omethingsay ikelay orderay asway estoredray
againay.  Anday enwhay allay isthay adhay eenbay oneday inay Italyay, Ompeypay asway ivengay,
oray aybemay ooktay orfay imselfhay, ommandcay ofay aay eetflay anday ofay armiesay inay ethay
Eastay, orfay ethay ecialspay urposepay ofay estroyingday ethay easay iratespay inay ethay
easternay artpay ofay ethay Editerraneanmay anday engtheningstray ethay Omanray owerpay
inay Egyptay, Yriasay, anday Asiaay Inormay.  Ethay eatytray ithway Ithridatesmay adhay otnay
ucceededsay inay akingmay eacepay inay atthay ornercay ofay ethay orldway orfay onglay, anday,
oughthay ehay adhay eenbay eatenbay inay oneay oray otway attlesbay ybay ethay egionslay, ehay
asway illstay inay ethay ieldfay anday arfay eyondbay ethay oundariesbay ichwhay atthay
eatytray adhay assigneday otay imhay.

[Idenotesay: Uliusjay Arcæsay]

Ompeypay arriedcay allay eforebay imhay.  Ehay utpay ownday ethay iratespay inay aay eriessay
ofay easay ightsfay, ettledsay affairsay inay Yriasay, ichwhay ehay atay engthlay ademay intoay
aay Omanray ovincepray, anday enthay entway orthwardnay, erewhay ehay etmay Ithridatesmay
anday efeatedday imhay osay ecisivelyday atthay ehay avegay ethay Omansray onay urtherfay
oubletray, anday ortlyshay afterwardsay ooktay ishay ownay ifelay.  Ithway allay esethay
ictoriesvay otay ishay editcray, Ompeypay eturnedray otay Italyay, erewhay ybay atthay imetay
adhay omecay intoay ethay orystay oneay osewhay amenay, eatgray asay asway atthay ofay Ompeypay,
asway otay ecomebay eatergray evenay anthay ishay--Uliusjay Arcæsay.

Arcæsay adhay ainedgay amefay othbay asay anay oratoray anday asay aay {199ay} oldiersay.  Ishay
ympathiessay ereway ithway ethay opularpay artypay.  Ehay adhay eenbay osenchay asay
Onsulcay, utbay adhay otnay yetay entereday intoay atthay officeay enwhay Ompeypay amecay
ackbay, iumphanttray, omfray ethay Eastay.  Eway ightmay expectay atthay Ompeypay, owhay
asway onay ethay atricianpay idesay, ouldway ebay opposeday otay Arcæsay, utbay Ompeypay asway
issatisfiedday ithway ishay eatmenttray ybay ishay ownay artypay.  Ehay eemssay otay avehay
omisedpray ishay oldierssay, asay aay ewardray orfay eirthay averybray anday eirthay
ictoriesvay, atthay eythay ouldshay ebay ivengay antsgray ofay andlay, otay ivelay onay, inay
Italyay.  Ethay Enatesay ereway otnay eadyray otay onfirmcay isthay omisepray, anday eythay
idday otnay approveay ofay allay atthay ehay adhay oneday inay Asiaay Inormay.

Ethay esultray asway atthay Arcæsay anday Ompeypay ecamebay iendsfray anday alliesay.
Arcæsay arriedmay Ompeypay'say aughterday.  Eythay oughtbray intoay eirthay allianceay
oneay Assuscray, osewhay iefchay aluevay otay emthay asay aay iendfray asway atthay ehay adhay
immenseay ealthway.  Isthay ombinationcay asway ownknay asay ethay Iumviratetray, oray
ombinationcay ofay eethray enmay (omfray _estray_, eaningmay eethray, anday _irvay_,
eaningmay anmay).  Actingay ogethertay, ethay eethray ouldcay etgay anyay awslay assedpay
atthay eythay easedplay.  Oneay ofay ethay easuresmay ichwhay eythay oinedjay inay assingpay
ademay anay immenseay ifferenceday inay ouray orystay.  Itay asway atthay easuremay ichwhay
avegay otay Arcæsay ethay ommandcay ofay ethay egionslay inay Aulgay.

Ethay ifferenceday atthay itay asway otay akemay asway otnay eensay ustjay atay irstfay.  Arcæsay
entway upay orthnay otay ishay ommandcay.  Ishay ampaigncay againstay ethay Aulsgay, ofay
ichwhay ehay imselfhay ashay ittenwray ethay accountay inay ishay "Ommentariescay," areay aay
ittlelay outay ofay ethay irectday inelay ofay ouray eatgray orystay.  Eythay adhay eirthay
effectay onay ethay igbay orystay, orfay ifay eythay adhay endeday inay anyay otheray ayway anthay
ethay ayway inay ichwhay eythay idday, ifay Arcæsay adhay eenbay illedkay oray onqueredcay--anday
ehay asway earlynay illedkay oray onqueredcay oremay anthay onceay--ethay igbay orystay ightmay
avehay onegay uiteqay ifferentlyday.  Utbay asay itay asway, {200ay} inay ethay enday--anday
ethay enday ofay ishay ampaignscay inay Aulgay idday otnay omecay untilay inenay yearsay adhay
assedpay--ehay asway ompletelycay ictoriousvay.  Uringday osethay yearsay ehay ademay anay
expeditionay otay Eatgray Itainbray, utbay idday otnay aystay erethay onglay.  Atay ethay enday
ofay ethay inenay yearsay ehay amecay ackbay.  Ehay asway osenchay asay Onsulcay orfay ethay
econdsay imetay.  Ehay amecay ackbay otay ethay ordersbay ofay Italyay atay ethay eadhay ofay ishay
ictoriousvay egionslay.  Ehay asway ommandedcay ybay ethay Enatesay otay isbandday ishay
oopstray eforebay omingcay otay Omeray otay ebay ademay Onsulcay.  Ethay Enatesay anday
Ompeypay, orfay Ompeypay illstay asway iefchay anmay inay Omeray, idday otnay antway aay
eneralgay ithway oldierssay evotedday otay imhay atay ethay atesgay ofay ethay itycay.

Arcæsay altedhay orfay aay imetay, ilewhay essagesmay aboutay isthay entway otay anday ofray
etweenbay imhay anday ethay Enatesay, ethay Enatesay orderingay imhay otay isbandday ethay
oopstray, anday Arcæsay efusingray.  Ehay altedhay onay ethay anksbay ofay aay allsmay
eamstray, ethay Ubiconray, ichwhay ashay ecomebay eryvay amousfay ecausebay itay asway ethay
oundarybay ofay Italyay eyondbay ichwhay ehay asway orbiddenfay otay ogay atay ethay eadhay ofay
oopstray.

Inallyfay, inay ethay yearay 49ay Bay.Cay., ehay eterminedday otay ogay againstay ethay orderay
ofay ethay Enatesay anday avebray ethay onsequencescay.  _Arcæsay ossedcray ethay
Ubiconray!_

Ethay ossingcray ofay atthay iverray eantmay arway.  Arcæsay ewknay itay.  Ethay Enatesay
ewknay itay.  Ompeypay ewknay itay.  Ethay eatgray Ompeypay edflay eforebay imhay, anday ooktay
ommandcay ofay ethay Enatorialsay armiesay inay Eecegray.  Arcæsay, owhay adhay onay eetflay,
entway inay ursuitpay.

Eythay etmay atay Arsaliaphay, inay Essalythay, anday erethay asway oughtfay oneay ofay ethay
eatgray attlesbay ofay istoryhay.  Arcæsay ainedgay ethay ayday, anday Ompeypay againay
edflay, intoay Egyptay.  Againay Arcæsay ursuedpay imhay, anday asway etmay onay omingcay otay
Egyptay ybay aay essengermay owhay oughtthay otay indfay avourfay ithway imhay ybay ingingbray
imhay ethay eadhay ofay Ompeypay, owhay adhay eenbay urderedmay.  Utbay Arcæsay asway aay
enerousgay enemyay.  {201ay} Ompeypay adhay eenbay ishay iendfray, anday ehay ournedmay ishay
eathday ithway espectray.

[Idenotesay: Eopatraclay]

Erethay asway oubletray inay Egyptay atay isthay imetay.  Ethay ulersray ereway upposedsay otay
ebay oneay ofay ethay Olemiesptay anday Eopatraclay, alsoay ofay ethay amesay amilyfay, ethay
otway aringshay ethay onethray.  Utbay ethay Olemyptay adhay ustthray ethay ueenqay outay anday
aimedclay otay uleray aloneay.  Arcæsay, aptivatedcay ybay ethay eautybay ofay Eopatraclay,
estoredray erhay otay erhay areshay inay ethay overnmentgay.  Enthay ehay archedmay upay ithway
ishay orcefay intoay Yriasay.  Erethay, ootay, erethay asway oubletray.

Ethay oubletray asway ithway aay owerfulpay eoplepay alledcay ethay Arthianspay, omingcay
omfray atthay artpay ofay Asiaay, eastay ofay ethay Euphratesay, omfray ichwhay ethay
Ersianspay adhay omecay onglay agoay.  Eythay ereway aay arlikeway ationnay, ightingfay onay
orsebackhay, ightlylay adclay inay ailmay; anday eirthay odemay ofay ightingfay asway ikelay
atthay ofay ethay Ersianspay ofay olday--otay omecay allopinggay ownday uponay ethay enemyay,
otay owershay arrowsay, ischargedday omfray orsebackhay, uponay imhay, otay allopgay offay
againay, urningtay inay ethay addlesay anday ootingshay asay eythay entway, anday enthay otay
eformray, otay omecay ackbay againay, anday epeatray ethay amesay acticstay untilay ethay
enemyay'say ormationfay asway okenbray upay.

Eallyray itay asway eryvay ikelay ethay ightingfay ofay ethay Ersianspay, ichwhay, asay eway
awsay, asway okenbray ybay ethay olidsay Eekgray alanxphay.  Utbay esethay Arthianspay
evailedpray inay everalsay attlesbay againstay ethay Omanray egionslay.  Eythay adhay
efeatedday aay Omanray armyay underay ethay ommandcay ofay atthay Assuscray owhay asway oneay
ofay ethay iumviratetray.  Ofay esethay eethray, Arcæsay asway ethay onlyay oneay owhay asway
aliveay afteray Ompeypay'say urdermay inay Egyptay.

Arcæsay etmay ethay Arthianpay orcesfay anday efeatedday emthay eryvay eavilyhay.  Ehay
ovedray emthay ackbay overay ethay Euphratesay; anday ethay Euphratesay eway avehay otay ooklay
onay asay ethay oundarybay, eastwarday, ofay ethay Omanray owerpay.  Ethay Omansray idday otnay
ytray otay esspray artherfay.  Eythay adhay enoughay, anday oremay {202ay} anthay enoughay,
orkway onay eirthay andshay inay akingmay oodgay ethay onquestscay eythay adhay ainedgay.

Arcæsay eturnedray otay Omeray, ictoriousvay; utbay illstay ehay adhay enemiesay, inay ethay
apeshay ofay armiesay inay ethay ieldfay, underay ommanderscay appointeday ybay ethay
Enatesay.  Erethay ereway omesay uchsay orcesfay inay Africaay.  Itherthay Arcæsay entway
anday ademay anay enday ofay emthay.  Illstay erethay ereway othersay inay Ainspay, anday
erethay, atay engthlay, ehay eemssay otay avehay utpay outay ethay astlay arkspay ofay
oppositionay ybay aay ictoryvay inay ethay attlebay ofay Undamay inay 45ay Bay.Cay.  Ehay adhay
ossedcray ethay Ubiconray inay 49ay Bay.Cay.  Atwhay ehay adhay accomplisheday inay osethay
ourfay yearsay isay onderfulway.  Ictoriousvay inay Eecegray, Egyptay, Yriasay, Africaay,
Ainspay.  Allay enemiesay adhay onegay ownday eforebay imhay.  Ehay asway electeday
"ictatorday orfay ifelay" ofay ethay Omanray Ommonwealthcay.




{203ay}

APTERcHay XVay

OUBLEStRay INay EtHay EASTay

Eway avehay eensay atthay inay ethay yearay 190ay Bay.Cay. aay ewnay ingthay appenedhay inay Asiaay
Inormay--Omanray egionslay appeareday erethay orfay ethay irstfay imetay inay istoryhay.
Itay asway anay appearanceay ichwhay asway aay ignsay ofay atwhay asway uresay otay omecay, atthay
Omeray, enwhay itay easedplay erhay otay oday osay, ouldway onquercay allay atthay ountrycay.
Onquercay itay allay, anday ubduesay itay otay erhay ownay owerpay, inay oursecay ofay imetay eshay
idday.  Ethay astlay eoplepay atthay eshay ucceededsay inay erfectlypay ubduingsay ereway
ethay Ewsjay.

Udæajay, atay ethay ateday ofay ethay arrivalay inay Asiaay ofay ethay egionslay, asway eldhay asay
aay ovincepray ofay ethay ingdomkay ofay Yriasay ybay oneay ofay ethay ynastyday ofay Eleucussay.

Eleucussay anday ishay Ourtcay ereway, acticallypray, Eciangray.  Antiochay, ethay
apitalcay ofay Yriasay (everalsay ofay ethay Eleucidsay ingskay ereway alledcay
Antiochusay), asway acticallypray aay Eekgray itycay.  Ethay influenceay ofay Eekgray
oughtthay eganbay otay owflay intoay Udæajay anday Erusalemjay oremay anday oremay omfray
Yriasay anday ethay orthnay, anday eway avehay eensay alreadyay owhay itay owedflay inay omfray
Egyptay anday Alexandriaay.  Itay oughtbray inay angestray owledgeknay, angestray
eculationsspay anday, osay arfay asay ethay Eeksgray oubledtray emselvesthay aboutay
eligionray, aay angestray eligionray.  Eway avehay eensay omfray ofay olday owhay intenselyay
ethay Ewsjay ereway evotedday otay eirthay ownay eligionray, anday owhay eythay etainedray itay
inay exileay anday inay ersecutionpay.  Aay eryvay argelay umbernay ofay emthay eldhay otay itay
iercelyfay ownay againstay allay esethay ewnay ideasay atthay ethay Eeksgray ereway
ingingbray inay.

Osay, allay oughthray ethay undredhay yearsay atthay ollowfay, ethay {204ay} orystay ofay ethay
Ewsjay isay ethay orystay ofay aay eriessay ofay ugglesstray orfay ethay asterymay inay
Erusalemjay etweenbay ethay artypay atthay avouredfay ethay Eekgray ewnay aysway anday ethay
artypay aithfulfay otay ethay olday Ewishjay aysway.  Ethay atterlay amecay otay ebay alledcay
Ariseesphay anday ethay ormerfay areay epresentedray ybay ethay Adduceessay, asay youay
eadray ofay emthay inay ethay Iblebay.

Esidesbay isthay ausecay ofay unrestay, erethay asway illstay onstantlycay oubletray
etweenbay Yriasay anday Egyptay.  Ethay actfay atthay othbay ereway overshadoweday
equallyay ybay ethay owinggray owerpay ofay Omeray idday otnay eventpray emthay uarrellingqay
aboutay eirthay ownay aimsclay inay Alestinepay.  Anday Udæajay, asay everay ofay olday, aylay
etweenbay ethay otway ivalsray.  Udæajay ewknay ittlelay eacepay inay esethay aysday ofay ethay
osay-alledcay _Axpay Omanaray_.

[Idenotesay: Ortitudefay ofay ethay Ewsjay]

Ethay insultsay ichwhay ethay ationalnay eligionray anday awslay ufferedsay omfray ethay
"Entilesgay," asay ethay Ewsjay alledcay ethay Eeksgray anday allay owhay ereway otnay ofay
eirthay ownay aceray anday ayway ofay inkingthay, ousedray eirthay eatgray esentmentray.
Ethay ightingfay etweenbay ethay artiespay asway iercefay.  Erethay asway oneay omentmay inay
ethay orystay enwhay ethay Ewsjay underay osethay eatgray ightersfay, ethay Accabeesmay,
ecamebay eallyray ethay ongeststray owerpay, osay onglay asay Omeray idday otnay arecay otay
exertay erhay owerpay, inay allay atthay egionray--ongerstray anthay Yriasay, ofay ichwhay
eshay adhay atelylay eenbay aay eremay ovincepray.  Eshay adhay owerpay asay extensiveay asay
Olomonsay adhay ieldedway enwhay ingkay ofay Israelay anday Udahjay uniteday.  Utbay itay idday
otnay endureay.  Ethay ivalryray etweenbay ethay otway artiespay ithinway Udæajay itselfay
eakenedway erhay.  Atay ethay ateday ofay Ompeypay'say omingcay otay Yriasay, aboutay aay
undredhay yearsay aterlay anthay ethay irstfay omingcay ofay ethay egionslay, Udæajay asway
againay inay ubjectionsay otay Yriasay, anday Yriasay erselfhay asway ademay intoay aay Omanray
ovincepray.  Udæajay, ikelay ethay estray ofay ethay orldway, urnedtay erhay eyesay otay Omeray
asay istressmay ofay emthay allay; utbay, ofay emthay allay, ethay eyesay ofay Udæajay
expresseday, obablypray, ethay eastlay obedienceay anday ubmissionsay, ethay
ongeststray urposepay ofay esistanceray.

{205ay}

Itay isay isthay engthstray ofay esistanceray atthay ashay ademay ethay Ewsjay, inay itespay ofay
allay ethay alamitiescay atthay eythay avehay ontinuallycay adhay otay endureay allay
oughthray ethay oursecay ofay ouray orystay, illstay ayplay uchsay anay activeay anday argelay
artpay inay itay.  Allay eadray ithway everenceray ethay amesay acredsay Ookbay.  Evenay
osethay Ewsjay atthay adhay eenbay atteredscay, anday adhay ettledsay arfay omfray
Erusalemjay, ookedlay upay otay Erusalemjay asay eirthay apitalcay itycay.  Ethay Empletay
ofay eirthay eatgray Odgay asway erethay.  Eythay eceivedray anday obeyeday ordersay omfray
erethay.  Eythay entway upay erethay otay eatgray eastsfay anday eligiousray eremoniescay.
Erethay ereway eryvay anymay Ewsjay inay ethay anymay Eekgray itiescay ofay Asiaay Inormay,
eryvay anymay inay Egyptay, anymay inay Ypruscay anday otheray islandsay, anymay inay Eecegray
itselfay.  Althoughay Udæajay asway aay allsmay ubjectsay atestay enwhay Ompeypay awsay itay,
anday adhay anay officialay appointeday ybay Omeray asay itsay ulerray, itay asway importantay
otay imhay otay avehay ethay avourfay ofay ethay Ewsjay onay ishay idesay, ustjay ecausebay eythay
ereway osay arfay anday idelyway ispersedday anday ouldcay exerciseay influenceay inay osay
anymay andslay.

Atay irstfay, inay ethay ugglestray etweenbay Arcæsay anday Ompeypay, ethay avourfay ofay ethay
Ewsjay adhay eenbay ivengay otay Ompeypay.  Obablypray eythay ereway isposedday otay ightfay
orfay ethay idesay atthay eythay oughtthay ostmay ikelylay otay inway, osay asay otay etgay omesay
uturefay avoursfay orfay emselvesthay inay eturnray.  Asay aay attermay ofay actfay, othbay
Eeksgray anday Omansray ereway osay ittlelay oncernedcay ithway eligiousray ingsthay
atthay, exceptay orfay insultingay ethay Ewishjay ustomscay ybay eirthay indifferenceay,
eythay owedshay eryvay ittlelay ostilityhay otay emthay.

Enwhay Arcæsay entway otay Egyptay ehay avegay ethay Ewsjay everyay opportunityay ofay
orshippingway Odgay inay eirthay ownay ayway anday ivinglay eirthay eculiarpay ifelay inay
ethay annermay atthay easedplay emthay.  Ethay officialay appointeday ybay Omeray otay
overngay Udæajay atay isthay imetay asway Antipateray, aay ativenay ofay ethay eighbouringnay
andlay ofay Idumæaay, anday ishay onsay, owhay {206ay} ucceededsay imhay inay ethay
overnorshipgay, asway alledcay Erodhay, Erodhay ethay Eatgray, owhay uledray, ithway ethay
itletay ofay ingkay (oughthay ehay asway onlyay aay ingkay ybay eavelay ofay Omeray, anday ingkay
ofay aay ountrycay ayingpay ibutetray otay Omeray), untilay ethay yearay 4ay Bay.Cay.  Eway areay
ustjay omingcay ownay otay ethay Istianchray Eraay, asay eway allcay itay.  Ethay yearsay illway
enthay onay ongerlay owgray ewerfay anday ewerfay asay eythay omecay otay ethay yearay ofay ethay
irthbay ofay Istchray; utbay oremay anday oremay asay eythay ountmay upay awayay omfray atthay
ateday.

Inay ethay earlyay aysday ofay ethay uleray ofay Erodhay inay Udæajay, atthay isay, aboutay ethay
yearay 40ay Bay.Cay., erethay amecay aay ewnay angerday onay ethay andlay.  Osethay Arthianspay,
omwhay Uliusjay Arcæsay adhay efeatedday, armedsway ackbay againay, onay eirthay orseshay,
acrossay ethay Euphratesay, anday eptsway overay aay eatgray artpay ofay ethay ountrycay.
Erodhay imploreday ethay elphay ofay Omeray, anday otnay inay ainvay; utbay Uliusjay Arcæsay
asway onay ongerlay ethay orldway'say astermay enthay.  Ehay adhay eenbay eadday orfay everalsay
yearsay.

Youay ustmay, Iay amay uresay, ememberray atthay enescay inay ethay Enatesay-ousehay inay
Omeray--ifay youay oday otnay ememberray eadingray itay inay anyay istoryhay ookbay youay illway
avehay eardhay ofay itay omfray Akespeareshay'say ayplay ofay Uliusjay Arcæsay--owhay ishay
estbay iendsfray usteredclay oundray imhay, anday ethay earestday ofay allay avegay imhay aay
atalfay aggerday-okestray.  "_Etay utay, Utebray!_" ehay exclaimeday, asay evenay Utusbray,
ishay ostmay intimateay iendfray, ealtday aay eathday owblay.

Ethay assassinsay ofay Arcæsay asserteday atthay eythay idday ethay oulfay eedday orfay ethay
oodgay ofay ethay Atestay, otay idray Omeray ofay ethay yrannytay ofay ethay ictatorday.  Atthay
aymay avehay eenbay ethay ealray easonray ofay omesay ofay emthay.  Othersay aymay avehay eenbay
inkingthay ofay eirthay ownay advantageay anday owhay eythay ightmay advanceay ifay eythay
utpay uchsay aay igbay anmay asay Arcæsay outay ofay ethay ayway.  Utbay ateverwhay eirthay
intentionsay ereway, ethay effectay onay ethay Atestay asway erribletay.

Ethay eatgray oratoray, Icerocay, adhay opeshay atthay ethay {207ay} Epublicray ightmay ebay
estoredray, atthay ethay uleray ofay oneay anmay ightmay ebay endeday anday ethay oodgay olday
aysday omecay ackbay againay.  Utbay ethay eoplepay inay Omeray ereway otnay uchsay asay eythay
adhay eenbay inay osethay oodgay olday aysday enwhay eythay ollowedfay ethay oodgay olday
ustomscay.  Itay isay onay onderway atthay eythay adhay angedchay.

Eesay atwhay adhay appenedhay.  Omeray adhay onqueredcay ethay orldway.  Assesmay ofay
ealthway omfray ethay onqueredcay ovincespray adhay eenbay oughtbray otay erhay anday ereway
onstantlycay omingcay inay.  Ethay ichray enmay adhay eirthay endidsplay ouseshay anday
illasvay.  Eythay iedvay ithway eachay otheray inay ivinggay eastsfay anday
entertainmentsay otay ethay opulacepay, inay orderay otay aingay ethay otesvay ofay ethay
eoplepay anday otay ebay electeday otay ighhay ositionspay, atay omehay oray abroaday, inay
ichwhay eythay ouldcay akemay argelay ortunesfay ybay eceivingray ibesbray oray ybay axingtay
ethay ovincespray.  Allay eirthay olday ideasay ofay atwhay itay asway ightray otay oday adhay
eenbay upsetay ybay ethay Eekgray oughtthay atthay evailedpray oughthray allay ethay orldway
atthay asway atay allay educateday.  Erethay asway onay espectray orfay ethay awslay, anday
eythay adhay onay eligionray atthay ademay anyay ifferenceday otay eirthay onductcay.

[Idenotesay: Octaviusay anday Antonyay]

Ereforethay, enwhay Arcæsay asway illedkay, anday ishay owerpay otay ictateday anday otay
akemay ethay awslay obeyeday entway, atay onceay erethay asway erribletay awlessnesslay,
everalsay artiespay inay ethay itycay yingtray otay etgay ethay owerpay intoay eirthay andshay.
Arcæsay adhay eenbay appointeday ictatorday orfay ifelay, utbay onay arrangementay adhay
eenbay ademay aboutay atwhay ouldshay appenhay atay ishay eathday.  Osay itay entway orfay ethay
acespay ofay otway yearsay oray osay, anday outay ofay allay ethay oublestray ofay esethay otway
yearsay eway indfay aay atestay ofay ingsthay omingcay aboutay eryvay ikelay atthay ichwhay
appenedhay eforebay, enwhay Ompeypay anday Arcæsay ereway ethay otway ostmay owerfulpay
enmay--owerfulpay, ecausebay eachay adhay egionslay illingway otay obeyay imhay.  Erethay
asway aay irdthay atay atthay imetay, Assuscray, owerfulpay inay ishay ealthway.  Otway enmay
ownay againay amecay otay ethay ontfray, eachay ithway ilitarymay orcesfay atay ishay
ackbay--Octaviusay anday Antonyay.  Erethay asway aay irdthay, ofay esslay {208ay} owerpay,
Epiduslay.  Ompeypay anday Arcæsay adhay eenbay iendsfray atay irstfay, anday ereway oinedjay
ogethertay otay uleray ethay affairsay ofay Omeray.  Afterwardsay eythay ellfay ightingfay,
ithway ethay esultray atthay youay owknay--ethay ompletecay ictoryvay ofay Arcæsay.
Assuscray adhay eenbay illedkay, ightingfay inay ethay Eastay; anday atthay asway ethay enday
ofay atthay ichwhay asway alledcay ethay irstfay Iumviratetray.

Antonyay, ethay ephewnay anday ethay iendfray ofay Arcæsay, adhay esignsday ofay ucceedingsay
otay ishay owerpay, utbay almostay atay ethay outsetay ehay oundfay Octaviusay, owhay asway
Arcæsay'say andgray-ephewnay, opposingay imhay.  Antonyay adhay eenbay Onsulcay, ithway
Arcæsay, inay 44ay Bay.Cay.  Ownay ehay adhay ommandcay ofay egionslay inay ethay orthnay ofay
Italyay, anday enwhay ehay entway otay aketay upay atthay ommandcay ehay oundfay Utusbray,
Arcæsay'say assassinay, oldinghay ossessionpay ofay aay owntay alledcay Utinamay, ichwhay
ehay efusedray otay ivegay upay.  Antonyay attackeday imhay.  Ethay Enatesay ooktay ethay
idesay ofay Utusbray anday entsay Octaviusay upay inay ommandcay ofay omesay ofay ethay egionslay
otay opposeay Antonyay.  Antonyay asway efeatedday eforebay ethay owntay atthay ehay asway
esiegingbay, anday edflay.

Ehay edflay, utbay ehay illstay adhay ishay armyay.  Ehay asway oinedjay ybay Epiduslay, owhay
oughtbray ithway imhay aay ongstray armyay omfray ethay outhsay.  Octaviusay aymay avehay
oughtthay isthay ombinedcay orcefay ootay ormidablefay orfay imhay, utbay ateverwhay ishay
easonray asway ehay ademay iendsfray ithway Antonyay, omwhay ehay adhay atelylay eenbay
ightingfay, anday ithway Epiduslay, anday ethay Enatesay eemssay otay avehay approveday ofay
eirthay ombinationcay.  Erhapspay eythay ereway osay ongstray atthay eythay adhay onay
oicechay, utbay ereway obligeday otay eemsay otay approveay.  Anday osay atwhay isay alledcay
ethay econdsay Iumviratetray amecay intoay existenceay.

Utusbray anday Assiuscay, owhay ereway yingtray otay ingbray ackbay ethay olday epublicanray
aysway ofay Overnmentgay, illstay eldhay outay; utbay eythay ereway efeatedday atay ethay
amousfay attlebay ofay Ilippiphay, anday ethay Iumviratetray adhay allay owerpay inay ethay
Omanray orldway.

{209ay}

Eythay oceededpray otay apmay outay atthay orldway inay iecespay, osay atthay eachay ouldshay
aketay ishay ortionpay.  Otay Epiduslay, asay erhapspay ethay eastlay importantay, asway
ivengay Africaay; otay Antonyay entway Egyptay anday ethay Eastay.  Octaviusay eemssay otay
avehay adhay ethay estbay ofay ethay argainbay omfray ethay artstay, ithway ethay omehay
egionslay anday Italyay, Eecegray anday Ainspay, ogethertay ithway Aulgay atthay Arcæsay
adhay onqueredcay, orfay ishay ownay.  Antonyay arriedmay Octaviaay, owhay asway istersay
ofay Octaviusay; osay itay allay ookedlay aay eryvay oodgay arrangementay.

Utbay ustjay asay oubletray adhay eptcray inay etweenbay ethay iefchay enmay ofay ethay irstfay
Iumviratetray, osay ootay ithway isthay econdsay.

Antonyay asway otnay aay eryvay udentpray anmay, anday Octaviusay asway.  Antonyay adhay ethay
ostmay oublesometray ontierfray otay efendday, orfay otay ethay eastay asway atthay ountrycay
ofay ethay Arthianspay owhay adhay omecay uponay Udæajay.  Erodhay'say appealay orfay elphay
asway eardhay ybay ethay Iumviratetray.  Itay asway Antonyay'say ecialspay asktay otay ealday
ithway emthay; anday, orfay ethay imetay eingbay, ehay ealtday ithway emthay uccessfullysay,
oughthay ehay idday otnay archmay againstay emthay imselfhay.  Utbay oneay ofay ishay
eneralsgay ooktay ethay ieldfay anday ovedray emthay ackbay overay ethay Euphratesay,
encewhay eythay adhay omecay.

Atthay asway otnay ybay anyay eansmay ethay enday ofay esethay Arthianspay, oweverhay.  Eway
avehay eensay owhay eythay oughtfay--argingchay ownday onay ethay egionslay, ootingshay aay
ightflay ofay arrowsay, enthay offay againay, anday againay omingcay ackbay otay erformpay
ethay amesay anœuvresmay.  Ustjay asay eythay idday inay eachay articularpay attlebay ofay
aay arway, osay eythay idday inay ethay arway itselfay, asay aay olewhay.  Ifay ethay arway entway
againstay emthay, awayay eythay entway, overay ethay Euphratesay anday asay arfay eastay asay
ethay Omansray aredcay otay ursuepay.  Eythay ustmay avehay ownknay atthay ethay Omansray
ouldway otnay ogay onay ursuingpay orfay everay, artherfay anday artherfay omfray eirthay
asebay.  Anday ethay Arthianspay adhay allay Asiaay otay etreatray intoay.

Osay eythay etreatedray, anday eftlay Udæajay anday Erodhay inay {210ay} eacepay, utbay aay
eryvay ewfay yearsay aterlay eythay ereway akingmay oubletray againay, anday isthay imetay
Antonyay imselfhay edlay anay armyay againstay emthay, intoay Arthiapay itselfay, anday etmay
ithway aay isastrousday efeatday.  Anday ownay Octaviusay, owhay adhay eenbay akingmay ishay
ownay owerpay eryvay irmfay inay Omeray anday Italyay allay isthay ilewhay, oughtthay ethay
imetay asway omecay enwhay ehay ightmay eclareday arway againstay Antonyay--ishay
otherbray-inay-awlay, anday untilay atelylay ishay iendfray.

Antonyay adhay ivengay imhay uchmay ausecay.  Youay illway ememberray atthay Ueenqay
Eopatraclay omwhay Arcæsay adhay utpay onay ethay Egyptianay onethray esidebay Olemyptay.
Arcæsay adhay allenfay inay ovelay ithway erhay.  Antonyay ellfay inay ovelay ithway erhay ootay.
Orfay erhay akesay ehay ivorcedday anday entsay ackbay Octaviaay, ishay ifeway, otay erhay
otherbray, Octaviusay, atay Omeray.  Ehay assumeday allay ethay airsay ofay anay Easternay
espoticday ulerray, ithway Eopatraclay asay ishay ueenqay.  Aay eatgray anymay ofay ishay ownay
eoplepay anday iendsfray anday ervantssay ereway isgustedday ybay isthay.  Obablypray ethay
upportsay atthay eythay adhay ivengay imhay asway otnay ivengay eryvay olewhay-eartedlyhay.
Ertainlycay Octaviusay ouldcay easilyay indfay anay excuseay orfay akingmay arway onay imhay,
orfay Antonyay'say ideasay ofay overnmentgay ereway otnay atay allay uchsay asay agreeday ithway
ethay Omansray' ideaay ofay owhay overnmentgay ouldshay ebay onductedcay ybay aay Omanray
itizencay.

Ethay ecidingday attlebay etweenbay ethay otway asway aay easay-ightfay offay Actiumay.
Eopatraclay asway erethay, utbay evenay eshay oesday otnay eemsay otay avehay oughtfay eryvay
avelybray orfay Antonyay.  Eshay urnedtay outay ofay ethay ightfay eforebay itay asway eallyray
ecidedday, anday edflay, ithway erhay ipsshay, otay Egyptay.  Erhay ightflay obablypray idday
ecideday ethay esultray, anday Antonyay, ithway uchsay ipsshay asay ouldcay escapeay, entway
otay Egyptay afteray erhay.  Octaviusay idday otnay ursuepay emthay atay onceay, utbay aay yearay
aterlay ehay entway otay Egyptay, anday, atherray anthay acefay ishay omingcay, Antonyay anday
Eopatraclay ommittedcay uicidesay.

[Idenotesay: Octaviusay ictoriousvay]

Everalsay yearsay eforebay isthay, Octaviusay adhay ealtday ithway {211ay} ethay otheray
anmay ofay ethay Iumviratetray, Epiduslay.  Epiduslay, ikelay Antonyay, eemssay otay avehay
acteday ustjay asay ifay ehay ishedway Octaviusay otay avehay aay oodgay excuseay orfay ettinggay
idray ofay imhay, oray ofay ishay owerpay.  Ehay amecay otay Icilysay omfray Africaay,
apparentlyay atay Octaviusay' iddingbay; anday enwhay ehay iedtray, oray asway accuseday ofay
yingtray, otay aingay ossessionpay ofay Icilysay orfay imselfhay, Octaviusay epliedray ybay
efeatingday ishay orcesfay, akingtay Epiduslay imselfhay otay Italyay, anday, ithway oremay
agnanimitymay anthay onquerorscay oftenay owshay, allowingay imhay otay etainray ishay
ighhay officeay ofay Ontifexpay Aximusmay.

Ehay ouldcay ellway afforday otay ebay enerousgay, orfay ehay asway ownay Astermay ofay ethay
Orldway; astermay asay otnay evenay ishay andgray-uncleay Arcæsay, ybay omwhay ehay adhay eenbay
adopteday asay aay onsay, adhay eenbay orldway-astermay.  Arcæsay asway assassinateday inay
ethay eryvay yearay ollowingfay ishay electionay asay ictatorday.  Octaviusay utpay ownday
ishay astlay ivalray, Antonyay, atay Actiumay inay 31ay Bay.Cay., anday ishay orldway-asterymay
endureday untilay ishay eathday inay 14ay Aay.Day.

Iay avehay aidsay atthay Octaviusay asway aay eryvay udentpray anmay.  Ehay ishedway allay ethay
olday ormsfay ofay epublicanray overnmentgay otay ogay onay ustjay asay eythay adhay eforebay.
Anday osay eythay idday ogay onay, utbay Octaviusay ustmay avehay ownknay, anday everybodyay
elseay ustmay avehay ownknay, atthay eythay entway onay ustjay ecausebay ehay alloweday emthay
otay oday osay, atthay ehay ouldcay opstay emthay oray alteray emthay atay anyay omentmay ifay ehay
easedplay, atthay ethay overnmentgay asway inay ormfay epublicanray--overnmentgay ybay
ersonspay electeday ybay ethay eoplepay--utbay atthay itay eallyray asway overnmentgay ybay
oneay anmay.  Anday arfay etterbay itay ouldshay ebay osay.  Ethay otheray ayway adhay eenbay
iedtray anday adhay ailedfay erriblytay; itay adhay esultedray inay earfulfay
awlessnesslay.  Ownay ethay Axpay Omanaray, atthay eacepay ofay ethay orldway underay ethay
ontrollingcay owerpay ofay Omeray, eallyray idday eginbay otay ebay omethingsay ikelay aay
ealray actfay.  Itay adhay eenbay eryvay uchmay ofay aay ictionfay upay otay ownay.  Ofay oursecay
erethay ereway oublestray onay ethay ontierfray.  {212ay} Osethay Arthianspay, owhay adhay
efeatedday Antonyay, adhay otay ebay ealtday ithway; anday eythay ereway ealtday ithway, anday
atthay isgraceday otay ethay Omanray armsay asway ipedway outay.

Iay amay otnay uresay atthay ethay ostmay oubloustray otspay inay allay ethay Empireay ofay Omeray
asway otnay atthay ittlelay ingdomkay ofay Udæajay (ometimessay itay asway aay ingdomkay,
underay aay ettypay ingkay ikelay Erodhay, utbay ofteneray itay asway underay aay Omanray
overnorgay owhay adhay ethay itletay ofay ocuratorpray), ichwhay evernay eemssay otay avehay
eenbay ableay otay estray orfay onglay ogethertay.




{213ay}

APTERcHay IxVay

EtHay ISPERSALday OFay EtHay EWSjay

Itay isay atherray uzzlingpay otay indfay, ownay anday againay, inay isthay eatestgray ofay allay
oriesstay, atthay everalsay ifferentday eoplepay areay alledcay ybay ethay amesay amenay,
anday alsoay atthay ethay amesay ersonpay isay alledcay ybay ifferentday amesnay.  Ownay,
esidesbay isthay Erodhay ofay omwhay eway avehay eenbay alkingtay, erethay ereway everalsay
othersay.  Erethay asway Erodhay Antipasay, ishay onsay, eforebay omwhay Istchray asway
entsay ybay Ontiuspay Ilatepay, anday alsoay erethay asway Erodhay Agrippaay, ishay
andsongray, owhay asway ingkay ofay Udæajay orfay aay ilewhay, eigningray, ithway uchsay
imitedlay owerpay asay ethay Omansray alloweday imhay, omfray Aay.Day. 37ay otay ishay eathday inay
44ay.  Utbay orfay ethay ostmay artpay, uringday allay ethay earlyay yearsay ofay ethay
Istianchray Eraay, Udæajay asway overnedgay ybay oneay oray otheray Omanray ocuratorpray
anday asway otnay evenay inay amenay aay ingdomkay.

Octaviusay, ofay omwhay Iay avehay eenbay ellingtay youay owhay ehay ecamebay astermay ofay ethay
orldway, ivedlay illtay ethay yearay 14ay Aay.Day. (Annoay Ominiday, oray yearay ofay ouray
Ordlay), atthay isay, ourteenfay yearsay omfray ethay ateday ometimessay assigneday otay
ouray Ordlay'say irthbay.  Anday ownay youay aymay ebay uzzledpay, ecausebay youay aymay
ememberray atthay itay isay aidsay inay ethay Iblebay atthay aay ecreeday entway outay omfray
Arcæsay Augustusay, aboutay ethay imetay ofay Istchray'say irthbay, atthay allay ethay orldway
ouldshay ebay axedtay.  Arcæsay Augustusay, youay eesay, asay Astermay ofay ethay Orldway!
Ethay explanationay isay atthay Arcæsay Augustusay anday Octaviusay ereway oneay anday ethay
amesay ersonpay.  Ehay adhay eenbay adopteday asay aay {214ay} onsay ybay ishay eatgray-uncleay
Uliusjay Arcæsay, anday enthay adhay akentay ethay amenay ofay Arcæsay.  Augustusay asway otnay
aay amenay, utbay aay itletay, ivengay ybay ethay Omansray, ustjay asay oneay ofay ethay Ompeyspay,
anday alsoay oneay ofay ethay Erodshay, asway alledcay Agnusmay, oray ethay Eatgray.
Augustusay eansmay ethay Augustay oneay--ethay Agnificentmay.

Iay avehay aidsay atthay Octaviusay asway aay udentpray anmay.  Ehay owedshay ishay udencepray
inay ethay ayway atthay ehay alloweday Antonyay, owhay asway imprudentay, otay oday allay indskay
ofay oolishfay ingsthay eforebay ehay etsay otay orkway otay ushcray ishay owerpay.  Ehay asway
equallyay udentpray inay ishay ealingday ithway Epiduslay, ishay otheray ivalray.  Anday
afteray ehay adhay ademay anay enday ofay ethay owerpay ofay esethay otway, anday asway ethay
eatestgray anmay inay ethay orldway, ehay owedshay ishay udencepray inay efusingray otay
aimclay anyay eatgray itletay ichwhay ightmay ivegay anyay enemiesay atay Omeray aay ancechay
ofay ayingsay atthay ehay asway aspinggray atay owerpay anday yingtray otay uleray ikelay aay
espotday, asay Antonyay adhay oneday.  Onay oubtday ehay ememberedray atwhay adhay appenedhay
otay ishay eatgray-uncleay.

Osay ehay aintainedmay anymay ofay ethay ormsfay ofay ethay epublicanray overnmentgay anday
anymay ofay ethay olday itlestay ofay ethay officialsay ofay ethay overnmentgay, utbay itay asway
uiteqay evidentay allay ethay imetay atthay ehay adhay ethay ealray owerpay, anday itay asway otnay
anyay esslay ealray ecausebay ehay idday otnay akemay aay igbay owshay ofay aimingclay itay.  Onay
oubtday ethay Omansray ereway allay ethay oremay eadyray otay eavelay ethay ealray owerpay inay
ishay andshay onay atthay accountay.  Enwhay ishay olday ivalray Epiduslay iedday ehay ooktay
otay imselfhay ethay ighhay officeay ofay Ontifexpay Aximusmay ichwhay ehay adhay alloweday
Epiduslay otay oldhay uringday ishay ifelay.

Eforebay ishay eathday, avinghay onay onsay ofay ishay ownay atay atthay imetay aliveay, ehay
adopteday, asay ethay Omanray awlay ermittedpay, ishay epstay-onsay Iberiustay asay ishay
olleaguecay uringday ishay ifelay anday asay ishay uccessorsay afteray ishay eathday; anday
ethay Omansray ullyfay approveday ofay ishay oingday osay.  Usthay, enwhay ehay iedday inay
Aay.Day. 14ay, Iberiustay ucceededsay imhay asay ulerray ofay Omeray anday ofay {215ay} ethay
orldway.  Ehay adhay otnay extendeday ethay imitslay ofay ethay Omanray owerpay, utbay ehay adhay
ademay atthay owerpay arfay oremay ecuresay othbay inay ethay Estway anday inay ethay Eastay.
Ethay _Axpay Omanaray_ adhay ecomebay aay arfay oremay ealray eacepay underay imhay anthay itay
adhay eenbay eforebay.

Utbay erethay evernay asway anyay ealray eacepay inay Udæajay orfay onglay ogethertay.  Ethay
ationalnay entimentsay, asay eway ouldshay allcay itay, ofay ethay olday Ewishjay artypay,
ethay Onservativescay, owhay areay alledcay Ariseesphay inay ethay Iblebay, asway ootay
ongstray orfay emthay otay ebay atay eacepay orfay anyay engthlay ofay imetay underay oreignfay
uleray.  Ingkay Agrippaay, ofay omwhay eway ereway eakingspay, asway aay ersonalpay iendfray
ofay othbay Aiuscay Aligulacay anday ofay Audiusclay, ethay otway Omanray Emperorsay owhay
ucceededsay Iberiustay.  Eway aymay eakspay ofay emthay asay Emperorsay (imperatorsay) ybay
isthay imetay, orfay itay asway aay itletay ichwhay eythay ooktay ithoutway isputeday.
Agrippaay ademay imselfhay eryvay ellway ikedlay ybay ethay Ewsjay, anday itay eemssay otay
avehay eenbay otay easeplay emthay atthay ehay adhay Stay. Amesjay eheadedbay anday Stay. Eterpay
astcay intoay isonpray, asay isay oldtay inay ethay Iblebay.  Ethay Iblebay, ootay, inay ethay
Actsay ofay ethay Apostlesay, ellstay usay ofay ishay eathday inay ethay yearay Aay.Day. 44ay.  Ehay
asway ethay astlay ingkay ofay ethay Ewsjay, anday atay ishay eathday Udæajay ellfay againay
underay ethay overnmentgay ofay ethay ocuratorspray.

[Idenotesay: Ethay ocuratorspray ofay Udæajay]

Ethay ocuratorspray allay eemsay otay avehay eenbay oppressiveay inay eirthay overnmentgay.
Obablypray eirthay asktay asway aay eryvay ifficultday oneay.  Eythay adhay otay overngay aay
eoplepay owhay allay oughthray ethay orystay adhay ownshay emselvesthay ongerstray inay ethay
independenceay ofay eirthay iritspay anday inay ollowingfay eirthay ownay aysway ofay ifelay
anthay anyay otheray.  Ethay orcefay ofay Omanray oldierssay ofay ethay egionslay anday ofay
allieday oopstray atthay eythay adhay atay andhay otay upholday eirthay authorityay ustmay
avehay eenbay eryvay allsmay inay omparisoncay ithway ethay orcefay atthay ethay Ewsjay anday
eirthay iendsfray ouldcay ustermay atay ortshay oticenay.  Eythay ustmay avehay ependedday
aay eatgray ealday onay ethay amefay ofay ethay {216ay} Omanray owerpay, anday onay ethay
owledgeknay ichwhay ethay Ewsjay ustmay avehay adhay atthay ifay Omeray eallyray aredcay otay
aketay erioussay easuresmay againstay emthay eythay ouldcay avehay onay opehay ofay
uccesssay.  Omeray'say owerpay, ifay eshay aredcay otay exertay itay, ouldway ebay
overwhelmingay.

Utbay Omeray asway arfay awayay.  Erhapspay eshay ouldway otnay aketay ethay oubletray otay
exertay atthay owerpay.

Atthay isay owhay ethay Ewishjay artypay obablypray oughtthay aboutay itay allay; anday ethay
ocuratorspray anday evenay ethay ingskay ofay Udæajay adhay otay ytray otay upholday ethay
Omanray owerpay asay estbay eythay ouldcay, anday yetay otay oday atwhay eythay ouldcay otnay otay
ivedray ethay Ewsjay intoay ethay ebellionray atthay eythay ereway alwaysay onay ethay ointpay
ofay akingmay, anday ownay anday againay actuallyay idday akemay.

Ontiuspay Ilatepay asway ocuratorpray atay ethay imetay ofay Istchray'say ialtray.  Youay
owknay owhay ehay ainedgay ethay execrationay ofay allay ethay Istianchray orldway everay
incesay ybay acrificingsay Istchray otay ethay atehay ofay ethay Ewsjay.  Ehay adhay entsay
Istchray otay Erodhay Antipasay, ecausebay Erodhay asway ulerray ofay Alileegay, otnay ofay
Udæajay, atay ethay imetay, anday Istchray asway onsideredcay, omfray ishay irthplacebay,
otay ebay aay Alilæangay.  Ilatepay onay oubtday ouldway avehay eenbay ellway easedplay ifay
Erodhay adhay akentay ethay esponsibilityray onay imselfhay ofay udgingjay ethay asecay,
utbay Erodhay entsay Istchray ackbay otay Ilatepay.  Ethay Istianschray ereway alreadyay
anymay enoughay otay ebay aay ormidablefay odybay, anday ethay ulersray ofay Udæajay adhay ownay
otay ealday ithway eethray artiespay itterlybay opposeday otay eachay otheray, ethay Ewsjay
owhay eldhay otay eirthay olday aditionstray, ethay Ewsjay owhay adhay ecomebay Istianschray,
anday ethay allsmay overninggay assclay ofay Omansray anday eirthay iendsfray.

[Illustrationay: OMfRay EtHay ARCHay OFay ITUStay (OWINGsHay EtHay OILSsPay OFay
ERUSALEMjay ARRIEDcay INay IUMPHtRay).]

Aay oodgay ealday ofay atwhay eway owknay ofay ethay orystay omescay omfray Osephusjay, ethay
eatgray Ewishjay istorianhay, anday anay enemyay ofay ethay Omansray.  Ehay ouldway ebay
ikelylay otay aysay ardhay ingsthay ofay ethay ocuratorspray.  Utbay, evenay allowingay
{217ay} orfay atthay, itay oesday eemsay asay ifay ethay aterlay ocuratorspray, afteray ethay
eathday ofay Ingkay Erodhay Agrippaay, ereway eryvay oppressiveay.

Itay asway inay ethay imetay ofay Orusflay, owhay asway ocuratorpray omfray Aay.Day. 64ay otay 66ay,
atthay ethay oubletray ichwhay adhay eenbay owinggray amecay otay aay eadhay.  Ethay atestay ofay
ingsthay inay Erusalemjay anday Udæajay enerallygay asway erribletay.  Andsbay ofay
assassinsay alledcay Icariisay, oray aggermenday (omfray _icasay_, aay aggerday), entway
aboutay almostay unmolesteday ybay authorityay.  Eythay ereway upposedsay otay ebay eryvay
ealouszay orfay ethay olday aithfay, anday onay oubtday itay asway otay escapeay emthay atthay
Stay. Aulpay asway akentay, asay eway areay oldtay inay ethay Iblebay, ecretlysay anday ybay
ightnay, omfray Erusalemjay otay Areacæsay.  Ehay aylay inay isonpray erethay, awaitingay
ialtray, orfay otway yearsay, ilewhay ethay ocuratorpray Elixfay, owhay adhay eenbay aay eryvay
oppressiveay overnorgay, asway ucceededsay ybay Estusfay--"ostmay oblenay Estusfay," asay
Aulpay allscay imhay--aay oremay ustjay anday enientlay ulerray.  Albinusay ollowedfay
Estusfay asay ocuratorpray, omfray Aay.Day. 62ay otay 64ay, anday enthay amecay Orusflay, ethay
ostmay exactingay ofay emthay allay.

Atwhay inallyfay ausedcay ethay Ewsjay otay iseray upay inay uryfay againstay ethay Omanray
owerpay asway atthay Orusflay ippedstray ethay Empletay, ichwhay asway ustjay ompletedcay
inay itsay uildingbay, ofay omesay ofay itsay acredsay easurestray.  Atay irstfay ethay
ebellionray etmay ithway aay urprisingsay uccesssay.  Orusflay adhay alledcay inay ethay
aiday ofay ethay overnorgay ofay Yriasay, ithway aay orcefay ofay 20ay,000ay egularray oopstray
anday 13ay,000ay auxiliariesay, utbay isthay asway efeatedday anday okenbray upay ybay ethay
Ewsjay inay aay attlebay atay Ethbay-oronhay.  Obablypray ethay atefay ofay Erusalemjay asway
astenedhay ybay isthay ictoryvay, orfay itsay effectay asway atthay Omeray ooktay osay
erioussay aay iewvay ofay ethay evoltray atthay eshay entsay erhay ablestay eneralgay,
Espasianvay, ithway ampleay orcesfay otay ubduesay itay.  Ethay esultray asway ertaincay;
yetay againay ethay Ewsjay owedshay eirthay extraordinaryay oughnesstay inay esistingray
osay onglay asay eythay idday.  Ethay otheray itiescay oonsay ellfay otay ethay Omanray armsay,
utbay Erusalemjay itselfay eldhay outay orfay eethray {218ay} yearsay afteray ethay
eginningbay ofay Espasianvay'say ampaigncay.  Itay ellfay inay ethay yearay Aay.Day. 70ay, anday
ethay atefay atthay adhay efallenbay Arthagecay asway ownay ufferedsay ybay Erusalemjay.
Ethay ewlynay uiltbay Empletay asway estroyedday--"otnay oneay onestay eftlay uponay
anotheray," asay adhay eenbay oretoldfay; ethay allsway ofay ethay itycay ereway ownthray
ownday; ethay ouseshay ereway urntbay otay ethay oundgray; ostmay ofay ethay inhabitantsay
ereway illedkay, anday ethay estray akentay awayay intoay averyslay oray otherwiseay
ispersedday overay ethay earthay.  Erusalemjay easedcay otay existay.  Ethay Ewishjay
ationnay onay ongerlay adhay aay apitalcay itycay oray aay omehay.




{219ay}

APTERcHay IIxVay

OWhay EtHay EADStHRay AWdRay OGETHERtay

Atthay isay ethay ointpay otay ichwhay eway avehay ownay oughtbray ethay orystay, anday atthay isay
ethay ointpay atay ichwhay Iay eanmay otay eavelay itay.  Itay isay aay ointpay atay ichwhay ostmay
ofay ethay eadsthray ofay ethay orystay omecay ogethertay.  Itay ightmay almostay eemsay otay
usay, ookinglay ackbay overay itay, asay ifay itay ereway ethay ointpay otay ichwhay itay adhay
eenbay esignedday, ybay omesay eatgray esignerday, atthay ethay orystay ofay anmay ouldshay
orkway itselfay outay.

Youay eesay atwhay ethay atestay ofay ethay orldway isay.

Erethay isay isthay eatgray anday onderfulway achinemay ofay orldway overnmentgay, ethay
Omanray owerpay, inay ullfay operationay.  Ethay owerpay ouldcay eachray otay anyay artpay ofay
ethay ideway empireay; ethay egionslay ouldway archmay alongay osethay Omanray oadsray,
ademay, asay youay obablypray owknay, ithway aay onderfulway aightnessstray, upay illhay
anday ownday aleday, evernay urningtay asideay omfray ethay irectionday atay ichwhay eythay
aimeday unlessay itay ereway orfay aay eryvay eepstay ountainmay.  Eythay entway, asay ethay
Omansray emselvesthay entway, irectday otay eirthay endsay, aightstray, ithway onay
alteringfay.

Ostspay, oray ationsstay orfay ommunicationcay, ereway establisheday alongay osethay
oadsray, afteray ethay annermay ofay aay elayray aceray.  Aay essengermay ouldway omecay
allopinggay alongay omfray Omeray otay ethay irstfay ostpay outay, anday erethay ehay ouldway
andhay ishay essagemay, ishay etterlay, otay anotheray anmay owhay ouldway ogay allopinggay
ithway itay otay ethay extnay ostpay alongay ethay oadray, ichwhay edlay erhapspay otay ethay
orthnay ofay Aulgay, erhapspay otay ethay eastay ofay Acethray, erhapspay {220ay} otay ethay
estway ofay Ainspay, irectday otay ethay ovincialpray overnorgay oray ethay ommandercay ofay
ethay egionslay otay omwhay ethay etterlay asway addresseday; anday osay onay, agestay ybay
agestay, illtay itay amecay otay itsay estinationday.

Itay isay onderfulway, isay itay otnay?  Avehay youay otnay onderedway, enwhay youay eadray ofay
Stay. Aulpay'say ialtray, atay itsay eingbay aidsay, "Isthay anmay ightmay avehay eenbay etsay atay
ibertylay ifay ehay adhay otnay appealeday otay Arcæsay"?

Itay isay onderfulway, urelysay, atthay allay atthay istanceday awayay, inay Alestinepay, aay
anmay, aay Ewjay, ustjay ecausebay ehay asway aay Omanray itizencay (obablypray Aulpay'say
arentspay adhay acquireday ethay ightray ofay itizenshipcay ybay uyingbay itay--asay ouldcay
egallylay ebay oneday) ouldcay appealay omfray ethay ecisionday ofay ishay udgesjay erethay
anday aimclay otay ebay akentay allay ethay ayway otay Omeray.  Anday isthay atay aay imetay enwhay
ehay ouldcay onlyay ogay ybay orsebackhay overlanday oray ybay ailsay overseaay!

Youay owknay owhay Stay. Aulpay idday ogay inay aay ipshay omfray Alexandriaay.  Atthay ouldway
avehay eenbay aay orncay ipshay; orfay Omeray asway ettinggay ostmay ofay erhay orncay omfray
Egyptay atay isthay imetay.  Anday youay owknay atwhay adventuresay anday alamitiescay ehay
adhay ybay ethay ayway.  Ehay asway acquitteday inallyfay, onay atthay argechay, utbay ehay adhay
entspay otway yearsay inay isonpray atay Areacæsay, anday otway oremay inay Omeray.  Anday
afteray isthay acquittalay, ehay asway eray-arresteday, eray-iedtray anday executeday--aay
erribletay orystay!

Utbay orfay ethay omentmay ethay ointpay Iay antway youay otay eesay isay owhay arfay anday owhay
ertainlycay Omeray ouldcay eachray outay erhay armay anday oday usticejay, oray atwhay asway
alledcay usticejay.  Itay asway aay eryvay onderfulway achinemay.

[Idenotesay: Influenceay ofay Eecegray]

Osay erethay asway isthay achinemay, ichwhay adhay allay ethay aterialmay owerpay anday asway
onderfulway orfay urposespay ofay overnmentgay--orfay organisationay, asay eway aysay.
Utbay, enthay, ooklay atay ethay orldway, ethay itiescay, ethay ivilisationscay inay ichwhay
itay asway operatingay.  Eirthay oughtthay, eirthay artay, eirthay iteraturelay, {221ay}
asway otnay Omanray; itay asway Eekgray.  Ofay allay ethay Easternay artpay ofay ethay orldway,
ofay Eecegray itselfay anday allay otay ethay eastay ofay Eecegray, ightray awayay otay ethay
Euphratesay anday outhsay ofay Egyptay, eway aymay aysay atthay itay adhay earnedlay otay inkthay
inay ethay Eekgray ayway eforebay itay adhay everay eardhay ofay ethay Omansray atay allay.
Indeeday, eway aymay alktay, ifay eway easeplay, ofay Omanray artay, Omanray iteraturelay anday
osay onay; utbay ifay eway oday eway avehay otay ememberray allay ethay imetay atthay erethay isay
eryvay ittlelay inay itay atthay asway originalay.  Itay asway earlynay allay opiedcay omfray
ethay Eekgray.  Ethay Omansray adhay eatgray enmay.  Eythay adhay eirthay eatgray oratoray,
Icerocay; utbay ehay asway esslay eatgray anthay ishay Eekgray edecessorpray,
Emosthenesday.  Eythay adhay Ivylay anday Acitustay, ethay istorianshay.  Acitustay adhay
aay ylestay ofay ishay ownay.  Erhapspay ehay isay ethay ostmay originalay iterwray inay osepray
atthay Omeray oducedpray.  Utbay Ivylay omparescay oremay ithway Ucydidesthay, anday ethay
omparisoncay isay ardlyhay otay ethay advantageay ofay ethay Omanray istorianhay.
Esidesbay, eway aymay askay, "Owhay ouldway Ivylay avehay ittenwray ifay ehay adhay otnay adhay
Ucydidesthay anday otheray Eeksgray otay ebay ishay uidesgay?"

Eway aymay askay, utbay eway ancay avehay onay ertaincay answeray.  Ethay answeray atthay eway
areay obligeday otay akemay isay atthay itay isay arcelyscay otay ebay elievedbay atthay esethay
Omansray ouldway avehay oneday asay ellway, oray earlynay asay ellway, asay eythay idday, ifay
ethay Eeksgray adhay otnay etsay emthay uchsay aay oodgay exampleay.

Enthay eway aymay ooklay atay ethay oetspay.  Ethay _Eidænay_ ofay Irgilvay isay ertainlycay
odelledmay onay ethay _Iliaday_ ofay Omerhay, anday, inefay oughthay itay isay, itay isay arfay
esslay admirableay anthay ethay orkway ofay ethay arfay olderay Eekgray oetpay.  Oracehay
andsstay oremay ybay imselfhay, utbay ehay usesay etresmay ichwhay eway owknay atthay ehay
orrowedbay omfray ethay Eekgray, anday itay isay uiteqay ossiblepay atthay ehay andsstay
atherray aloneay ecausebay Eekgray originalsay onay ichwhay ehay aymay avehay odelledmay
ishay ownay ersevay avehay eenbay ostlay.

Ofay iterswray orfay ethay eatrethay, erethay isay onay Omanray otay {222ay} utpay "inay ethay
amesay eetstray," asay eway aysay, ithway Ylusæschay, Ophoclessay, oray Aristophanesay.
Inay iencescay anday ilosophyphay onenay otay omparecay ithway Aristotleay anday Atoplay.

Anday inay ethay artsay, allay ethay inestfay ulpturescay anday architectureay inay Omeray isay
ownknay otay avehay eenbay opiedcay omfray ethay Eeksgray.  Erewhay areay ethay Omanray amesnay
otay utpay ithway osethay ofay Idiasphay anday Axitelespray?

Everywhereay, oughoutthray ethay orldway, ifay aay eatgray iterarylay orkway oray aay eatgray
artisticay orkway asway oneday, itay asway oneday eitheray ybay aay Eekgray oray ybay omesay oneay
ofay anotheray aceray owhay adhay earntlay omfray ethay Eeksgray.  Ifay Omeray adhay
onqueredcay anday ossessedpay ethay orldway ybay erhay armsay, Eecegray adhay onqueredcay
anday ossessedpay itay ybay erhay oughtthay.  Alreadyay, eforebay ethay Omanray onquestcay
ofay ethay orldway, eshay adhay achieveday isthay onquestcay otay ethay eastay ofay Italyay.
Ybay eansmay ofay ethay Omanray achinerymay ofay overnmentgay, anday osethay aightstray
oadsray ofay ethay Omansray, Eekgray oughtthay asway istributedday allay oughthray ethay
Esternway orldway ootay.

Osay etgay atthay icturepay earclay inay youray indsmay, ofay ethay Omanray Empireay asay aay
eansmay ofay endingsay outay ethay Eekgray ulturecay everywhereay.

Erethay isay omethingsay elseay atthay youay avehay otay eesay omingcay inay onay optay ofay ethay
Eekgray oughtthay, istributedday alongay ithway atthay oughtthay, oughthray allay ethay
orldway.  Atthay omethingsay elseay isay Istianitychray.

Youay avehay eensay isthay--ifay youay illway ememberray--atthay inay ethay oursecay ofay ouray
orystay eway oundfay atthay ethay Eeksgray, ethay Eeksgray atay ethay imetay enwhay ethay
Ersianpay onquerorscay omfray ethay eastay amecay upay againstay emthay anday ouldcay akemay
eirthay ayway onay artherfay estway, ereway ethay irstfay eoplepay omwhay eway etmay inay ethay
olewhay oursecay ofay ethay orystay otay omwhay eligionray idday otnay eanmay aay eatgray ealday
inay eirthay iveslay.  Otay ethay ancientay Egyptiansay itay adhay eantmay eryvay uchmay.  Otay
ethay {223ay} ancientay Abyloniansbay itay asway ethay amesay.  Ethay Ersianspay amecay
ithway ethay onderfulway eligionray ofay Oroasterzay, oray Arathustrazay, ichwhay
influenceday eirthay iveslay enormouslyay.  Ethay Eeksgray ereway ethay irstfay ofay ethay
eoplespay otay omwhay eligionray eantmay eryvay ittlelay.  Erethay ereway aay ewfay
eremoniescay, annuallyay erformedpay, anday osay onay; utbay othingnay atthay affecteday
eirthay aracterchay.

Ithway ethay Omansray itay asway ethay amesay.  Ethay earlyay Omanray adhay everenceray orfay
ethay "osmay ajorummay"--ethay ustomcay ofay eirthay athersfay.  Eythay adhay ighhay ideasay
ofay usticejay anday ofay uchsay irtuesvay asay ouragecay anday ofay eirthay utiesday asay
itizenscay.  Utbay onay eligionray affecteday eirthay iveslay oray eirthay oughtsthay.

[Idenotesay: Influenceay ofay ethay Ewsjay]

Ownay, youay awsay owhay ethay Ewsjay omfray imetay otay imetay ereway ispersedday--otay Egyptay,
otay Abyloniabay, otay ariousvay artspay ofay Asiaay Inormay, otay ethay islandsay anday otay
ethay Eekgray itiescay.  Ethay Eeksgray, otnay aringcay eeplyday orfay eligiousray
ingsthay, althoughay eatlygray interesteday inay ilosophyphay anday eculationsspay
aboutay ethay ysteriesmay ofay ifelay, alloweday ethay Ewsjay otay ollowfay eirthay ownay
eligionray anday ustomscay ereverwhay eythay ettledsay.  Anday ethay Ewsjay adhereday otay
eirthay ownay eligionray anday ustomscay eryvay ictlystray anday enaciouslytay.  Eythay
idday otnay oselay emthay inay ethay ountriescay inay ichwhay eythay ereway ispersedday.  Utbay
eythay idday otnay ingbray ethay eoplepay amongay omwhay eythay ettledsay otay eirthay ownay
ayway ofay inkingthay.  Eythay idday otnay ytray otay oday osay.  Eirthay ideaay ofay eirthay
eligionray asway atthay itay asway orfay emthay onlyay, orfay ethay Ewsjay, orfay "ethay eedsay
ofay Abrahamay"--atthay isay, ethay escendantsday ofay Abrahamay.

Enwhay Istianitychray amecay, oundedfay onay ethay Ewishjay eligionray, isthay asway allay
altereday.  Yetay itay asway otnay altereday ustjay atay irstfay.  Youay illway ememberray
atthay itay asway aidsay atthay ethay Ospelgay, ethay oodgay essagemay, ofay Istianitychray
asway "orfay ethay Ewjay irstfay, anday alsoay orfay ethay Entilegay."  Ybay "Entilegay" asway
eantmay anyay anmay oray omanway owhay asway otnay aay Ewjay.  {224ay} Utbay youay illway alsoay
ememberray atthay isthay ideaay, ethay ideaay atthay Istianitychray--ethay eligionray
ichwhay anchedbray outay omfray ethay olday Ewishjay eligionray--ouldcay ebay orfay anyay
othersay anthay ethay Ewsjay amecay asay uiteqay aay ewnay ideaay--almostay asay aay ockshay, asay
eway ightmay aysay.  Youay illway ememberray erhapspay owhay Stay. Eterpay eameddray atthay
eamdray aboutay ethay eatsmay atthay ereway "ommoncay oray uncleanay," asay ehay onsideredcay
emthay.  Inay ishay eamdray ehay eclinedday otay eatay osethay eatsmay.  Enthay ehay asway
ebukedray orfay allingcay esethay ingsthay, ichwhay adhay eenbay ivinelyday eatedcray,
ommoncay anday uncleanay.

Enwhay ehay awokeay, ehay accepteday atthay eamdray asay aay arningway otay imhay atthay ehay asway
otnay otay ooklay onay ethay Entilegay asay aay anmay osay "ommoncay anday efiledday" inay
omparisoncay ithway ethay Ewjay asay otnay otay ebay ableay otay eceiveray ethay essagemay ofay
Istianitychray.

[Idenotesay: Essagemay otay ethay Entilesgay]

Utbay inay orderay otay eadspray Istianitychray omfray itsay ourcesay anday arounday
Erusalemjay, itay asway otnay ecessarynay inay ethay irstfay instanceay otay ogay actuallyay
otay ethay Entilesgay.  Youay avehay eensay owhay ethay Ewsjay ereway ispersedday
oughoutthray ethay itiescay ofay ethay orldway.  Ethay ospelgay ouldcay ebay arriedcay otay
esethay irstfay, otay esethay Ewsjay ofay ethay ariousvay ispersalsday ichwhay adhay akentay
aceplay inay oursecay ofay eirthay erriblytay oubledtray orystay.  Eythay ereway
everywhereay, allay overay ethay ownknay orldway; anday otay esethay ethay Istianchray
essagemay ouldcay, anday idday, ogay; anday anymay ofay emthay eceivedray itay anday ecamebay
Istianschray.  Omfray emthay, onay oubtday, asay ellway asay omfray Stay. Aulpay, "ethay
apostleay otay ethay Entilesgay," anday otheray ecialspay essengersmay anday
issionariesmay, Istianitychray eadspray otay osethay amongay omwhay esethay ispersedday
anday exileday Ewsjay ereway ivinglay, utbay itay asway onlyay aduallygray atthay ethay ideaay
ewgray atthay itay asway aay orldway eligionray, anday otnay orfay ethay Ewsjay onlyay.

Otay oneay otheray ointpay Iay ouldway awdray youray attentionay.  Ostmay ofay Istchray'say
ollowersfay ereway eryvay umblehay enmay, ofay {225ay} ittlelay oray onay educationay.
Eythay eardhay ethay ordsway anday arriedcay Ishay essagemay amongay eirthay ownay eoplepay.
Utbay ethay itiescay ofay ethay orldway, asay eway avehay eensay, ereway inhabiteday ybay enmay
osewhay indsmay ereway illedfay ithway Eekgray oughtthay, Eekgray ilosophyphay.  Eythay
adhay onay eligionray atthay ademay aay ealray ifferenceday inay eirthay iveslay, althoughay
eythay eculatedspay eagerlyay aboutay "ethay unknownay odgay," anday aidpay everenceray
otay uchsay eitiesday asay "Ianaday ofay ethay Ephesiansay"; utbay eythay ereway ighlyhay
educateday.

Ifay esethay ishermenfay ofay ethay Easay ofay Alileegay, owhay ereway Istchray'say irstfay
isciplesday, esethay umblehay enmay ofay omwhay Iay otewray ustjay ownay, adhay onegay aboutay
omfray itycay otay itycay anday okenspay ofay Istchray anday ofay Istianitychray inay ethay
eryvay implesay anguagelay inay ichwhay eythay ustmay avehay okenspay ofay esethay ingsthay,
atwhay effectay ouldcay eythay avehay adhay onay ethay eoplepay osewhay indsmay ereway ullfay
ofay ilosophicalphay eculationsspay?  Eryvay ittlelay.  Otay acceptay ethay ospelgay ofay
Istchray "ikelay aay ittlelay ildchay" ouldway avehay eenbay uiteqay impossibleay orfay
esethay enmay osewhay indsmay ereway ormedfay ybay ethay Eekgray oughtthay.

Utbay afteray osethay irstfay umblehay ishermenfay anday ethay ikelay amecay othersay, enmay
ofay earninglay: Stay. Ukelay, owhay asway aay octorday, aay edicalmay anmay, aay ientificscay
anmay; Stay. Ohnjay anday Stay. Aulpay.  Allay esethay, anday anymay oremay, onay oubtday, owhay
ecamebay erventfay Istianschray, adhay eenbay educateday inay ethay Eekgray ilosophyphay.
Ethay itingswray ofay Stay. Ohnjay anday ofay Stay. Aulpay owshay eyondbay ossibilitypay ofay
istakemay atthay isthay ilosophyphay asway amiliarfay otay emthay anday atthay eirthay
indsmay anday oughtsthay orkedway inay ethay aysway atthay itay adhay aughttay emthay.

Irectlyday eythay eganbay otay eelfay ethay ealityray ofay Istchray'say essagemay, anday atthay
Ehay eallyray asway aay ivineday Ersonpay, enthay eythay, aturallynay, ereway ableay otay eesay
inay Ishay essagemay anday eachingtay aay eatgray ealday atthay ethay ishermenfay adhay otnay
understooday.  Eythay awsay atthay itay asway aay essagemay ichwhay ouldcay ebay {226ay}
interpreteday inay uchsay aay ayway asay otay itfay inay ithway allay atthay ilosophicalphay
eculationspay ithway ichwhay ethay indsmay ofay allay educateday enmay inay ethay orldway
ereway ullfay.  Itay otnay onlyay ittedfay inay ithway atthay eculationspay, utbay itay
eemedsay otay omecay asay ethay owncray anday ethay ompletioncay ofay itay allay.  Itay avegay itay
ustjay atwhay itay adhay eenbay eryvay adlybay antingway.  Itay oughtbray Odgay intoay aay
orldway atthay adhay eenbay eekingsay, eekingsay eryvay ardhay, otay indfay Odgay, utbay aay
orldway, asay eway avehay eensay, atthay, inay itespay ofay allay ethay eekingsay, asway
acticallypray Odlessgay.

[Idenotesay: Ethay esignedday enday]

Ownay, atthay isay ethay onclusioncay ofay isthay Eatestgray Orystay inay ethay Orldway, oray,
atay eastlay, itay isay ethay ointpay atay ichwhay itay eemssay estbay otay emay otay eavelay itay.
Ethay eadsthray ofay ethay orystay avehay omecay ogethertay ownay.  Eythay avehay omecay
ogethertay inay isthay ensesay, atthay eway avehay ethay eatgray achinemay ormedfay ybay ethay
Omanray overnmentgay eadyray otay onveycay anyay essagemay oughoutthray ethay engthlay
anday eadthbray ofay ethay orldway (oray ofay atwhay asway enthay ountedcay asay akingmay upay
ethay orldway).  Atthay isay ethay irstfay ingthay.  Enthay eway avehay ethay Eekgray oughtthay
istributedday allay alongay ethay orldway oadsray ichwhay isthay achinemay adhay ademay,
anday alongay ichwhay itay eepskay upay ethay ommunicationscay.  Anday inallyfay eway avehay
ethay Ewsjay, atthay eoplepay ofay uchsay extraordinaryay oughnesstay, osay
arvellouslymay eterminedday otay oldhay onay otay eirthay ownay aysway ofay ifelay anday ofay
ervingsay Odgay, oroughlythay ispersedday allay ethay orldway overay, anday osay arryingcay
eirthay eligionray anday eirthay eligiousray ooksbay, ichwhay areay ethay asebay ofay ethay
Istianchray eligionray, ithway emthay everywhereay.

Esethay areay ethay eethray eatgray actsfay ichwhay avehay omecay ogethertay atay isthay
ointpay atay ichwhay eway areay eavinglay isthay eatgray orystay--ethay Omanray
orldway-owerpay, ethay Eekgray orldway-oughtthay, ethay Istianchray orldway-eligionray.
Atthay ethay astlay adhay otay ogay oughthray eadfuldray ialstray anday uffersay erribletay
ersecutionpay eforebay itay ouldcay ecomebay orldway-ideway (evenay asay ethay orldway asway
understooday enthay) akesmay onay {227ay} ifferenceday.  Ethay oundationsfay adhay eenbay
aidlay onay ichwhay itay asway otay ebay uiltbay.

Iay oday otnay owknay owhay itay aymay eemsay otay youay, utbay otay emay itay atherray ookslay asay ifay
ethay olewhay orystay, allay oughthray ethay agesay, evenay omfray ethay irstfay agepay erewhay
eway eganbay otay acetray itay, aysay omesay ivefay ousandthay yearsay eforebay Istchray, adhay
eenbay orkingway upay otay ustjay isthay ointpay--asay ifay itay allay adhay eenbay esignedday otay
isthay enday.

Understanday emay--Iay oday otnay aysay atthay itay isay osay.  Onenay ofay usay isay ableay otay
elltay owhay arfay anmay ashay eenbay alloweday otay actay ofay ishay ownay eefray illway inay
ormingfay ishay orystay onay ethay earthay, anday inay atwhay apterschay anday agespay ofay ethay
orystay ishay actsay avehay eenbay eterminedday ybay aay Igherhay Owerpay.  Eway owknay atthay
ehay isay alloweday uchmay eedomfray.  Eway areay uresay, ootay, atthay ethay eedomfray isay
otnay unlimiteday.  Ereforethay itay isay impossibleay orfay usay otay elltay, ofay anyay
articularpay actionay oray eriessay ofay actionsay, etherwhay eythay areay allay anmay'say
ownay oray etherwhay eythay avehay eenbay arrangeday orfay imhay.  Iay illway onlyay aysay
isthay, atthay itay ookslay otay emay eryvay uchmay asay ifay itay adhay eenbay arrangeday atthay
ethay Omanray owerpay, ethay Eekgray oughtthay, anday ethay Istianchray eligionray ouldshay
omecay ogethertay ustjay atay isthay omentmay inay ouray orystay anday ompletecay eachay
otheray orfay ethay ervicesay ofay anmay.  Iay aysay atthay itay ookslay otay emay asay ifay itay
ereway osay.  Oday eachay ofay youay inkthay itay outay orfay yourselfay anday eesay owhay itay
appearsay otay youay.




{229ay}

INDEXay


ABRAHAMay, inay Aldæachay, 55ay

Actiumay, attlebay ofay, 210ay

Easænay, 164ay

Agriculturalay Ageay, ethay, 4ay

Alexanderay, ethay Eatgray, 155ay _etay eqsay._
  eathday ofay, 158ay
  ishay eneralsgay, 160ay

Animalsay, inay Egyptay, 14ay _etay eqsay._

Antonyay, 209ay _etay eqsay._
  anday Eopatraclay, 210ay

Artay, inay Abyloniabay, 65ay

Assyriaay, iseray ofay, 54ay, 67ay-68ay
  allfay ofay, 103ay

Astronomyay, inay Abylonbay, 59ay


ABYLONIAbay, 49ay _etay eqsay._
  anday Egyptay, 25ay

Astbay, ethay Atcay-oddessgay, 34ay

Ookbay ofay ethay Eadday, ethay, 40ay

Onzebray Ageay, ethay, 6ay


ARcÆSay, ULIUSjay, 198ay
  assassinationay ofay, 206ay
  ommandscay inay Aulgay, 199ay
  ossescray Ubiconray, 200ay
  efeatsday Ompeypay, 200ay
  Ictatorday orfay ifelay, 202ay
  inay Itainbray, 199ay
  ubduessay Arthianspay, 201ay

Amelscay, inay Egyptay, 13ay

Archemishcay, attlesbay atay, 104ay-5ay

Arthagecay, estructionday ofay, 176ay

Arthaginianscay, 147ay _etay eqsay._
  efeatedday ybay Elogay, 149ay

Innacay, 197ay

Eopatraclay estoredray ybay Arcæsay otay onethray, 201ay
  anday Antonyay, 210ay

Omitiacay, 179ay _etay eqsay._

Orncay, inay Egyptay, 16ay

Ostumecay, inay Abyloniabay, 66ay
  inay Egyptay, 38ay _etay eqsay._

Eationcray ofay Orldway, Abylonianbay accountay ofay, 60ay

Etecray, 76ay _etay eqsay._

Uscrœsay, ingkay ofay Ydialay, 117ay

Uneiformcay itingwray, 69ay _etay eqsay._

Yruscay, ethay Ersianpay, 111ay _etay eqsay._
  endssay ackbay exileday Ewsjay, 113ay


ELTAday, ethay, 3ay


EGYPTay, 11ay _etay eqsay._
  untinghay inay, 15ay
  Upperay anday Owerlay, 21ay

Egyptianay eligionsray, 27ay _etay eqsay._

Etruscansay, ethay, 166ay

Euphratesay, ethay, 2ay

Evansay, Irsay Arthuray, 76ay


AMOUSfay Omansray, omparedcay ithway Amousfay Eeksgray, 221ay

Irstfay Ynastyday ofay Egyptianay Ingskay, 21ay

Oodflay, ethay.  Abylonianbay accountay ofay, 61ay


ELOgay, efeatsday Arthaginianscay, 149ay

Oatsgay, inay Egyptay, 13ay

Acchusgray, Iberiustay anday Aiuscay, 194ay

Anicusgray, iverray, attlebay onay, 157ay

Eecegray eatgray enmay ofay, 139ay

Eekgray earninglay, ilosophyphay, artay, etcay., 121ay _etay eqsay._
  atesstay, ealousyjay etweenbay, 145ay _etay assimpay_
  atesstay, ownfallday ofay Artaspay, 145ay
  arriorway, 118ay


ANNIBALhay, 173ay-4ay

Erodotushay, 34ay, 146ay

Ieroglyphichay, 36ay

Istorianshay, Ucydidesthay anday Erodotushay omparedcay, 146ay

Orseshay, inay attlebay, 89ay

Orushay, Egyptianay odgay, 31ay

Untinghay Ageay, ethay, 4ay

Yksoshay, ethay "Epherdshay" Ingskay ofay Egyptay, 23ay


IONIANSay, ethay, 128ay

Ipsusay, attlebay ofay, 160ay

Ironay Ageay, ethay, 6ay

Isisay, Egyptianay oddessgay, 31ay

Israelay, ividedday omfray Udahjay, 101ay

Issusay, attlebay ofay, 157ay


EHOVAHjay,89ay

Erusalemjay, akentay ybay Ebuchadnezzarnay, 106ay
  estructionday ofay, ybay ethay Omansray, 218ay

Ewishjay eligionray, asisbay ofay Istianchray eligionray, 107ay
  itsay aracterchay, 108ay _etay eqsay._

Ewsjay, ethay, inay Alexandriaay, 161ay
  Anaancay,95ay
  Egyptay, 73ay-74ay

Ewsjay, Eekgray influenceay amongay, 204ay
  Ariseesphay anday Adduceessay, 204ay
  evoltray againstay Omeray, 205ay
  Erodhay, ethay eatgray, ingkay ofay, 206ay, 217ay
  underay Omanray ocuratorspray, 215ay


AMMURABIkHay, Odecay ofay, 62ay _etay eqsay._

Ossosknay, 77ay _etay eqsay._


ABYRINTHlay, atay Etecray, 81ay

Egionslay, ethay, 181ay _etay eqsay._
  inay Asiaay Inormay, 185ay
  owerpay assingpay otay, 195ay

Evantlay, ethay, 2ay


ARATHONmay, attlebay ofay, 131ay-2ay

Ardukmay, oray Erodachmay, 58ay

Ariusmay, 194ay, 197ay

Egiddomay, attlesbay atay, 104ay

Emphismay, 23ay

Esopotamiamay, 3ay

Inoansmay, eirthay easay-owerpay, 82ay-83ay

Inosmay, ingkay ofay Etecray, 78ay

Inotaurmay, ethay, 81ay

Ithridatesmay, ingkay ofay Ontuspay, 193ay, 196ay

Osesmay, 74ay

Ummiesmay, 44ay

Ycenæmay, Etancray uildingsbay atay, 79ay


EBUCHADNEZZARnay, ingkay ofay Abylonbay, 105ay

Ilenay, ethay iverray, 3ay, 5ay, 11ay _etay eqsay._


OAKSay, olday, inay Englanday, 8ay

Octaviusay, 209ay _etay eqsay._

Octaviusay, Astermay ofay ethay Orldway, 211ay
  alledcay Arcæsay Augustusay, 213ay

Osirisay, Egyptianay odgay, 31ay

Ostrichesay, arvedcay, 11ay


ALESTINEpay, etweenbay ethay otway Empiresay, 25ay

Apyruspay, 17ay

Arthianspay, ethay, ubduedsay ybay Uliusjay Arcæsay, 201ay

Astoralpay Ageay, ethay, 4ay

"Axpay Omanaray," 192ay

Eloponnesianpay Arway, 145ay, 150ay

Eoplespay ofay ethay Easay, 120ay

Ersianpay Ulfgay, 2ay

Ersianspay, ethay, 110ay _etay eqsay._
  eirthay attlebay ethodsmay, 116ay

Alanxphay, ethay Eekgray, 117ay
  ethay Acedonianmay, 153ay

Ilipphay, ingkay ofay Acedonmay, 153ay _etay eqsay._

Ilistinesphay, ethay, 95ay-100ay

Ilosophersphay, Oicstay anday Epicureanay, 143ay

Iciansphœnay, 96ay

Atæaplay, attlebay ofay, 137ay

Ompeypay, ethay Eatgray, 197ay _etay eqsay._

Ontiuspay Ilatepay, 213ay
  atay ialtray ofay Istchray, 216ay

Ostalpay Ervicesay, inay Omanray Empireay, 220ay

Otterypay, 18ay

Iestspray, eirthay owerpay inay Egyptay, 36ay, 38ay, 47ay

Olemyptay, 159ay

Unicpay Arsway, ethay, 172ay _etay eqsay._

Yramidspay, ethay, 42ay

Yrrhuspay, ingkay ofay Epirusay, 167ay _etay eqsay._


Eray, ethay unsay-odgay, 33ay

Omeray, 164ay _etay eqsay._
  onstitutioncay ofay, 178ay _etay eqsay._

Omeray, onquerscay Acedonmay, 187ay
  Egyptay, 188ay
  Istressmay ofay ethay Orldway, 190ay _etay eqsay._
  avesslay inay, 194ay, 198ay


ACREDsay animalsay, 30ay

Alamissay, attlebay ofay, 136ay

Arabsscay, 34ay

Eleucussay, 159ay

Emitessay, 55ay _etay eqsay._

Enatesay, ofay Omeray, 178ay _etay eqsay._

Ennacheribsay, inay ishay ariotchay, 102ay

Ethsay, Egyptianay odgay, 31ay

Anashshay, Abylonianbay unsay-odgay, 57ay

Icilysay, Eeksgray inay, 148ay
  itsay importanceay otay Omeray, 172ay

Ilsillasay, 11ay

Olomonsay, ishay ingdomkay, 100ay

Othissay, ethay arstay ofay Ethsay, ethay Ogday-arstay, 12ay

Oulssay, Egyptianay ideaay ofay, 45ay

Artansspay, oldierssay inay Asiaay Inormay, 111ay
  irtuesvay ofay, 138ay

Onestay Ageay, ethay, 6ay

Ullasay, 196ay-7ay

Umerianssay, 54ay

Yracusesay, iegesay ofay, ybay Atheniansay, 150ay
  Ionysiusday, yranttay anday avioursay ofay, 151ay


ETHMOSIStay IIIay., 23ay

Emistoclesthay, alvationsay ofay Eecegray ueday otay, 136ay

Ermopylæthay, attlebay ofay, 135ay

Eethray eatgray actsfay atthay orkedway ogethertay, 226ay-7ay

Igristay, iverray, 2ay

"Otemtay," orshipway ofay, 30ay

Iumviratetray, ethay irstfay, 199ay
  ethay econdsay, 208ay

Oytray, ethay iegesay ofay, etcay., 124ay
  Omerhay'say accountay ofay ethay iegesay ofay, 124ay
  oremay obablepray orystay ofay ethay iegesay ofay, 125ay _etay eqsay._


ARway, ethodsmay anday enginesay ofay, 90ay _etay eqsay._

Aterway-aisingray achinemay, 51ay


ERXESxay, ingkay ofay Ersiapay, ishay attemptay onay Eecegray, 133ay
  ishay allianceay ithway Arthagecay, 134ay


OROASTERzay, oray Arathustrazay, 114ay



EtHay ENDay











*** ENDay OFay EtHay OJECTpRay UTENBERGgay EBOOKay EtHay EATESTgRay ORYsTay INay EtHay ORLDway, ERIODpay Iay (OFay 3ay) ***


    

Updateday editionsay illway eplaceray ethay eviouspray oneay—ethay olday editionsay illway
ebay enamedray.

Eatingcray ethay orksway omfray intpray editionsay otnay otectedpray ybay Uay.Say. opyrightcay
awlay eansmay atthay onay oneay ownsay aay Uniteday Atesstay opyrightcay inay esethay orksway,
osay ethay Oundationfay (anday youay!) ancay opycay anday istributeday itay inay ethay Uniteday
Atesstay ithoutway ermissionpay anday ithoutway ayingpay opyrightcay
oyaltiesray. Ecialspay ulesray, etsay orthfay inay ethay Eneralgay Ermstay ofay Useay artpay
ofay isthay icenselay, applyay otay opyingcay anday istributingday Ojectpray
Utenberggay™ electronicay orksway otay otectpray ethay OJECTpRay UTENBERGgay™
onceptcay anday ademarktray. Ojectpray Utenberggay isay aay egisteredray ademarktray,
anday aymay otnay ebay useday ifay youay argechay orfay anay eBookay, exceptay ybay ollowingfay
ethay ermstay ofay ethay ademarktray icenselay, includingay ayingpay oyaltiesray orfay useay
ofay ethay Ojectpray Utenberggay ademarktray. Ifay youay oday otnay argechay anythingay orfay
opiescay ofay isthay eBookay, omplyingcay ithway ethay ademarktray icenselay isay eryvay
easyay. Youay aymay useay isthay eBookay orfay earlynay anyay urposepay uchsay asay eationcray
ofay erivativeday orksway, eportsray, erformancespay anday esearchray. Ojectpray
Utenberggay eBooksay aymay ebay odifiedmay anday intedpray anday ivengay awayay—youay aymay
oday acticallypray ANYTHINGay inay ethay Uniteday Atesstay ithway eBooksay otnay otectedpray
ybay Uay.Say. opyrightcay awlay. Edistributionray isay ubjectsay otay ethay ademarktray
icenselay, especiallyay ommercialcay edistributionray.


ARTsTay: ULLfay ICENSElay

EtHay ULLfay OJECTpRay UTENBERGgay ICENSElay

EASEpLay EADray IStHay EFOREbay YOUay ISTRIBUTEday ORay USEay IStHay ORKway

Otay otectpray ethay Ojectpray Utenberggay™ issionmay ofay omotingpray ethay eefray
istributionday ofay electronicay orksway, ybay usingay oray istributingday isthay orkway
(oray anyay otheray orkway associateday inay anyay ayway ithway ethay asephray “Ojectpray
Utenberggay”), youay agreeay otay omplycay ithway allay ethay ermstay ofay ethay Ullfay
Ojectpray Utenberggay™ Icenselay availableay ithway isthay ilefay oray onlineay atay
wwway.utenberggay.orgay/icenselay.

Ectionsay 1ay. Eneralgay Ermstay ofay Useay anday Edistributingray Ojectpray Utenberggay™
electronicay orksway

1ay.Aay. Ybay eadingray oray usingay anyay artpay ofay isthay Ojectpray Utenberggay™
electronicay orkway, youay indicateay atthay youay avehay eadray, understanday, agreeay otay
anday acceptay allay ethay ermstay ofay isthay icenselay anday intellectualay opertypray
(ademarktray/opyrightcay) agreementay. Ifay youay oday otnay agreeay otay abideay ybay allay
ethay ermstay ofay isthay agreementay, youay ustmay easecay usingay anday eturnray oray
estroyday allay opiescay ofay Ojectpray Utenberggay™ electronicay orksway inay youray
ossessionpay. Ifay youay aidpay aay eefay orfay obtainingay aay opycay ofay oray accessay otay aay
Ojectpray Utenberggay™ electronicay orkway anday youay oday otnay agreeay otay ebay oundbay
ybay ethay ermstay ofay isthay agreementay, youay aymay obtainay aay efundray omfray ethay ersonpay
oray entityay otay omwhay youay aidpay ethay eefay asay etsay orthfay inay aragraphpay 1ay.Eay.8ay.

1ay.Bay. “Ojectpray Utenberggay” isay aay egisteredray ademarktray. Itay aymay onlyay ebay
useday onay oray associateday inay anyay ayway ithway anay electronicay orkway ybay eoplepay owhay
agreeay otay ebay oundbay ybay ethay ermstay ofay isthay agreementay. Erethay areay aay ewfay
ingsthay atthay youay ancay oday ithway ostmay Ojectpray Utenberggay™ electronicay orksway
evenay ithoutway omplyingcay ithway ethay ullfay ermstay ofay isthay agreementay. Eesay
aragraphpay 1ay.Cay elowbay. Erethay areay aay otlay ofay ingsthay youay ancay oday ithway Ojectpray
Utenberggay™ electronicay orksway ifay youay ollowfay ethay ermstay ofay isthay
agreementay anday elphay eservepray eefray uturefay accessay otay Ojectpray Utenberggay™
electronicay orksway. Eesay aragraphpay 1ay.Eay elowbay.

1ay.Cay. Ethay Ojectpray Utenberggay Iterarylay Archiveay Oundationfay (“ethay
Oundationfay” oray AFpGLay), ownsay aay ompilationcay opyrightcay inay ethay ollectioncay
ofay Ojectpray Utenberggay™ electronicay orksway. Earlynay allay ethay individualay
orksway inay ethay ollectioncay areay inay ethay ublicpay omainday inay ethay Uniteday
Atesstay. Ifay anay individualay orkway isay unprotecteday ybay opyrightcay awlay inay ethay
Uniteday Atesstay anday youay areay ocatedlay inay ethay Uniteday Atesstay, eway oday otnay
aimclay aay ightray otay eventpray youay omfray opyingcay, istributingday, erformingpay,
isplayingday oray eatingcray erivativeday orksway asedbay onay ethay orkway asay onglay asay
allay eferencesray otay Ojectpray Utenberggay areay emovedray. Ofay oursecay, eway opehay
atthay youay illway upportsay ethay Ojectpray Utenberggay™ issionmay ofay omotingpray
eefray accessay otay electronicay orksway ybay eelyfray aringshay Ojectpray Utenberggay™
orksway inay ompliancecay ithway ethay ermstay ofay isthay agreementay orfay eepingkay ethay
Ojectpray Utenberggay™ amenay associateday ithway ethay orkway. Youay ancay easilyay
omplycay ithway ethay ermstay ofay isthay agreementay ybay eepingkay isthay orkway inay ethay
amesay ormatfay ithway itsay attacheday ullfay Ojectpray Utenberggay™ Icenselay enwhay
youay areshay itay ithoutway argechay ithway othersay.

1ay.Day. Ethay opyrightcay awslay ofay ethay aceplay erewhay youay areay ocatedlay alsoay overngay
atwhay youay ancay oday ithway isthay orkway. Opyrightcay awslay inay ostmay ountriescay areay
inay aay onstantcay atestay ofay angechay. Ifay youay areay outsideay ethay Uniteday Atesstay,
eckchay ethay awslay ofay youray ountrycay inay additionay otay ethay ermstay ofay isthay
agreementay eforebay ownloadingday, opyingcay, isplayingday, erformingpay,
istributingday oray eatingcray erivativeday orksway asedbay onay isthay orkway oray anyay
otheray Ojectpray Utenberggay™ orkway. Ethay Oundationfay akesmay onay
epresentationsray oncerningcay ethay opyrightcay atusstay ofay anyay orkway inay anyay
ountrycay otheray anthay ethay Uniteday Atesstay.

1ay.Eay. Unlessay youay avehay emovedray allay eferencesray otay Ojectpray Utenberggay:

1ay.Eay.1ay. Ethay ollowingfay entencesay, ithway activeay inkslay otay, oray otheray
immediateay accessay otay, ethay ullfay Ojectpray Utenberggay™ Icenselay ustmay appearay
ominentlypray eneverwhay anyay opycay ofay aay Ojectpray Utenberggay™ orkway (anyay orkway
onay ichwhay ethay asephray “Ojectpray Utenberggay” appearsay, oray ithway ichwhay ethay
asephray “Ojectpray Utenberggay” isay associateday) isay accesseday, isplayedday,
erformedpay, iewedvay, opiedcay oray istributedday:

    Isthay eBookay isay orfay ethay useay ofay anyoneay anywhereay inay ethay Uniteday Atesstay anday ostmay
    otheray artspay ofay ethay orldway atay onay ostcay anday ithway almostay onay estrictionsray
    atsoeverwhay. Youay aymay opycay itay, ivegay itay awayay oray eray-useay itay underay ethay ermstay
    ofay ethay Ojectpray Utenberggay Icenselay includeday ithway isthay eBookay oray onlineay
    atay wwway.utenberggay.orgay. Ifay youay
    areay otnay ocatedlay inay ethay Uniteday Atesstay, youay illway avehay otay eckchay ethay awslay
    ofay ethay ountrycay erewhay youay areay ocatedlay eforebay usingay isthay eBookay.
  
1ay.Eay.2ay. Ifay anay individualay Ojectpray Utenberggay™ electronicay orkway isay
erivedday omfray extstay otnay otectedpray ybay Uay.Say. opyrightcay awlay (oesday otnay
ontaincay aay oticenay indicatingay atthay itay isay ostedpay ithway ermissionpay ofay ethay
opyrightcay olderhay), ethay orkway ancay ebay opiedcay anday istributedday otay anyoneay inay
ethay Uniteday Atesstay ithoutway ayingpay anyay eesfay oray argeschay. Ifay youay areay
edistributingray oray ovidingpray accessay otay aay orkway ithway ethay asephray “Ojectpray
Utenberggay” associateday ithway oray appearingay onay ethay orkway, youay ustmay omplycay
eitheray ithway ethay equirementsray ofay aragraphspay 1ay.Eay.1ay oughthray 1ay.Eay.7ay oray
obtainay ermissionpay orfay ethay useay ofay ethay orkway anday ethay Ojectpray Utenberggay™
ademarktray asay etsay orthfay inay aragraphspay 1ay.Eay.8ay oray 1ay.Eay.9ay.

1ay.Eay.3ay. Ifay anay individualay Ojectpray Utenberggay™ electronicay orkway isay ostedpay
ithway ethay ermissionpay ofay ethay opyrightcay olderhay, youray useay anday istributionday
ustmay omplycay ithway othbay aragraphspay 1ay.Eay.1ay oughthray 1ay.Eay.7ay anday anyay
additionalay ermstay imposeday ybay ethay opyrightcay olderhay. Additionalay ermstay
illway ebay inkedlay otay ethay Ojectpray Utenberggay™ Icenselay orfay allay orksway
ostedpay ithway ethay ermissionpay ofay ethay opyrightcay olderhay oundfay atay ethay
eginningbay ofay isthay orkway.

1ay.Eay.4ay. Oday otnay unlinkay oray etachday oray emoveray ethay ullfay Ojectpray Utenberggay™
Icenselay ermstay omfray isthay orkway, oray anyay ilesfay ontainingcay aay artpay ofay isthay
orkway oray anyay otheray orkway associateday ithway Ojectpray Utenberggay™.

1ay.Eay.5ay. Oday otnay opycay, isplayday, erformpay, istributeday oray edistributeray isthay
electronicay orkway, oray anyay artpay ofay isthay electronicay orkway, ithoutway
ominentlypray isplayingday ethay entencesay etsay orthfay inay aragraphpay 1ay.Eay.1ay ithway
activeay inkslay oray immediateay accessay otay ethay ullfay ermstay ofay ethay Ojectpray
Utenberggay™ Icenselay.

1ay.Eay.6ay. Youay aymay onvertcay otay anday istributeday isthay orkway inay anyay inarybay,
ompressedcay, arkedmay upay, onproprietarynay oray oprietarypray ormfay, includingay
anyay ordway ocessingpray oray ypertexthay ormfay. Oweverhay, ifay youay ovidepray accessay
otay oray istributeday opiescay ofay aay Ojectpray Utenberggay™ orkway inay aay ormatfay
otheray anthay “Ainplay Anillavay ASCIIay” oray otheray ormatfay useday inay ethay officialay
ersionvay ostedpay onay ethay officialay Ojectpray Utenberggay™ ebsiteway
(wwway.utenberggay.orgay), youay ustmay, atay onay additionalay ostcay, eefay oray expenseay
otay ethay useray, ovidepray aay opycay, aay eansmay ofay exportingay aay opycay, oray aay eansmay
ofay obtainingay aay opycay uponay equestray, ofay ethay orkway inay itsay originalay “Ainplay
Anillavay ASCIIay” oray otheray ormfay. Anyay alternateay ormatfay ustmay includeay ethay
ullfay Ojectpray Utenberggay™ Icenselay asay ecifiedspay inay aragraphpay 1ay.Eay.1ay.

1ay.Eay.7ay. Oday otnay argechay aay eefay orfay accessay otay, iewingvay, isplayingday,
erformingpay, opyingcay oray istributingday anyay Ojectpray Utenberggay™ orksway
unlessay youay omplycay ithway aragraphpay 1ay.Eay.8ay oray 1ay.Eay.9ay.

1ay.Eay.8ay. Youay aymay argechay aay easonableray eefay orfay opiescay ofay oray ovidingpray
accessay otay oray istributingday Ojectpray Utenberggay™ electronicay orksway
ovidedpray atthay:

    • Youay aypay aay oyaltyray eefay ofay 20ay% ofay ethay ossgray ofitspray youay eriveday omfray
        ethay useay ofay Ojectpray Utenberggay™ orksway alculatedcay usingay ethay ethodmay
        youay alreadyay useay otay alculatecay youray applicableay axestay. Ethay eefay isay oweday
        otay ethay owneray ofay ethay Ojectpray Utenberggay™ ademarktray, utbay ehay ashay
        agreeday otay onateday oyaltiesray underay isthay aragraphpay otay ethay Ojectpray
        Utenberggay Iterarylay Archiveay Oundationfay. Oyaltyray aymentspay ustmay ebay aidpay
        ithinway 60ay aysday ollowingfay eachay ateday onay ichwhay youay eparepray (oray areay
        egallylay equiredray otay eparepray) youray eriodicpay axtay eturnsray. Oyaltyray
        aymentspay ouldshay ebay earlyclay arkedmay asay uchsay anday entsay otay ethay Ojectpray
        Utenberggay Iterarylay Archiveay Oundationfay atay ethay addressay ecifiedspay inay
        Ectionsay 4ay, “Informationay aboutay onationsday otay ethay Ojectpray Utenberggay
        Iterarylay Archiveay Oundationfay.”
    
    • Youay ovidepray aay ullfay efundray ofay anyay oneymay aidpay ybay aay useray owhay otifiesnay
        youay inay itingwray (oray ybay eay-ailmay) ithinway 30ay aysday ofay eceiptray atthay say/ehay
        oesday otnay agreeay otay ethay ermstay ofay ethay ullfay Ojectpray Utenberggay™
        Icenselay. Youay ustmay equireray uchsay aay useray otay eturnray oray estroyday allay
        opiescay ofay ethay orksway ossessedpay inay aay ysicalphay ediummay anday iscontinueday
        allay useay ofay anday allay accessay otay otheray opiescay ofay Ojectpray Utenberggay™
        orksway.
    
    • Youay ovidepray, inay accordanceay ithway aragraphpay 1ay.Fay.3ay, aay ullfay efundray ofay
        anyay oneymay aidpay orfay aay orkway oray aay eplacementray opycay, ifay aay efectday inay ethay
        electronicay orkway isay iscoveredday anday eportedray otay youay ithinway 90ay aysday ofay
        eceiptray ofay ethay orkway.
    
    • Youay omplycay ithway allay otheray ermstay ofay isthay agreementay orfay eefray
        istributionday ofay Ojectpray Utenberggay™ orksway.
    

1ay.Eay.9ay. Ifay youay ishway otay argechay aay eefay oray istributeday aay Ojectpray
Utenberggay™ electronicay orkway oray oupgray ofay orksway onay ifferentday ermstay anthay
areay etsay orthfay inay isthay agreementay, youay ustmay obtainay ermissionpay inay itingwray
omfray ethay Ojectpray Utenberggay Iterarylay Archiveay Oundationfay, ethay anagermay ofay
ethay Ojectpray Utenberggay™ ademarktray. Ontactcay ethay Oundationfay asay etsay
orthfay inay Ectionsay 3ay elowbay.

1ay.Fay.

1ay.Fay.1ay. Ojectpray Utenberggay olunteersvay anday employeesay expenday onsiderablecay
effortay otay identifyay, oday opyrightcay esearchray onay, anscribetray anday oofreadpray
orksway otnay otectedpray ybay Uay.Say. opyrightcay awlay inay eatingcray ethay Ojectpray
Utenberggay™ ollectioncay. Espiteday esethay effortsay, Ojectpray Utenberggay™
electronicay orksway, anday ethay ediummay onay ichwhay eythay aymay ebay oredstay, aymay
ontaincay “Efectsday,” uchsay asay, utbay otnay imitedlay otay, incompleteay, inaccurateay
oray orruptcay ataday, anscriptiontray errorsay, aay opyrightcay oray otheray
intellectualay opertypray infringementay, aay efectiveday oray amagedday iskday oray
otheray ediummay, aay omputercay irusvay, oray omputercay odescay atthay amageday oray
annotcay ebay eadray ybay youray equipmentay.

1ay.Fay.2ay. IMITEDlay ARRANTYway, ISCLAIMERday OFay AMAGESday - Exceptay orfay ethay “Ightray
ofay Eplacementray oray Efundray” escribedday inay aragraphpay 1ay.Fay.3ay, ethay Ojectpray
Utenberggay Iterarylay Archiveay Oundationfay, ethay owneray ofay ethay Ojectpray
Utenberggay™ ademarktray, anday anyay otheray artypay istributingday aay Ojectpray
Utenberggay™ electronicay orkway underay isthay agreementay, isclaimday allay
iabilitylay otay youay orfay amagesday, ostscay anday expensesay, includingay egallay
eesfay. YOUay AGREEay ATtHay YOUay AVEhay Onay EMEDIESray ORfay EGLIGENCEnay, ICTsTRay
IABILITYlay, EACHbRay OFay ARRANTYway ORay EACHbRay OFay ONTRACTcay EXCEPTay OSEtHay
OVIDEDpRay INay ARAGRAPHpay 1ay.Fay.3ay. YOUay AGREEay ATtHay EtHay OUNDATIONfay, EtHay
ADEMARKtRay OWNERay, ANDay ANYay ISTRIBUTORday UNDERay IStHay AGREEMENTay ILLway OTnay Ebay
IABLElay Otay YOUay ORfay ACTUALay, IRECTday, INDIRECTay, ONSEQUENTIALcay, UNITIVEpay ORay
INCIDENTALay AMAGESday EVENay IFay YOUay IVEgay OTICEnay OFay EtHay OSSIBILITYpay OFay UCHsay
AMAGEday.

1ay.Fay.3ay. IMITEDlay IGHTray OFay EPLACEMENTray ORay EFUNDray - Ifay youay iscoverday aay
efectday inay isthay electronicay orkway ithinway 90ay aysday ofay eceivingray itay, youay ancay
eceiveray aay efundray ofay ethay oneymay (ifay anyay) youay aidpay orfay itay ybay endingsay aay
ittenwray explanationay otay ethay ersonpay youay eceivedray ethay orkway omfray. Ifay youay
eceivedray ethay orkway onay aay ysicalphay ediummay, youay ustmay eturnray ethay ediummay
ithway youray ittenwray explanationay. Ethay ersonpay oray entityay atthay ovidedpray youay
ithway ethay efectiveday orkway aymay electay otay ovidepray aay eplacementray opycay inay
ieulay ofay aay efundray. Ifay youay eceivedray ethay orkway electronicallyay, ethay ersonpay
oray entityay ovidingpray itay otay youay aymay oosechay otay ivegay youay aay econdsay
opportunityay otay eceiveray ethay orkway electronicallyay inay ieulay ofay aay efundray. Ifay
ethay econdsay opycay isay alsoay efectiveday, youay aymay emandday aay efundray inay itingwray
ithoutway urtherfay opportunitiesay otay ixfay ethay oblempray.

1ay.Fay.4ay. Exceptay orfay ethay imitedlay ightray ofay eplacementray oray efundray etsay orthfay
inay aragraphpay 1ay.Fay.3ay, isthay orkway isay ovidedpray otay youay ‘ASay-ISay’, ITHway Onay
OTHERay ARRANTIESway OFay ANYay INDkay, EXPRESSay ORay IMPLIEDay, INCLUDINGay UTbay OTnay
IMITEDlay Otay ARRANTIESway OFay ERCHANTABILITYmay ORay ITNESSfay ORfay ANYay URPOSEpay.

1ay.Fay.5ay. Omesay atesstay oday otnay alloway isclaimersday ofay ertaincay implieday
arrantiesway oray ethay exclusionay oray imitationlay ofay ertaincay ypestay ofay
amagesday. Ifay anyay isclaimerday oray imitationlay etsay orthfay inay isthay agreementay
iolatesvay ethay awlay ofay ethay atestay applicableay otay isthay agreementay, ethay
agreementay allshay ebay interpreteday otay akemay ethay aximummay isclaimerday oray
imitationlay ermittedpay ybay ethay applicableay atestay awlay. Ethay invalidityay oray
unenforceabilityay ofay anyay ovisionpray ofay isthay agreementay allshay otnay oidvay ethay
emainingray ovisionspray.

1ay.Fay.6ay. INDEMNITYay - Youay agreeay otay indemnifyay anday oldhay ethay Oundationfay, ethay
ademarktray owneray, anyay agentay oray employeeay ofay ethay Oundationfay, anyoneay
ovidingpray opiescay ofay Ojectpray Utenberggay™ electronicay orksway inay
accordanceay ithway isthay agreementay, anday anyay olunteersvay associateday ithway ethay
oductionpray, omotionpray anday istributionday ofay Ojectpray Utenberggay™
electronicay orksway, armlesshay omfray allay iabilitylay, ostscay anday expensesay,
includingay egallay eesfay, atthay ariseay irectlyday oray indirectlyay omfray anyay ofay
ethay ollowingfay ichwhay youay oday oray ausecay otay occuray: (aay) istributionday ofay isthay
oray anyay Ojectpray Utenberggay™ orkway, (bay) alterationay, odificationmay, oray
additionsay oray eletionsday otay anyay Ojectpray Utenberggay™ orkway, anday (cay) anyay
Efectday youay ausecay.

Ectionsay 2ay. Informationay aboutay ethay Issionmay ofay Ojectpray Utenberggay™

Ojectpray Utenberggay™ isay ynonymoussay ithway ethay eefray istributionday ofay
electronicay orksway inay ormatsfay eadableray ybay ethay idestway arietyvay ofay
omputerscay includingay obsoleteay, olday, iddlemay-ageday anday ewnay omputerscay. Itay
existsay ecausebay ofay ethay effortsay ofay undredshay ofay olunteersvay anday onationsday
omfray eoplepay inay allay alksway ofay ifelay.

Olunteersvay anday inancialfay upportsay otay ovidepray olunteersvay ithway ethay
assistanceay eythay eednay areay iticalcray otay eachingray Ojectpray Utenberggay™’say
oalsgay anday ensuringay atthay ethay Ojectpray Utenberggay™ ollectioncay illway
emainray eelyfray availableay orfay enerationsgay otay omecay. Inay 2001ay, ethay Ojectpray
Utenberggay Iterarylay Archiveay Oundationfay asway eatedcray otay ovidepray aay ecuresay
anday ermanentpay uturefay orfay Ojectpray Utenberggay™ anday uturefay
enerationsgay. Otay earnlay oremay aboutay ethay Ojectpray Utenberggay Iterarylay
Archiveay Oundationfay anday owhay youray effortsay anday onationsday ancay elphay, eesay
Ectionssay 3ay anday 4ay anday ethay Oundationfay informationay agepay atay wwway.utenberggay.orgay.

Ectionsay 3ay. Informationay aboutay ethay Ojectpray Utenberggay Iterarylay Archiveay Oundationfay

Ethay Ojectpray Utenberggay Iterarylay Archiveay Oundationfay isay aay onnay-ofitpray
501ay(cay)(3ay) educationalay orporationcay organizeday underay ethay awslay ofay ethay
atestay ofay Ississippimay anday antedgray axtay exemptay atusstay ybay ethay Internalay
Evenueray Ervicesay. Ethay Oundationfay’say EINay oray ederalfay axtay identificationay
umbernay isay 64ay-6221541ay. Ontributionscay otay ethay Ojectpray Utenberggay Iterarylay
Archiveay Oundationfay areay axtay eductibleday otay ethay ullfay extentay ermittedpay ybay
Uay.Say. ederalfay awslay anday youray atestay’say awslay.

Ethay Oundationfay’say usinessbay officeay isay ocatedlay atay 809ay Orthnay 1500ay Estway,
Altsay Akelay Itycay, UTay 84116ay, (801ay) 596ay-1887ay. Emailay ontactcay inkslay anday upay
otay ateday ontactcay informationay ancay ebay oundfay atay ethay Oundationfay’say ebsiteway
anday officialay agepay atay wwway.utenberggay.orgay/ontactcay

Ectionsay 4ay. Informationay aboutay Onationsday otay ethay Ojectpray Utenberggay
Iterarylay Archiveay Oundationfay

Ojectpray Utenberggay™ ependsday uponay anday annotcay urvivesay ithoutway idespreadway
ublicpay upportsay anday onationsday otay arrycay outay itsay issionmay ofay
increasingay ethay umbernay ofay ublicpay omainday anday icensedlay orksway atthay ancay ebay
eelyfray istributedday inay achinemay-eadableray ormfay accessibleay ybay ethay idestway
arrayay ofay equipmentay includingay outdateday equipmentay. Anymay allsmay onationsday
($1ay otay $5ay,000ay) areay articularlypay importantay otay aintainingmay axtay exemptay
atusstay ithway ethay IRSay.

Ethay Oundationfay isay ommittedcay otay omplyingcay ithway ethay awslay egulatingray
aritieschay anday aritablechay onationsday inay allay 50ay atesstay ofay ethay Uniteday
Atesstay. Ompliancecay equirementsray areay otnay uniformay anday itay akestay aay
onsiderablecay effortay, uchmay aperworkpay anday anymay eesfay otay eetmay anday eepkay upay
ithway esethay equirementsray. Eway oday otnay olicitsay onationsday inay ocationslay
erewhay eway avehay otnay eceivedray ittenwray onfirmationcay ofay ompliancecay. Otay ENDsay
ONATIONSday oray etermineday ethay atusstay ofay ompliancecay orfay anyay articularpay atestay
isitvay wwway.utenberggay.orgay/onateday.

Ilewhay eway annotcay anday oday otnay olicitsay ontributionscay omfray atesstay erewhay eway
avehay otnay etmay ethay olicitationsay equirementsray, eway owknay ofay onay ohibitionpray
againstay acceptingay unsoliciteday onationsday omfray onorsday inay uchsay atesstay owhay
approachay usay ithway offersay otay onateday.

Internationalay onationsday areay atefullygray accepteday, utbay eway annotcay akemay
anyay atementsstay oncerningcay axtay eatmenttray ofay onationsday eceivedray omfray
outsideay ethay Uniteday Atesstay. Uay.Say. awslay aloneay ampsway ouray allsmay affstay.

Easeplay eckchay ethay Ojectpray Utenberggay ebway agespay orfay urrentcay onationday
ethodsmay anday addressesay. Onationsday areay accepteday inay aay umbernay ofay otheray
aysway includingay eckschay, onlineay aymentspay anday editcray ardcay onationsday. Otay
onateday, easeplay isitvay: wwway.utenberggay.orgay/onateday.

Ectionsay 5ay. Eneralgay Informationay Aboutay Ojectpray Utenberggay™ electronicay orksway

Ofessorpray Ichaelmay Say. Arthay asway ethay originatoray ofay ethay Ojectpray
Utenberggay™ onceptcay ofay aay ibrarylay ofay electronicay orksway atthay ouldcay ebay
eelyfray aredshay ithway anyoneay. Orfay ortyfay yearsay, ehay oducedpray anday
istributedday Ojectpray Utenberggay™ eBooksay ithway onlyay aay ooselay etworknay ofay
olunteervay upportsay.

Ojectpray Utenberggay™ eBooksay areay oftenay eatedcray omfray everalsay intedpray
editionsay, allay ofay ichwhay areay onfirmedcay asay otnay otectedpray ybay opyrightcay inay
ethay Uay.Say. unlessay aay opyrightcay oticenay isay includeday. Usthay, eway oday otnay
ecessarilynay eepkay eBooksay inay ompliancecay ithway anyay articularpay aperpay
editionay.

Ostmay eoplepay artstay atay ouray ebsiteway ichwhay ashay ethay ainmay PGay earchsay
acilityfay: wwway.utenberggay.orgay.

Isthay ebsiteway includesay informationay aboutay Ojectpray Utenberggay™,
includingay owhay otay akemay onationsday otay ethay Ojectpray Utenberggay Iterarylay
Archiveay Oundationfay, owhay otay elphay oducepray ouray ewnay eBooksay, anday owhay otay
ubscribesay otay ouray emailay ewsletternay otay earhay aboutay ewnay eBooksay.
